,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
1,Data Scientist - TS/SCI w/ Poly,$76k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Why wake up every day and want more when YOU CAN HAVE IT? Do you love KNOWING at the end of each day that your work made a difference? We embrace and solve some of the world's toughest challenges. We’re focused on ensuring our intelligence customers have the right tools, technologies, and tactics to keep pace with an ever evolving threat landscape and succeed in their mission to protect people and critical assets around the world. Who wouldn’t be fulfilled being part of that every day? We know once you join Team Leidos, you are sure to go home at the end of every day knowing YOU MADE A DIFFERENCE, resulting in one of the most REWARDING careers you could have imagined. EACH DAY MATTERS!

We have an IMMEDIATE NEED for a Jr Data Scientist to provide mission critical support to our customer. As part of an Agile Team, you will design, develop, and maintain software applications using a tailored SAFe Agile DevSecOps Scrum process. This role implements data auditing, reporting, and security through the use of existing tools and developing new ones. This role requires familiarization with a broad range of data analysis tools and techniques This role leads complex projects requiring data analysis, interpretation, and communication to support decision-makers and customers.

Primary Responsibilities

Create innovative solutions to meet the technical needs of customers.
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Participate in the development of documentation.
Coordinate closely with customers, Scrum Masters, and cross-functional areas to communicate project statuses and initiatives.
Analyze data to effectively coordinate the installation of new systems or modifications to existing systems.
Support the Agile software development lifecycle.
Communicate key project data to team members and build team cohesion and effectiveness.
Develop and execute project plans leveraging Atlassian tool suite like JIRA and Confluence to track activities.
Apply best practices and standard operating procedures.

Basic Qualifications

Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders.
Experience querying and analyzing machine logs.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills for coordinating across team
Candidate must have a BS and 4-8 years or prior relevant experience or Masters and 2-6 years or prior relevant experience.
Additional years of experience can be accepted in lieu of education.

Clearance/Citizenship

Candidate must be US Citizen.
Candidate must have an active TS/SCI with Polygraph

""External Referral Eligible""

NSOINT

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
2,Physical Scientist,-1,"Physical Scientist

Melbourne, FL

Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance

National Security

Job Description

ENSCO's National Security Solutions (NSS) Division provides innovative customized products and services vital to national safety and security. We seek a team-oriented Physical Scientist / Computational Chemist to perform technical support on a variety of environmental modeling and simulation projects. The successful candidate will use analytical problem solving skills to address unique modeling and simulation challenges and will often work with a multidisciplinary team of scientists to meet these needs. This will range from predicting physical property data, interpreting spectral signatures, and comparing modeled and experimental data. The ability to describe and document the modeling work to a varied audience through report writing and technical presentation is important.

Qualifications Required (Skills)

Bachelor’s degree with 3 years’ experience in a Physical Science (Chemistry, Physics), Mathematics, or Chemical Engineering, or equivalent
Experience in the following areas:
Course work in Chemistry, Computational Chemistry Methods, and Statistics.
Application of quantum chemical chemistry methods to supplement experiment.
Chemical principles associated with environmental fate (gas or condensed phase), spectral signatures, and modeling and simulation.
Must be proficient on various platforms (PC, Unix and/or Linux), experience using High Performance Computing platforms (CPU), and a strong background in modeling using, physics, chemistry, or applied mathematics, experience in low level programming languages (e.g., C, C++, Rust, or Fortran), and basic statistics.
Strong analytical problem-solving skills and a demonstrated ability to apply technical knowledge towards solving real-world problems
Excellent technical writing and verbal skills
Ability to communicate with multidisciplinary teams of scientists and engineers
The ability to obtain a SECURITY CLEARANCE is essential for which you must be a U.S. citizen. If you do not meet this requirement, you will not be considered.

Qualifications Desired

Master’s degree in a Physical Science (Chemistry, Physics), Mathematics, or Chemical Engineering
Knowledge of programming languages including R and Python
Experience working with High Performance Computing platforms (CPU and GPU).
Skill using environmental and engineering modeling tools including HPAC, SCIPUFF, ChemCAD, QUIC, and ARC-GIS
Experience in any of the following areas: Infrared Spectroscopy (near, mid, and far), quantum chemical modeling, nuclear chemistry, mechanistic chemistry, kinetics modeling, statistical analysis of laboratory data.
Experience in Chemical, Biological, Radiological, Nuclear, and Explosives (CBRNE) programs
#LI-KM1

Req ID

1989BR

Internal Position Title

Scientist III

Employment Status

Regular Full-time

General Education/Years of Experience

BS or equiv; min 3 yrs relevant exp

U.S. Citizenship

Yes

Background Check Type

7 year

Drug Screen Type

None

Export Control and Licensing

None

Contract Award Contingency

No

Recruiter

Kierra McDonald

Division Description

The National Security Solutions (NSS) Division provides security solutions for the United States government. NSS employees offer a multi-disciplinary approach to solve some of the most challenging technical problems in complex operational environments. Our areas of expertise are in sensor development and integration; chemical, biological and geophysical phenomenology; software applications and modeling; and operational applications of technology.

Key customers include the Department of Homeland Security, the Department of Defense, and the Intelligence Community.

Strength in Diversity

ENSCO, Inc. and its wholly owned U.S. subsidiaries are equal opportunity/affirmative action employers, committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under state or local law.",3.6,"ENSCO, Inc.
3.6","Melbourne, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
3,NLP and Machine Learning Research Scientist,$94k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Research USA is actively seeking talents with a Machine Learning background to join our vibrant research team in our Silicon Valley office. Our research team has broad research interests among many different areas, such as natural language processing, speech synthesis and recognition, and computer vision. The candidate will have the opportunity to work with top researchers on various exciting research projects. The ideal candidate should have solid machine learning related knowledge and experience to work together with the teammates on the research, implementation, experimentation, and the analysis of algorithms. As a research scientist at Baidu, you will benefit greatly by working in our creative environment.

Requirements:
PhD degree in computer science, statistics, machine learning, or a related field.
At least 2 years of relevant industry or research experience.
Good knowledge of common machine learning models.
Expertise in one or more of natural language processing, computer vision, speech synthesis or recognition, optimization, generative models.
Strong publication record in top conferences or journals, e.g., ACL, EMNLP, NAACL NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR and so on.
Good presentation and communication skills.
A solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design.
Expert knowledge developing and debugging in python, C/C++ or CUDA is a plus.
Key Responsibilities:
Conduct scientific research to design, implement and evaluate novel machine learning algorithms
Collaborate with other researchers in developing machine learning algorithms
Prepare presentation and technical paper drafts to demonstrate research findings and experimental results.
Participate in software prototyping and experimental evaluation.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
4,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$109k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking someone with aviation experience and skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, and summarization mean something to you and you’ve applied them to aviation data, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
5,Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist,$95k-$191k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Brisbane, Calif., CareDx, Inc. is a leading precision medicine solutions company focused on the discovery, development and commercialization of clinically differentiated, high-value healthcare solutions for transplant patients and caregivers. CareDx offers products, testing services and digital healthcare solutions along the pre- and post-transplant patient journey, and is the leading provider of genomics-based information for transplant patients.

Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist

We are seeking a highly motivated, critical, and creative Staff Scientist/Sr. Staff Scientist to join the CareDx R&D group. This is an exciting opportunity to be part of a growing, dynamic, and collaborative R&D team innovating cutting-edge technology. The primary function of this position will be to drive development of innovative diagnostic solutions for transplant recipients. The ideal candidate will be able to lead assay development and validation projects, have experience interfacing with cross functional teams including bioinformatics, biostatistics, data science, clinical and lab operations; and have experience in molecular biology methods for nucleic acid characterization and applications.

Responsibilities as follows, but not necessarily limited to:
Lead the initiation, design and execution of experiments to develop novel high-value diagnostic tests
Use molecular biology approaches to independently develop and optimize molecular diagnostics assays based on gene expression
Independently perform basic analysis of high-dimensional data
Coordinate with statistics and bioinformatics teams for high-level data analysis and gene expression signature development
Provide expert support, guidance and mentorship for experiment design, data analysis and results communication to the broader scientific team
Interface with staff in multiple departments and clearly communicate results with colleagues and R&D management, as well as externally at scientific meetings and conferences
Lead project through development, validation and launch
Qualifications:

Ph.D. in genomics, molecular biology or a related discipline with 10+ years of experience and at least 5 years of industry experience.
Strong background in molecular biology
Expert in nucleic acid sample preparation
Experience in development or optimization of nucleic acid technologies related to measuring gene expression, e.g. qPCR, dPCR and multiplex PCR
Ability to collect requirements, plan activities and prioritize activities/assignments to supporting team members.
Able to identify risk and provide recommendations for risk mitigation in area of responsibility and at project level.
Excellent interdisciplinary communication skills required
Bioinformatics skills such as programming and data mining are a plus
Good organizational skills, and detail oriented
Additional Details:


Every individual at CareDx has a direct impact on our collective mission to improve the lives of organ transplant patients worldwide. We believe in taking great care of our people, so they take even greater care of our patients.

Our competitive Total Rewards package includes:
Competitive base salary and incentive compensation
Health and welfare benefits including a gym reimbursement program
401(k) savings plan match
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
Pre-tax commuter benefits
And more!
In addition, we have a Living Donor Employee Recovery Policy that allows up to 30 days of paid leave annually to a full-time employee who makes the selfless act of donating an organ or bone marrow.

With products that are making a difference in the lives of transplant patients today and a promising pipeline for the future, its an exciting time to be part of the CareDx team. Join us in partnering with transplant patients to transform our future together.

CareDx, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer and participate in E-Verify program.
******* We do not accept resumes from headhunters, placement agencies, or other suppliers that have not signed a formal agreement with us.",2.4,"CareDx
2.4","Brisbane, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
6,Machine Learning Engineer,$108k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"CircleUp harnesses the power of machine learning and predictive analytics to discover some of the fastest-growing companies in the consumer & retail sector. We are building a predictive data system called ""Helio"" to bring the data-driven revolution that has occurred in the public markets to the private markets, starting with consumer & retail.

We are working on challenging problems in information retrieval, entity resolution, and developing an in-depth knowledge graph of all private companies. We are mining vast amounts of data to successfully rewrite the rules on how private companies are evaluated.

With a background in both software development and machine learning, you will collaborate with software engineers, data scientists, PMs, and domain experts in consumer investing to develop & ship predictive data products in support of CircleUp's mission - helping entrepreneurs thrive by connecting them with the capital & resources they need.

You are a passionate software engineer who is comfortable working across the full stack & lifecycle of predictive data products - prototyping, feature engineering, validation, and productionalization.

CircleUp was recently honored as one of Fast Company's Top 10 Most Innovative Companies in Data Science and has been named a CB Insights FinTech 250, a Top 5 Most Disruptive Company in Finance by CNBC, and to the Forbes FinTech 50. Founded in 2012, CircleUp is headquartered in San Francisco and backed by Union Square Ventures, GV, Canaan Partners, QED Advisors, and others.

Responsibilities:
Collect and refine structured and unstructured data on private companies
Build out our entity resolution platform that can identify references to companies, brands and products in highly unstructured digital documents and link them back to real world entities
Build scalable production systems for data collection, data transformation, feature extraction, model training, and scoring, using distributed software tools
Build end to end algorithms for objectively measuring the quality of private consumer companies
Contribute to all phases of algorithm development including ideation, prototyping, design and production
We're looking for teammates who have:
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Information retrieval, Natural Language processing, Math, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of experience in machine learning, NLP and/or information retrieval
Broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools, and open source libraries
Excellent coding skills and strong fundamentals in algorithms, data structures, predictive modeling and big data concepts
Experience putting models into production systems is a huge plus
An interest in disrupting and democratizing the entire industry within the private markets.
If you got to this point, we hope you’re feeling excited about the job description you just read! Even if you feel that you don't meet all of the requirements and qualifications, we still encourage you to apply. We’re eager to speak with those who share our passion to help entrepreneurs thrive - not just those who match every bullet point in our job descriptions.

CircleUp is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status (including registered domestic partnership status), sex and gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), gender identity and gender expression (including transgender individuals who are transitioning, have transitioned, or are perceived to be transitioning to the gender with which they identify), age, sexual orientation, Civil Air Patrol status, military and veteran status and any other consideration protected by federal, state or local law. We encourage those who really want to make an impact to apply for our open positions.",4.5,"CircleUp
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

We are seeking a Data Scientist. The position requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance. The Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Data Scientist will perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics. The Scientist will construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces. The Scientist will perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured data. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The Data Scientist will contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Scientist will be expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies including AWS and Git.

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative subject or related field ( for example, statistics, mathematics, economics, or related field) and 8 years of experience
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
Strong experience working with Python or R programming languages
Experience working with data manipulation, analytic/business insight tools, and data visualization experience
Experience with SciPy stack or Tidyverse packages
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries
Experience/ knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and experience/knowledge of statistics
Demonstrated experience using statistical and machine learning techniques including supervised and unsupervised learning and natural language processing
Experience /familiarity with frequentist statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with visualizing data using popular packages including Tableau, ggplot or Matplotlib
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences

Preferred:

Experience/knowledge of social network and link analysis tools is desired (e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook, or Proton)
Experience working with Amazon Web Services (AWS) is desired
Experience with front end web development is desired but not required
Experience designing and implementing neural network architectures

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
8,R & D Scientist,$83k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"R&D Scientists apply the scientific method in one or more disciplines (e.g., Photogrammetry, Geodesy, Computer Science, Mathematics, Image Science, Human Terrain Analysis) to advance Geospatial Science and enhance Agency tradecraft. They conduct and develop novel scientific research projects and facilitate interdisciplinary collaboration to further scientific inquiry and application. They provide technical guidance and oversight, report results, and advise management on new and evolving technology. They address a variety of complex data-related analytical problems by applying quantitative and qualitative analytic methods.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: Selected candidate will execute innovative research on automated exploitation of airborne, commercial, civil and other sources of radar data including but not limited to synthetic aperture radar (SAR) complex data related to NGA future radar processing and exploitation acquisition efforts. This position calls for extensive R&D experience in automation/machine learning using SAR data, RF Systems, Moving Target Indicator (MTI), and cross-sensor integration, which is key to the Agency achieving its strategic goals and mission imperatives. Duties also include a wide variety of cross-agency collaborations and Community leadership in radar R&D. Other duties may include: \* Lead a Radar research team in completing multiple projects \* Determine and define project scope and objectives, involving all relevant stakeholders and ensuring technical feasibility. Manage execution of program/project cost/schedule/budget. \* Conceive of new start R&D activities and/or seedling concepts and seek internal/external funding sources. \* Maintain awareness of the state-of-the-art in radar technologies and communicate to leadership. \* Support requirements development, system verification, and concept of operations (CONOPS) development as well as working with system and mission analysts to ensure capabilities meet mission requirements \* Develop briefings and/or written reports that present complex issues and/or relevant analytic findings in an easily understandable way to a wide variety of audiences. \* Build and maintain professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective GEOINT capabilities. \* Disseminate research findings to the broader DoD/IC communities. \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically and operate in a dynamic, fast-paced environment. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated experience as a subject matter expert in Artificial Intelligence (AI) and or Machine Learning (ML) (such as in Automatic Target Recognition (ATR) for radar applications, RF systems, RF in contested environments, and/or Moving Target Indictor (AMTI or GMTI) 2. Demonstrated experience in seedling new start R&D efforts (including idea conception, authoring and/or pitching proposals, and/or proposal execution utilizing the Heilmeier criteria) 3. Demonstrated experience in program management and execution (such as planning, resource allocation, risk identification & mitigation, and/or identifying transition partners) 4. Demonstrated experience in building and fostering strategic relationships between the IC, DOD, civil agencies, and academia (such as to coordinate integration of research technologies) EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Engineering, Mathematics, Physical Science, Computer Science, or a related discipline that includes 24 semester (36 quarter) hours in Mathematics, Science and/or a related Engineering Science such as Dynamics, Electronics, Mechanics, and Properties of Materials. Such coursework includes, but is not limited to, Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Programming, Data Mining, Cybersecurity, Geographic Information Systems, Remote Sensing, or Statistics. Although not mandatory, coursework in differential and integral calculus is preferred. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework as listed in option A, plus experience that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals to 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Doctoral degree in STEM 2. 15+ years' experience in the mandatory requirements 3. 10+ years' experience in a fast-paced R&D environment supporting contracts and programs of size, scope, and complexity similar to those at NGA Research 4. Experience in High Performance/Cloud Computing

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $142,701 - $170,800 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $142,701.00 - $170,800.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Springfield, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,Data Analyst,$43k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate organizational methods and provide source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization
Evaluate internal systems for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Work directly with management and users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Define and implement data and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible or scalable across data sets (1.) Suggest design solutions (2.) To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements. (3.) To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage. (4.) To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.) To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.

Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in a related field and 2 years’ experience in Business Intelligence (BI) or Data Warehouses and 2 years’ experience working with SQL and Access. Four additional years of related experience will be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
3 years experience using analytics tools and languages R, Python, SAS, Oracle and SQL etc.
3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
US Citizen; no dual citizenship.
Minimum of a Secret Interim clearance to start (Day 1 requirement).
CompTIA Security+ certification required to start (Day 1 requirement).
Adept at using Access, Excel, Power Point and Word.
General Data Warehouse / Business Intelligence knowledge including data modeling and Key Performance Indicators (PKIs) preferably in the SAP Business Objects environment.
AWS experience highly desired

#ind#

CDO is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.4,"CDO Technologies Inc
3.4","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
10,Remote Data Engineer,$72k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Experience:
*Fully Remote** Must be US Citizen and able to obtain a TS/SCI
Develop standardized data architecture that includes data structure and transfer protocols to facilitate sensor integration and dynamically share information to improve situational awareness.
Develop a standardized architecture that supports a centralized data repository that advances all data analytics, and AIML capabilities enhance command and control decisions.
Design and build end-to-end data pipeline solutions (esp. streaming and batch processing, machine learning model training and updating).
Develop strategies for data acquisitions, archive recovery, and implementation of a database.
Define, design, and build dimensional databases.
Implements processes and systems to monitor data quality, ensuring production data is always accurate and available for key stakeholders and business processes that depend on it.
Writes unit/integration tests, contributes to engineering wiki, and documents work.
Performs data analysis required to troubleshoot data related issues and assist in the resolution of data issues.
Works closely with a team of frontend and backend engineers, product managers, and analysts.
Designs data integrations and data quality framework.
Works closely with all engineering teams to develop strategy for long term data platform architecture.

Qualifications / Skills:

SQL/MySQL/PostgreSQL
Microservice deployment, cloud certification (AWS architect)

Education, Experience, and Licensing Requirements:

BS or MS degree in Computer Science or a related technical field
2-4+ years of experience as a data engineer
U.S. Citizenship with ability to obtain government security clearance",3.7,"Edgesource Corporation
3.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
11,BUSINESS ANALYTICS CONSULTANT - FINANCE,$51k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Job Description
Type of Opportunity: Full Time
FTE: 1.000000
Exempt: Yes
Work Schedule: Days

Summary:
Support portfolio management of reporting/analytics solutions across the business units in the analytics organization. Identify business issues/problems, form hypotheses, plan and conduct interviews, whiteboard sessions & perform reporting/analysis to synthesize conclusions, transform them into recommendations and develop a solution. Lead and manage small cross functional team to implement, test and deploy the approved reporting/analytics solution in response to the business (clinical/operational/financial) needs. Identify reporting/analytics improvement opportunities and provide proactive, consultative strategic solutions. Responsible for mentoring junior analysts as well as coordinating various reporting/analytics initiatives with end business users. Support reporting/analytics projects prioritization and planning as well as cconduct due diligence concerning business implications of planned solutions.

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities:
Consultation and Communication:
Ability to collaborate and partner with management, project managers, and IT to develop, implement and manage reporting/analytics portfolio with the vision & goals of specific Hub/Spoke core teams
Effective communication skills across the organization and at different levels, strategic thinking and actions to influence key stakeholders and business decisions
Support day-to-day consultation to business users and participate and contribute cross-functional project teams
Work with business stakeholders to identify business needs and support creation of the use cases and user stories satisfying those needs
Project Management and Execution:
Coordinate with other departments across the AO such as IM governance & EDW and support conceptualization and development of reporting/analytical methodologies, solutions and initiatives
Aid in the development of project plans and strategies as well as execute assigned project plans to deliver solutions in a timely manner
Support collaboration on roadmaps, dependencies, and execution plans across analytical units and with applicable teams in the organization
Manage the intake requests across the business units; track and monitor the work to ensure critical milestones are met, identify and report/escalate risks to management appropriately; manage stakeholder relations
Obtain data, direct/execute reporting/analysis, perform interpretations and conclusions, and prepare recommendations.
Assist in determining business needs by effectively conducting fact-finding interviews and leveraging various tools and analytical methods and then summarize findings in a coherent manner to develop and propose appropriate solution
Conduct research studies that include collecting data from various sources, analyzing, trending and presenting the findings and recommendations to management
Support translation of business requirements and unstructured business issues into data analytic problems
Perform overall program evaluations (i.e., planning-implementation-completion/analysis-reporting) and other assessments such as change management assessments, workflow optimization assessments, etc.
Training and Guidance:
Manage and support teams to structure data and analysis to analyze issues and proactively identify improvement opportunities
Responsible for the work flow management of analysts and ensuring reliability, integrity, and timeliness of end products
Support coordination of training for analysts in core and expanded business department
Thought Leadership:
Support in development of presentations/publications/point-of-views with senior leadership within the AO
Contribute towards and assist senior leadership in developing a year-end value story to demonstrate value of the team and their contribution to progress towards the AOs and PHSs goals
Qualifications:

Preferred Qualifications:

Health Plan/Finance Experience
Strong Communicator
SAS/SQL Coding Experience

Other information:
SKILLS: Bachelors degree in a quantitative, business, or healthcare related subject. A Masters degree is highly preferred. Four or more years of combined experience in business intelligence, reporting and analytics preferably in a healthcare setting. Demonstrated project management skills as well as the ability to efficiently work and manage teams and resources. Experience working on complex analytical projects with diverse teams and developing data driven and outcome based initiatives to improve business decision making and operational efficiencies. Knowledge of health plan and delivery system operations, health care informatics, and healthcare benefits and terminology (e.g., care management). Understanding of operations in the Health Care industry and a strong acumen of business processes, including operations, delivery models and revenue models. Understanding of program evaluation life cycle, predictive modeling, data mining, and clinical best practices preferred. Content knowledge related to program outcomes evaluation, BI tools (e.g., BO), data visualizations tools (e.g., Tableau), statistical software such as SAS and Modeling techniques, as well as general health service research and outcomes reporting/analytics. Working knowledge of healthcare industry and healthcare information standards such as HL7, LOINC, FHIR, ICD 9/10 and CPT codes, industry standard groupers (e.g., ETGs, DRGs, DCGs, etc.) as well as of health care delivery system processes. Excellent written and oral communications is a MUST.

Competencies and skills:
Essential:
SKILL-Demonstrated ability to communicate effectively in person and via telephone with members, employer groups, brokers, physicians, and physician office staff using strong dialogue and customer service competencies.
SKILL-Written communication
Nonessential:
Analytics skills
SKILL-Decision Making
SKILL-Project management methods and tools in support of managing Scope, Time, Cost, Quality, Communication, Risk, and Procurement Management;
Benefits:

Benefits
Benefits are effective day-one (for .45 FTE and above) and include:

Competitive salaries
Full medical, dental and vision insurance
Flexible spending accounts (FSAs)
Free wellness programs
Paid time off (PTO)
Retirement plans, including matching employer contributions
Continuing education and career development opportunities
Life insurance and short/long term disability programs

About Us
Presbyterian Healthcare Services is a locally owned, not-for-profit healthcare system of nine hospitals, a statewide health plan and a growing multi-specialty medical group. Founded in New Mexico in 1908, it is the state's largest private employer with approximately 11,000 employees.

Presbyterian's story is really the story of the remarkable people who have chosen to work here. Starting with Reverend Cooper who began our journey in 1908, the hard work of thousands of physicians, employees, board members, and other volunteers brought Presbyterian from a tiny tuberculosis sanatorium to a statewide healthcare system, serving more than 700,000 New Mexicans.

We are part of New Mexico's history - and committed to its future. That is why we will continue to work just as hard and care just as deeply to serve New Mexico for years to come.

About New Mexico
New Mexico's unique blend of Spanish, Mexican and Native American influences contribute to a culturally rich lifestyle. Add in Albuquerque's International Balloon Fiesta, Los Alamos' nuclear scientists, Roswell's visitors from outer space, and Santa Fe's artists, and you get an eclectic mix of people, places and experiences that make this state great.

Cities in New Mexico are continually ranked among the nation's best places to work and live by Forbes magazine, Kiplinger's Personal Finance, and other corporate and government relocation managers like Worldwide ERC.

New Mexico offers endless recreational opportunities to explore, and enjoy an active lifestyle. Venture off the beaten path, challenge your body in the elements, or open yourself up to the expansive sky. From hiking, golfing and biking to skiing, snowboarding and boating, it's all available among our beautiful wonders of the west.

AA/EOE/VET/DISABLED. PHS is a drug-free and tobacco-free employer with smoke free campuses.

KM123",3.6,"Rev Hugh Cooper Admin Center
3.6","Albuquerque, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,1908,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
12,Data Engineer - AWS,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven experience working with AWS in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oRDS
oAWS DynamoDB, AWS SimpleDB
oAmazon Redshift
oAWS DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAWS Glue, AWS Data Pipeline
oAWS Data Pipeline, AWS Glue
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAmazon EMR
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
o AWS Kinesis Analytics, AWS Lambda
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAWS QuickSight
oAmazon Athena
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAWS S3
oAWS ElastiCache
oAWS CloudSearch
•Familiarity with security and security policies within AWS

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
13,Data Scientist,$72k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
14,Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work),$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Ph.D level Clinical Research Scientist (Social Work) at the Center for Child and Family Traumatic Stress (CCFTS) will support leadership through a research agenda and projects focused on individuals, children, and families. This published Ph.D Social Work Researcher will focus on traumatic stress, impact of race, mental health disparities within a multicultural context, and the promotion of social justice. The incumbent will work with federal and state grant funded research/projects and be a part of the department’s clinical practice with communities of color or other minorities. In coordination with the Vice President, Research Director, and key CCFTS leadership this position will assist with research direction. The Clinical Research Scientist may also have administrative and clinical care duties as assigned.

Qualifications:

EDUCATION:
Must possess a Ph.D. in Social Work with an emphasis on data, evaluation, and research.
EXPERIENCE:
 Must have demonstrated an active portfolio of funded research and leadership in the field.
 Must have at least five (5) years’ experience conducting research and publishing in a peer
reviewed journal.
 Must have at least one year of Supervisory or Management experience.",3.4,"Kennedy Krieger Institute
3.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
15,"Scientist, Formulation and Drug Product Development",$51k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are looking for a Scientist to join our Formulation and Drug Product Development team to design & develop the next-generation drug product presentations to advance Red Cell Therapeutic in the clinic. The candidate must be independent, goal oriented, technically competent and able to efficiently work across multiple projects.

We are searching for enthusiastic, innovative, and highly motivated individuals, with deep scientific background in cell engineering, cryobiology, and formulation development, who are comfortable working in a fast-paced entrepreneurial environment.
Responsibilities
Work cross functionally within Technical Operations to improve the RCT formulation and drug product presentation
Design and execute formulation, stability, and material compatibility studies to support regulatory filings
Understand project timelines and deliverables and plan/coordinate project work accordingly with departmental, functional, and external stakeholders
Serve as a technical mentor for junior staff.
Independently perform data analysis on complex data sets and/or assignments. Prepares summary reports and proper electronic notebook record keeping.
Communication of experimental plans and data to multiple cross-functional scientific teams
Support the continued protection, creation, and expansion of company’s intellectual property
This is a hands-on position requiring the execution of laboratory experiments
Qualifications & Education
PhD and 0-2 years relevant industry experience in biochemistry, biomedical engineering, or related pharmaceutical science; Or BS/MS and 8 years relevant industry experience.
Prior experience with formulation development for cryopreservation and/or lyophilization of cells
In depth knowledge of design of experiments methodology
Previous exposure to GMP manufacturing of cell therapy or biological products, or participation in technical transfer for clinical manufacturing is a plus
Understanding and experience with analytical methods such as flow cytometry, ELISA, and fluorescence microscopy
The ideal candidate is a fast learner with strong scientific curiosity, good interpersonal skills, and attention to detail.
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
16,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst:

Healthcare Retroactive Audits, Inc. is looking for a skilled data analyst to join our team. The data analyst will be responsible for identifying and recovering underpaid hospital claims received from Commercial (Third Party) insurance companies. We would like for someone that lives within the area and able to commute to our location within reasonable time.

Duties:

· Ability to understand Managed Care contracts and all types of fees schedules a plus.

· Ability to understand UB 04 and physician billing 1500 as well as revenue codes, bill types, CPT and HCPS a plus.

· Ability to analyze large sets of data.

· Monitor account status and follow-up, as needed, until payments are processed and recovered.

· Ability to compile data and report.

Requirements:

· AA Degree Minimum; BA Preferred.

· Adherence to all federal and state Patient Health Information (PHI) guidelines.

· Proficiency in Microsoft Office and SQL a must.

· Strong verbal and written communication skills.

· Ability to sit and review Medical claims for long period of time.

· Analytical and strong thinker.

· Adherence to ‘Standard’ office hours: Monday - Friday

· HIPPA compliance oriented.

. Health Care Experience a plus.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We take all the necessary precautions to keep our employees safe.

Location:
Doral, FL (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",1.5,"Healthcare Retroactive Audits, Inc
1.5","Doral, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
17,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"DEPARTMENT: Analytics
POSITION SUMMARY
NewDay USA is a leading nationwide lender focusing on providing financial solutions to American families. Our analytics team is currently seeking a data analyst to join our team on a full-time basis.
POSITION DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyzing business data
Summarizing different analysis results and presenting findings
Conducting business studies on demand
Managing existing reporting services as well as creating and automating ad-hoc reports
Operating enterprise-specific software
Troubleshooting regular dataflow functions
Running and optimizing day-to-day business functions
Managing projects and business accounts
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS
Education/Certification:
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, or related fields
Experience:
Strong analytical, business and problem solving skills
Experience with MS Office products
Expertise in MS Excel
Attention to detail
Efficient organizational skills and demonstrated follow-through on deliverables
Strong interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills
Prior operations experience within a financial firm is a plus
Experience with MS SQL Server database and/or the SQL language is a plus

Our Values:
Ship, Shipmate, Self
Training for a Career
World-Class Service
Providing Opportunity
Integrity
Resilience
Giving Back
Our Diversity:
We aim to foster a culture where individuals of all backgrounds feel confident in bringing their whole selves to work, feel included and their talents are nurtured, empowering them to contribute fully to our vision and goals. It is the policy of NewDay USA to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.
Benefits:
Health Insurance
401K
Competitive Salary
Uncapped Bonuses
Profit Sharing",3.8,"NewDay USA
3.8","Fulton, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
18,"Associate Scientist/Scientist, Analytical Development",$43k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rubius Therapeutics is a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company developing a new class of medicines called Red Cell Therapeutics™. Our proprietary RED PLATFORM® was designed to genetically engineer and culture Red Cell Therapeutics™ that are selective, potent and off-the-shelf allogeneic cellular therapies for the potential treatment of several diseases across multiple therapeutic areas. Our therapies can potentially be used to kill tumors in cancer and to regulate the immune system for the treatment of autoimmune diseases. We are currently enrolling patients in a Phase 1/2 clinical trial of RTX-240, an allogeneic cellular therapy for the treatment of patients with relapsed/refractory or locally advanced solid tumors or relapsed/refractory acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Additionally, we plan to file an IND for RTX-321 for the treatment of HPV-positive tumors by year-end.
We are proud of our passionate, high-performance culture – one based on a set of values that are the cornerstone of who we are and how we hold ourselves accountable. Founded in 2013, we are headquartered in Cambridge, MA, and our manufacturing facility in Smithfield, RI was named 2020 Top 5 Best Places to Work in Rhode Island among medium-sized companies by Providence Business News. We are currently expanding across all functions within the organization. Red blood cells are no longer just for carrying oxygen. Check us out at www.rubiustx.com, or follow us on Twitter and LinkedIn or like us on Facebook.

Summary
We are seeking an experienced and motivated Associate Scientist/Scientist for bioanalytical characterization to support RCT drug product development. This position will focus on developing analytical methods for characterizing cellular drug product and viral vector drug substance and identifying Quality Product Attributes, process-related and product-related impurities. The candidate will be responsible for experimental design, data analysis, technical reports and authoring CMC sections of the regulatory filings. The candidate will also represent Analytical development in the cross-functional CMC teams and drive analytical strategy and be accountable for project timelines. Expertise in developing and qualifying molecular and cellular biology assays is required. The ideal candidate will be a highly motivated individual who leads from the bench and enjoys having broad responsibilities and opportunities to work independently on various aspects of the cell therapy production platform.
Responsibilities
Independently develop and qualify analytical method to characterize RCT and to determine potency, purity, and stability for drug substances and/or drug products
Understands project timelines and deliverables and plans/coordinates project work accordingly with departmental, functional and external stakeholders
Provides technical leadership to project teams within area of expertise and commits resources to execute specific project tasks.
Maintain clear and complete experimental records. Present findings within department and cross functionally as necessary
Author, review and approve SOP and regulatory filing
Serves as a technical mentor for junior staff
Participate in the support of analytical activities at CMOs and CTOs for method qualification, data trending, troubleshooting, optimization, review and reporting
This is a hands-on position requiring execution of some laboratory experiments
Qualifications & Education
PhD and 0-2 years relevant industry experience in biochemistry, cell and molecular biology, or related pharmaceutical science and; Or BS/MS and 3-5 years relevant industry experience.
Extensive experiences in developing and executing cellular characterization assays and demonstrated expertise in one of the following areas –flow cytometry, ELISA, qPCR/ddPCR, and/or single cell characterization platforms.
Understanding and experience of analytical assay validation is a plus.
Previous exposure to GMP manufacturing of cell therapy or biological products, or participation in technical transfer of clinical processes to a CMO is a plus
Excellent laboratory, computer, documentation, and organization skills
The ideal candidate is a fast learner with strong scientific curiosity, good interpersonal skills, and attention to detail.
EEO Statement: Rubius Therapeutics is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know.
Recruitment & staffing agencies: Rubius Therapeutics does not accept agency resumes unless contacted directly by internal Rubius Talent Acquisition. Please do not forward resumes to our careers@rubiustx.com account, Rubius employees or any other company location; Rubius Therapeutics is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",3.7,"Rubius Therapeutics
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
19,Quantitative Analyst,$81k-$169k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview

We are seeking a Quantitative Analyst in our Evanston office to join the Systematic Investing team. The analyst will develop investment models for a multi-strategy fund, working within a variety of markets, instruments and strategies. The ideal candidate will have experience in empirical finance and other quantitative techniques such as factor modeling and portfolio optimization. The candidate needs to be a team player with excellent communication skills, and able to perform and excel in a fast-paced environment.

Qualifications
PhD or Masters in applied mathematics, quantitative finance, computer science, or related technical fields. 0-2 years of work experience is acceptable; 2-5 years of work experience is preferred.
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
Excellent mathematical and modeling skills
Broad statistical toolkit including machine learning, econometrics, and non-parametric methods
Experience with factor modeling and portfolio optimization
Experience with statistical techniques in empirical finance
Strong programming skills in languages such as Matlab, Python, C++, and C#.
Ability to work independently or as part of a team
Ability to work in a high functioning environment
About Us

Magnetar Capital is a leading alternative asset manager with $11.2 billion under management as of April 2020. We are conveniently headquartered in downtown Evanston, steps from public transportation and the lakefront. We operate substantial satellite offices in New York, London and Houston.

When you join Magnetar, you will work alongside individuals who are among the best in the business at what they do. We attract highly skilled, dedicated professionals who enjoy working across practices and executing innovative ideas.

Our culture is based on the core values of insight, integrity and passion. We have an intense level of intellectual curiosity, a profound passion for our work and care deeply about delivering results for the Firm and for each other. These qualities drive everything we do.

We seek to generate consistent performance across a variety of market conditions by identifying differentiated investment ideas that we believe can be developed into scalable businesses. We invest across three core pillars: Alternative Credit & Fixed Income, Energy & Infrastructure and Systematic Investing.

We know how important healthy choices are to our employees. We offer an onsite gym in our Evanston office (and subsidized memberships for other office locations), kitchens with healthy snacks, and health-conscious, catered lunches daily at no cost to our employees.

Magnetar employees are passionate about philanthropy and there are plenty of ways for employees to give back through the Magnetar Capital Foundation (a nonprofit focusing on increasing access to financial education programs in high-schools), organized volunteer efforts, and our company matching contributions program. Employees also receive one Community Day per year to volunteer at a cause of their choosing. To further enrich our work environment, we also organize extracurricular activities such as our running club and bowling teams as well as company-sponsored social events for employees and families.

We hope you’ll consider joining us as you explore careers at Magnetar!",3.7,"Magnetar Capital
3.7","Evanston, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
20,"Data Analyst, Sales Operations",-1,"About Us

Today's economy requires business owners to adapt quickly and think on their feet. ShopKeep's software-first commerce solutions make that possible.

Our cloud-based point of sale, payment processing, flexible hardware, and business-friendly financing let owners start, run, and grow their businesses in person and online. They can manage inventory, optimize staffing, streamline their operations, and market to their customers from one intuitive dashboard.

We understand what it's like to run a business, because we've been helping business owners succeed for over a decade, and we share their mindset. ShopKeep, after all, is also a small business, born to give our peers the tools they need to dream big, fight smart, and succeed on their own terms.

Today that mission is more relevant than ever, driven by team members around the world. ShopKeep is headquartered in New York City, with offices in Portland, Chicago, and Belfast. We're innovators, technologists, and customer advocates who are obsessed with helping independent businesses survive and thrive.

Job Description

The Sales Operations Specialist at ShopKeep will be responsible for working across teams to develop reports, implement process changes, and support our Sales Team with scheduling and training. This role requires flexibility to manage multiple priorities and proficiency in data modeling with big data. We want someone who embraces aggressive goals, works hard to achieve them, thrives in uncertainty and brings passion to their work.

In this role you will
Work closely with sales and company leadership to develop and maintain the operational infrastructure supporting goal setting, reporting, and automation of manual processes
Automate manual processes in order to increase efficiency and provide more time for analysis
Develop reporting for business leaders using Looker, Salesforce, and Excel
Work with company leadership to implement new technology and process changes
Develop intel on competitors and developments in the payments space
Work with finance on tracking and processing commission
Assist Marketing in developing tracking for campaigns and strategies to drive sales
What you'll need
Bachelor's Degree or relevant work experience in lieu of degree
1 - 2 years of experience working with large amounts of data, including building, managing and working with databases (SQL, redshift, etc) and using analytical tools (Looker, Tableau, OLAP tools, excel, etc)
Demonstrated problem solving skills
Strong attention to detail and able to effectively prioritize and manage multiple priorities
Advanced excel skills
Strong drive to succeed and ability to navigate ambiguity
Ability to learn quickly and thrive in a fast-paced changing environment
Experience working with APIs is a plus
Benefits

We provide the essentials…
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible PTO Policy
Commuter Benefits
401k Matching
...and the fun-damentals:
Catered Meals
Happy Hours
Beer Fridge
Stocked Snack Shelf
Hackathons
Still have energy to burn?
Meditation Sessions
Massage Therapy
Standing Desks
ShopKeep is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are an Equal Opportunities Employer. We don't discriminate based on gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, nationality, or any other individual characteristics. We practice equality of opportunity in employment and select the best person for the job.",3.5,"ShopKeep
3.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,Data Engineer,-1,"Why you'll love working here:

Zylotech is a fast-growing company that rewards autonomy and creativity. Our team works hard, is fast and collaborative, and we encourage personal growth. There are many opportunities to work with other departments where you can interact with some incredibly talented people.

What you’ll do:
Coordinate with Product management and technical stakeholders to continue building our SaaS product data + decision pipe
Perform architecture design, data modeling, and implementation of Big Data platform or Data pipe
Architect and develop big data solutions on either AWS or GCP cloud platforms
Set up and manage big data infrastructure to ingest and process data from multiple sources for Enterprise customer deployment
Create scalable & robust data pipelines to transfer data from source to destination data stores
Player and coach across a team of big data engineers, ML engineers, data scientist towards agile shipping of features and milestone
What we seek:
Prior experience in building, developing, architect scalable big data applications from grounds up preferably in product startups.
2+ years of experience in Data Engineering
Experience working with Big Data stack, Big Map Reduce, Hive, Kafka, Impala, Hadoop, Big Query, Spark SQL, Spark Streaming, HBase etc
Experience in Databases (NoSQL and SQL)
Experience in creating Data-warehouses and scheduling automated ETL jobs
Experience in Docker and Kubernetes
Good Communication Skill, both verbal & written. Confident in communicating with business & technical stakeholders alike.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in Computer Science or a related field of study.
Important Personal Attributes:
You are curious about technology & science.
Team matters.
Challenging yourself is an intrinsic part of who you are.
Sharing and debating ideas to get to the right answer is important to you.
You seek to act and don’t wait to be told.
You like to teach those around you.
You are serious about your work but also believe that laughter and levity are important.
You work hard and you also have passions outside of work that enrich your life.
Winning is important to you, but so is how you win.
You take pride & ownership in building a Product and company who is disrupting an industry.
About Zylotech:

Zylotech is a self-learning customer intelligence platform that helps marketers create complete customer profiles for targeting revenue opportunities more effectively. Powered by AutoML, the platform continuously unifies and enriches internal and external data, and performs ongoing micro-segmentation, pattern discovery, and recommendations, all while integrating with a variety of marketing clouds for on-demand accessibility. Zylotech’s cross-industry clients have reported up to a 6x increase in customer lift. For more information, visit Zylotech.com.

Zylotech is an equal employment opportunity employer and does not discriminate against any applicant because of race, creed, color, age, national origin, ancestry, religion, gender, sexual orientation, disability, genetic information, veteran status, military status, application for military service or any other class protected by state or federal law.

To all recruitment agencies: Zylotech does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Zylotech employees or any other company location. Zylotech is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered our property and will be processed accordingly.

Qualified Applicants must be legally authorized for employment in the United States. Qualified Applicants will not require employer-sponsored work authorization now or in the future for employment in the United States.",3.4,"Zylotech
3.4","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
22,Data Scientist,$59k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist, St. Louis, MO

***No c2c or sponsorship, must be our W2 employee***

Required Skills / Experience:

• MS in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field with at least 1 year of industry experience

• Strong code development experience with R and Python for 3+ year

• Strong object-oriented programming (OOP) and design experience

• Strong in SQL and experience with big data ecosystem

• Experience with coding best practices, version control and documentation

• Problem solver and analytical thinking

• Commitment to ensuring data quality and accuracy and attention to detail

• Strong business aptitude, the ability to rapidly learn new problem domains, and become conversant in the domain with subject matter experts.

• Strong organizational, interpersonal skills with proven ability to communicate complex qualitative analysis in clear, concise, and precise manner.

Desired Skills / Experience:

• PhD in computer science, machine learning, statistics, genetics, animal/plant breeding, or closely-related field

• Experience with AWS, docker and other automation tools

• Experience with workflow orchestration

• Knowledge of plant breeding and genomic prediction

• Experience with web development",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
23,Geodetic Earth Scientist,$41k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Geodetic Earth Scientists analyze the Earth's gravity and magnetic fields, geophysical structure, material properties, and dynamics for geospatial intelligence and DoD applications. They define and maintain the World Geodetic System (WGS), perform datum transformations between WGS 84 and local datums, and develop spatial and temporal models defining Earth systems. They provide in-depth technical expertise on geodetic and geophysical issues to customers and represent NGA in community forums establishing doctrine and policy.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: 1) NGA is hiring in support of NGA & USSPACECOM's national security missions. It is advertised as an Earth Scientist until a SPACE work role is developed. This position drives SPACE-based derivative requirements / application, & SPACE mission assurance. Contributions will solidify resiliency of national Positioning, Navigation & Timing (PNT). 2) This program lead oversees a team of scientists addressing Geodesy & Geophysics (G&G) challenges related to a PNT SPACE environment. Must have an advanced understanding of DoD/IC processes, activities, standards, & GEOINT operations. Must demonstrate familiarity with SPACE doctrine, strategy, domain & application of Geomatics to understand, prioritize & communicate architecture, production methods & reference systems. Will determine & define distinct deliverables required for specific projects & initiatives with clear alignment to DoD/IC requirements & familiarity with acquisition & Planning, Programming, & Budgeting Execution (PPBE) Process. 3) Must be fluent in DoD program management to define, plan, develop, implement, deliver & maintain alternative positional reference systems to support SPACE PNT beyond the current capabilities of the World Geodetic System (WGS) & associated models. Demonstrate experience in managing stakeholders, scope, budget, risk & schedule in successful delivery of complex geospatial related projects. Develop plans, schedules, project estimates, resource demands, & status reports. Adhere to quality standards & review project deliverables. Excellent written/verbal communication skills & exceptional emotional intelligence. Ability to influence/motivate people across a broad variety of job functions. 4) As senior program manager, will make recommendations to leadership/staff on strategic direction of the Program. Will collaborate with policy, research, product, engineering & operations teams to orchestrate end-to-end policies, practices, procedures & address information & capability gaps. Employ analytical, quantitative & data visualization skills to use data & metrics to back up assumptions, recommendations & drive program decisions. Engage with stakeholders to orchestrate projects, tailor expert advice & discussions to convey the proposed method, data, & results to a large non-technical audience. Provide recommendations on G&G issues to internal / external stakeholders & attend community forums as necessary. 5) Support team, program & cross-functional initiatives to continuously improve processes to increase effectiveness & provide suggestions for best practices. Superintend analysis, including the conceptualization, creation, delivery of new products, tools, services, platforms, & technical solutions & identify full lifecycle requirements. Manage acquisition / mission assurance for geospatial data supporting SPACE, studies potential applications of geomatics tradecraft, & methods / production in a SPACE-based environment. Embed feasibility, sustainability, interoperability, resiliency, situational awareness, contingency, security & readiness in program planning. 6) Experience managing enterprise level projects in the following areas or processes: reference frame transformations, geocentric / lunar-centric systems, developing methodologies, procedures & production in support of SPACE, navigation, & operations, Earth / SPACE-based collection systems, & mission assurance. 7) Desired credentials: Defense Acquisition Workforce Improvement Act (DAWIA) level III, Six Sigma and/or Project Management Professional (PMP) 8) Exhibit technical knowledge, enable healthy partnerships & balance between the mission & employee development. He/she establishes & maintains open / ongoing dialogue with team members, assists performance expectations for direct-report employees & establishes a team who upholds to NGA core values; Excellence, Accountability, Respect, Teamwork, Honesty. 9) Applicants currently with a Top Secret security clearance are desired but is not mandatory to apply for this position. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Previous experience extracting and analyzing information from various sources and briefing the results to an audience 2. Documented experience of problem identification, analysis and resolution 3. Experience working in groups to develop solutions to problems and deliver those solutions to a customer 4. Demonstrated experience in technical program management (Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Physics, Geophysics, Geodesy, Geosciences, or Orbital Mechanics) 5. Experience in Reference Frame Transformations and Coordinate Systems EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Astronomy, Cartography, Computer Science, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geology, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Meteorology, Orbital Mechanics, Photogrammetry, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Surveying. Coursework must include differential and integral calculus. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience in conducting work related to Civil Engineering, Geodesy, Geophysics, Geotechnical Analysis, Geodetic Surveying, or a related field that demonstrates the ability to successfully perform the duties associated with this work. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years. PHYSICAL REQUIREMENT: Distinguish principal colors and shades/hues of principal colors; Near visual acuity of 20/40 or better with or without corrective lenses; Far visual acuity of 20/60 or better binocular with or without corrective lenses

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Having achieved an advanced degree (Masters or Masters and PhD) in one or more of the following areas: Geodesy, Mathematics, Physical Science, or a related discipline that includes at least 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework in any combination of Applied Physics, Astronomy, Astrophysics, Astrodynamics, Engineering Science, Geodesy, Geodetic Astronomy, Geomatics, Geophysics, Mathematics, Orbital Mechanics, Physical Science, Physics, Remote Sensing, or Geodetic Surveying. Coursework would include differential equations and integral calculus. 2. Customer service principles; DoD organizational structure, mission, goals, and priorities; NGA organizational units' missions and functions; decision-making processes; experience and willingness to brief groups; performing scientific analysis; experience/knowledge of computer networking; knowledge of statistical analysis; recent experience in performing scientific analysis; and demonstrated ability to learn new technology. 3. Experience delivering strategic support; develop mission statements, vision statements, operational goals and objectives; integrate doctrine, strategy, concepts, and capability development; broker stakeholder interactions and participate in conferences, panels and policy forums. 4. Experience performing program oversight; anchor team activities in well-defined and traceable requirements; develop plans, manage budgets, schedules, risk and performance; track actions, identify milestones, construct and maintain roadmaps, and report progress; lead integration activities and matrix teams; experience and willingness to brief groups.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 05 $128,669 - $167,275 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $128,669.00 - $167,275.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
24,Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist,$98k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"20-Oct-2020

Job ID
305061BR
{""QuestionName"":""Job Description"",""AnswerValue"":""#1! That’s the ranking that Fast Company gave Novartis in their 2018 list of ‘The World’s Most Innovative Companies’. The Novartis Institutes for BioMedical Research (NIBR) is the innovation engine of Novartis. We collaborate across scientific and organizational boundaries, focusing on powerful new technologies that have the potential to help produce therapeutic breakthroughs for patients.

We seek a creative and collaborative data scientist to develop, evaluate, and apply novel methods of data integration of profiling data to enable translational research for drug discovery and development. In this role you will work at the cutting edge of science to tackle important challenges in biomedical research, assessing, integrating, curating, and mining complex data to drive biological/clinical insights.

Your responsibilities will include:

•Playing a key role in an interdisciplinary team of translational research/medical scientists, biologists and computational scientists
•Developing and employing novel approaches to derive and evaluate inferences across diverse data types to identify novel drug targets, biomarkers and therapeutic mechanisms in hepatology, nephrology and other areas of unmet medical need
•Interrogation of large molecular profiling datasets, including aptamer-based multiplex proteomics, to enable precision medicine
•Combining an understanding of biological sciences with computational techniques in statistics and mathematics
•Participating in alliances with external partners at top healthcare institutions, with the opportunity to publish your work

Posting Title
Computational Biologist / Bioinformatics Data Scientist",4.0,"Novartis
4.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
25,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Data Scientist

Full-Time, Days

Ascension Via Christi Health - Wichita, KS

Schedule: 8AM-5PM, Monday-Friday

Why Join Ascension?

Ascension Via Christi health has a rich history of serving the people of Kansas. Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, especially to those most in need. We provide care in 22 cities; and employ approximately 6,300 employees.

Working for Ascension is more than just a job. It’s a career where your talent and passion for delivering quality healthcare can make a difference for patients, team members, and the community. Ascension associates are leaders who follow their heart. We give, grow, connect and provide care; together as a team we are committed to our mission of serving the poor and vulnerable.

Our benefits and culture are two aspects of Via Christi that we feel set us apart. We offer tuition reimbursement that is available to both part-time and full-time associates in any position. In Wichita, we also offer child care for day shift workers through our Child Development Center. We also offer a unique program, Breaking Bread, that allows employees to join senior leaders for a meal and conversation about what is working well and ways we can work together to improve. It’s one small way we give employees a voice and work together to offer the best care possible for our patients.

Other reasons to join the Ascension Via Christi team include:
Medical, Dental, Vision, Retirement, PTO, and more!
Tuition Reimbursement
As a non-profit organization, we are a qualified employer for the Public Loan Forgiveness Program
Opportunities to impact your local community
What You Will Do

We are looking for someone who:
Has strong critical thinking skills, decisive judgment, and the ability to work with minimal supervision.
Is able to work in a stressful environment.
Has experience with complex data analysis and modeling.
Has experience designing, developing, and implementing data warehouse architecture.
Has competencies in data transformation and normalization.
Has expert level programming experience (SQL, Python) preferred.
Has the ability to research, interpret, clearly communicate, and apply researched information.
Has knowledge of medical terminology, claims, and coding a plus.
Responsibilities:
Integrates data from multiple sources and supports/performs complex statistical data analysis including multivariate statistical analysis, multilevel modeling, dyadic analysis and/or coarsened exact matching analysis.
Analyzes complex business and competitive issues and discerns the implications for systems support. Identifies, defines, directs and preforms project issue analysis to resolve issues, including analysis of technical and economic feasibility of proposed data solution.
Communicates highly technical information to numerous audiences, including senior management, the user community, and less experienced staff.
Presents data to drive business decisions.
Proposes and leads projects required to support the development of the organization's data infrastructure needs.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:

Required Credential(s):
None Required.
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Equal Employment Opportunity
Via Christi Health is an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Affirmative Action employer. Applicants receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or other legally protected status.
Please see the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf

Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension Health - VIA Christi participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Wichita, KS",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
26,Research Scientist/Senior Research Scientist - Surgery and Efficacy Study Directors,$107k-$224k (Glassdoor Est.),"For 70 years, Charles River employees have worked together to assist in the discovery, development and safe manufacture of new drug therapies. When you join our family, you will have a significant impact on the health and well-being of people across the globe. Whether your background is in life sciences, finance, IT, sales or another area, your skills will play an important role in the work we perform. In return, we’ll help you build a career that you can feel passionate about.

Job Summary

We are looking for an expereinced Research Scientist 1/Senior Research Scientist in our Study Directors - Drug Safety Evaluation department on the Surgery and Efficacy team located at our site in Mattawan, MI.

A Research Scientist 1 – Surgery and Efficacy serving as a study director (SD) is responsible for overseeing study conduct of preclinical efficacy and/or toxicology studies within the Surgery and Efficacy product line assigned by test facility management (TFM) within safety assessment; overseeing protocols/study plans; coordinating with technical teams for execution of studies, including establishing study schedules, verifying that standard operating procedures (SOPs) are available and adhered to, overseeing data recording and reporting, and verifying that regulatory requirements/expectations are met. The individual in this role interprets preclinical toxicity studies, evaluates and prepares reports from the data collected during these studies, communicates with sponsor representatives, and initiates contact with potential clients. May be involved with development of new technologies/procedures.

A Senior Research Scientist – Surgery and Efficacy serving as a study director (SD) is additionally an established key scientist in at least one area of expertise, evaluates and prepares reports from the data collected during these studies, communicates with sponsor representatives, and initiates contact with potential clients. Required to manage departmental and procedural projects contributing to company growth (scientific and capabilities).

The following are minimum requirements related to the Research Scientist 1 position:

· Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Toxicology or a related discipline; Master’s/PhD/PharmD/DVM/MD degree or equivalent preferred; with 2 or more years of related industry experience.

· Expereince working with cardiovascular and/or renal surgical models is preferred.

· An equivalent combination of education and experience may be accepted as a satisfactory substitute for the specific education and experience listed above.

· Success in this role requires familiarity with: study/project costs and impact of changes, local regulations and GLPs as they relate to primary area of focus, study process from proposal to report, quality assurance (QA)/quality control (QC) processes, IACUC process, the SD role in animal welfare, effective communication with veterinary staff and internal/external clients in a manner that generates confidence and builds trust, and communication with technical supervisor and Scientific Manager on issues of staffing and equipment.

· Strong communications skills, verbally and in writing at all levels inside and outside the organization.

· Basic familiarity with Microsoft Office Suite.

· Computer skills, commensurate with Essential Functions, including the ability to learn a validated system.

· Ability to work extended hours beyond normal work schedule to include, but not limited to

evenings, weekends, extended shifts, and/or extra shifts; sometimes on short notice.

· Ability to work under specific time constraints.

About Safety Assessment
Charles River is committed to helping our partners expedite their preclinical drug development with exceptional safety assessment services, state-of-the-art facilities and expert regulatory guidance. From individual specialty toxicology and IND enabling studies to tailored packages and total laboratory support, our deeply experienced team can design and execute programs that anticipate challenges and avoid roadblocks for a smooth, efficient journey to market. Each year approximately 300 investigational new drug (IND) programs are conducted in our Safety Assessment facilities.",3.3,"Charles River Laboratories
3.3","Mattawan, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1947,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
27,Scientist - Bioengineering and Assay Development,-1,"ArsenalBio’s mission is to develop efficacious and safe cellular therapies for patients with chronic diseases, initially cancer. Our products are being designed to herald the transition of adoptive cell therapy from a hospital based treatment to outpatient therapy, like most other cancer treatments. Our people are our greatest asset, they bring scientific talents in molecular biology, immunology, pharmacology, protein chemistry, computational biology, automation, genome engineering, software and other fields to make the future happen now.


We are seeking an outstanding Assay Development Scientist to join the Technology Development team. The successful candidate is expected to work effectively in cross-functional teams to drive the implementation of advanced immunological assays that are robust and scalable.
What You Will Do
Work with the Discovery and Technology Development teams to define, build, and scale-up advanced immunological assays such as cell killing, cytokine release, cell migration, cell persistence, and transcriptional profiling
Drive the design and implementation of scalable platforms for both 2D and 3D tumor modeling for use within the context of immuno-oncology
Support adoption of lab automation by the Discovery and Development teams
Perform other related duties as assigned and based on company needs
What You Will Bring
REQUIRED
Ph.D. in immunology, cell biology, molecular biology, bioengineering, or a related discipline with 3+ years developing novel assays and assay platforms
Proven ability to perform high-quality experiments using automation
Experience with culturing of mammalian cells in 3D contexts
Experience with at least one of: ELISA or other protein quantitation methods; multidimensional flow cytometry; advanced imaging; or genetically encoded readouts
Working knowledge of experimental design (DOE methodology), bench execution, process optimization, and statistical analysis of biological assays
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to work independently and in a multi-team environment, along with a can-do attitude to solve challenging problems in a fast-paced work environment

PREFERRED
Experience in drug screening, oncology, immunology, developmental biology, or similar applied fields
Strong understanding of complexities of the tumor microenvironment
Strong working knowledge of cellular screening technologies, assay development, molecular biology, high content imaging applications (especially confocal imaging), genomics, and NGS
Experience with single-cell technologies
Experience with large-scale data analytics: R or python, AWS, image processing

Plus
Experience in technology transfer, including process documentation, user training, performing IQ/OQ/PQ
Experience working with laboratory information management system and electronic lab notebook
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status

To all recruitment agencies: ArsenalBio does not accept agency resumes. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, or Arsenalbio employees. ArsenalBio is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.",5.0,"Arsenal Biosciences
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
28,Senior Data Engineer,-1,"About Narrativ

Narrativ is a technology platform for brands to unlock, manage, and grow their share of product reviews on the open web.

Why is this important? We've seen a decade's worth of e-commerce growth in 2020, and the emergence of a smarter consumer who demands a better way to buy than ads. They're turning to expert product reviews on trusted sources ranging from The New York Times to their favorite YouTuber. But only Amazon is reaping the benefits today, commanding a $40B monopoly on product reviews online.

Narrativ's patented technology empowers everyone to win. We build the tech and tools to turn honest reviews that tell the whole story about a product into a multibillion dollar acquisition channel for all brands. Teams at Sephora, Best Buy, L'Oreal and hundreds of others already partner with Narrativ to yield more efficient results than Facebook and Google.

Our work breaking Amazon's monopoly and fixing broken and out-of-stock links on the Internet has gotten us recognized by The World Economic Forum as a Technology Pioneer and by Fast Company as one of the best places to work for innovators.

Why you should work here:
We're growing, fast: Narrativ's platform hosts 50+ partners spending $20mm+ a year including Best Buy, L'Oreal, Sephora, Bed Bath & Beyond, Home Depot, Nordstrom, and Samsung. We've doubled revenue so far in 2020.
We have a talented team: We're a team of 50+ from places like Amazon, Facebook, Google, and Etsy with a female founder that's been awarded by the Financial Times, Forbes, and Inc. We're hiring quickly, with plans to double our team in the next year.
We're challenging the status quo: Breaking monopolies and diversifying industries is in our DNA. Come join us on our mission to democratize product recommendations for all and build a better internet for shoppers.
Come join us on our mission to build a better Internet for shoppers!

The Job:
A data engineer at Narrativ will build and scale a first-class data platform. You understand the history of batch and streaming big data systems, know when awk outperforms Hadoop map-reduce, and have spent a lot of time thinking about the best ways to handle schema drift. You care deeply about making scalable systems from simple, reliable, and correct building blocks. You can explain the advantages and disadvantages of a wide range of data structures depending on the desired use case. You can articulate when a general solution is good enough, and when a specialized solution is necessary.

You are Narrativ's Data Engineer

Mission
Build and maintain batch and streaming data systems
Enable scalability and observability for batch and realtime data streams
Collaborate and build tools so all engineers can easily ""do the right thing"" with regard to scalable batch and streaming data requirements.
Key Results
Merchant product feed can ingest datasets of 10M+
Create performant and straightforward patterns for OLTP, OLAP, streaming ingest and enrichment, creating search indexes, etc
Requirements
5+ years of experience with big data systems such as Hadoop, Spark, Flink, Kafka, Storm, Heron, NiFi, Hive, etc
Understanding of different serialization and storage formats like Avro, Parquet, Thrift, Protocol Buffers, FlatBuffers, JSON, CSV, XML
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL), non-relational (Redis, Cassandra/Scylla), and warehouses (Snowflake, Redshift, BigQuery
Experience with streaming data technologies and patterns
Experience with orchestration frameworks like Airflow, Oozie
Expertise in a general purpose programming language
Strong experience in SQL

Bonus
Expertise in Scala, Java, or Kotlin
Experience in Elixir
Working knowledge of probabilistic data structures and algorithms like count-min sketch, hyperloglog, bloom filters, reservoir sampling, etc
Important Notice: We are putting the health and safety of our employees first. For the balance of 2020, we'll be working from home. WIth so much uncertainty in the world, this is a decision that helped eliminate the anxiety associated with commuting and gave our teammates one less thing to worry about.

Narrativ is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace and is an affirmative action employer. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.",3.6,"Narrativ
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,Data Engineer - Azure,$93k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"sdg is a high performance software community. sdg consultants build and deliver custom software for some of the largest and most recognizable local and national brands. In this role you will be asked to leverage your current skills and learn new ones. Working in over 400 different technologies and continually learning together, you can expect a one-of-a-kind and award winning work experience.

If you have proven enterprise experience working with Microsoft Azure in a handful of the following, we want to hear from you.

•Design and development of relational and non-relational databases, data warehouses and data lakes
oAzure SQL DB, Azure DB for MySQL, Azure DB for PostgresSQL
oAzure Cosmos DB
oAzure Data Lake Storage, Azure Synapse Analytics
oAzure DB Migration Service
•Development, monitoring and maintenance of data integration and processing tools and pipelines
oAzure Data Factory
•Design and testing of machine learning and data science tools, including the building and deployment of data models
oAzure Databricks, Azure HDInsight
•Implementation of high-capacity, real-time data streaming technologies
oAzure Stream Analytics, Azure Data Lake Analytics
•Data analysis and visualization tools
oAzure PowerBI
oAzure Data Lake Analytics
•Leveraging non-database data storage alternatives to maximize performance, costs and data quality
oAzure Blob Storage
oAzure Cache for Redis
oAzure Search
•Familiarity with security and security policies within Azure

bonus experience

Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent work experience
Success working on high performance teams
Delivered solutions in large scale enterprise environments
Prior consulting or professional services experience
Motivated to continually improve your craft, sharing and learning every day
Exceptional integrity with the desire to create the best possible customer outcomes

what's in it for you?

Full-time salaried position with sdg, a 10-time Best Place to Work
Engaged teammates who care about quality solutions
Challenging and rewarding work with great customers
Abundant opportunities to give back to the community
A company proven to make decisions based on its core values
A true stake in success as sdg is an ESOP, 100% employee owned
Year-round technology and social events to stay sharp and have fun
Membership in the best technology community in the Twin Cities",4.9,"Solution Design Group
4.9","Golden Valley, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
30,Data Scientist,-1,"Back to search results
Previous job

Next job

JOB DESCRIPTION

A BIT ABOUT OUR DATA SCIENCE & ANALYTICS TEAM

Mars Petcare Data Science & Analytics team is core to our strategy. We’re using digital, data and customer insights to transform our business by finding answers to problems that we’ve often never asked ourselves before. Our vast data assets are being combined to build a 360° view of pets and pet owners to not only power Kinship’s businesses but also influence the next great ideas in the pet care space. This role will be key in helping us understand the power of our data, and how this translates into value for our company, our pets, and pet owners everywhere. Frequently the projects will be ambiguous, but that’s part of the fun; you will determine the best way to leverage our data to tell the right story for any given audience.

HOW YOU’LL CREATE A BETTER WORLD FOR PETS
Apply advanced analytics & data science approaches to understand and predict pet and pet owner behaviors
Collaborate with internal and external teams to ensure we focus on pet-centric product and service recommendations
Support new pet technology businesses and partners by generating actionable insights from our data assets
Develop compelling stories that provide insight into the drivers of business performance and pet/pet owner behavior
WHO WE NEED TO CHART THE FUTURE OF PET CARE

We strive to hire people who are passionate about our mission: Shaping the Future of Pet Care. For all of our Kinship roles, we look for candidates who exemplify our core values. We believe what we do is just as important as how we do it, and we aim to hire people who are:
Optimistic
Purposefully Inquisitive
Open to All
And for this role, we hope you have the following skills we require to knock it out of the dog park:
Truly inspired by, and want to live, our purpose of creating a better world for pets.
4+ years’ experience in a data science role handling varied and complex data
Varied technical experience in delivering statistical analytics, data science and insight on large-scale consumer data sets across multiple sectors, including packaged goods and retail
Hands-on experience with Python is required; Familiarity with PySpark is also desirable
Comfortable with ambiguity, with a passion for collaboration to achieve objectives
A Bachelor’s degree in quantitative field (economics, statistics, business, computer science) or equivalent experience
Passion for growing and strengthening a business using data driven approaches
Familiarity with cloud-based computing services e.g. AWS, Databricks, etc.
Enjoys explaining how technical concepts to both non-technical and technical stakeholders.
WHY JOIN US?

We offer our associates a unique opportunity to have a completely customizable career within pet care. Through Kinship you will work with and learn from a community of industry executives, pet partners, entrepreneurs, and fellow associates across our startup investment companies, outside partners, and in Mars Petcare. Our nimble and flexible approach to work allows you to make an immediate impact across businesses, while learning new skills at every stage. The diversity of our work opens doors to big opportunities and unlocks enormous potential for countless career experiences in pet care. Join us in our mission to chart the future of pet care, alongside the industry’s brightest minds.

Kinship’s offices are global, and so are our associates. We are located in NYC, San Francisco, Portland, London, Helsinki, Shanghai, and in Moscow. Many of us flex between our dog-friendly hubs and our home offices. Today, Kinship offers exceptional benefits for you, your family, and your pets, generous paid time off, exponential opportunities to build a career within pet care, and progressive reward packages. Interested? Let’s take big strides, together.",4.0,"Mars
4.0",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1911,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
31,"Data Scientist / Software Engineer, Planner",$111k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"Waymo is a self-driving technology company with a mission to make it safe and easy for people and things to get where they're going. Since our start as the Google Self-Driving Car Project in 2009, Waymo has been focused on building the World's Most Experienced Driver in hopes of improving the world's access to mobility while saving thousands of lives now lost to traffic crashes. Our Waymo Driver powers Waymo One, our autonomous ride-hailing service, as well as Waymo Via, our trucking and local delivery service. To date, Waymo has driven over 20 million miles autonomously on public roads across 25 U.S. cities and conducted over 15 billion miles of simulation testing.

The Planner Evaluation team is working on one of the most challenging problems in autonomous driving: building algorithms to assess the safety and quality of our self-driving cars at scale. Evaluation at scale is of paramount importance in solving autonomous driving: the algorithms we build orient the development of planner software by defining the north star and thus enabling rapid iteration. Almost every improvement to Waymo's planner is influenced by our work, indirectly (by providing the quality signals for onboard engineers to aim for) or directly (by incorporating our algorithms into our onboard motion planning code). This is no easy feat. As our self-driving car gets better and accumulates more miles, we need rigorous and intelligent methods to automatically assess whether a scene is risky, a maneuver causes discomfort, or an interaction with pedestrians or other drivers could be managed better. This can be done through geometric reasoning, simulation, machine learning, and/or modeling with statistical distributions. Developing evaluation algorithms in self-driving is an uncharted space and thus requires true ingenuity. If you are excited about leveraging a large volume of extremely rich data in an area with lots of unexplored territory to help the advent of self-driving technology, this is the place for you!

In this hybrid role, you will:
Develop signals to describe the quality of our self driving car's behavior, using a range of techniques including machine learning, statistics, math, and physics
Design creative uses of simulation to measure those signals
Work closely with statisticians, machine learning engineers, and roboticists to develop novel solutions to open problems
We'd like you to have:
MS in Computer Science, Robotics, Statistics, Physics, Math or another quantitative area
3 years of industry experience
Python especially for modeling and/or statistical computing
Experience with tools for manipulating big data
Experience with machine learning or large scale statistical analysis
Problem-oriented mindset instead of only a solutions-oriented approach
It's preferred if you have:
PhD in Computer Science, Robotics, Statistics, Physics, Math or another quantitative area
Comfort with writing production code in C++
Experience in robotics or with spatial data in another field",3.1,"Waymo
3.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,Unknown,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
32,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$49k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for turning data into knowledge, enabling business decisions.

Specific Duties Include:
Partnering with the user community to create new business intelligence, reporting and data analysis solutions.
Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements.
Build and maintain ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) and integration processes.
Validate data delivered to user community.
Ensure compliance with Protolabs data and software policies and procedures.
Monitor software systems to ensure reliability and accuracy of information loaded into the databases.
Maintain all documentation related to database objects, source systems, and operations.
Conduct complex, important work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgment.
Minimum Qualifications:
6+ years of experience working in software engineering
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with Domo
Experience with PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Service (SSRS)
Ability to work on multiple project concurrently
Ability to manage time effectively
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, collaborative environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous leadership experience preferred
Knowledge of document databases including Raven
Previous experience with Microsoft Dynamics AX
Previous experience with Salesforce
Software development in a continuous integration and continuous deployment environment
Proto Labs maintains ITAR-compliant operations in all of our United States based facilities. Due to ITAR regulations, this role is only open to U.S. Citizens, lawful permanent residents (green card holders) or foreign nationals granted refugee or asylee status. Individuals with temporary visas (e.g. E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, TN or OPT) are not eligible for hire in this role.

Proto Labs, Inc. is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer",3.8,"Protolabs
3.8","Maple Plain, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
33,Sr. Data Scientist - Model Governance,$101k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary:

The position plays a critical role in the oversight of predictive analytics and robust modeling at Elevate. The Sr. Data Scientist, Model Governance provides effective challenge, review, oversight, guidance, and ongoing monitoring for all models used within our Account Origination (Fraud, Risk and Response) and Account Management functions.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Review models and provide effective challenge and feedback to the developers to action change.
Manage a model review/validation program aligned to OCC 2011-12 / SR 11-7 guidelines.
Perform model stability monitoring to ensure ongoing performance for business applications.
Deliver model variable stability and performance reviews on determined cadence.
Write clear and detailed model documentation coordinating efforts with the model developers.
Work with other members of the Governance team to ensure all documentation is saved in the official repository and meets internal Credit Policy standards for all new and existing models.
Utilize advanced statistical software to validate linear/non-linear, parametric/non-parametric based predictive modeling/data mining analytic methodologies.
Creation of associated decks for presentation to executive management.
Present findings and make recommendations to Model and Risk Governance teams.
Act as liaison between partner banks / third party validators and Elevate.
Complete all other projects as assigned.
Experience and Education:
Minimum M.S./M.A. in a highly quantitative field (Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other quantitatively-oriented degree) or experience in a process related Senior Analyst role in an analytical capacity.
Strong quantitative /statistical modeling capabilities, including with 5+ years of experience in credit scoring and model development preferred.
3+ years’ experience in Risk Management or Model Governance functions including knowledge of OCC / FDIC regulations for model documentation.
3+ years’ experience within the consumer lending environment.
Strong SAS, R, and SQL skills preferred, with ability to conduct extensive data research required. Candidates with experience with other software such as Python, SPSS, MATLAB may also be considered.
Demonstrated experience working with large complex data sources.
Strong PowerPoint presentation skills a plus.
Required Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work in fast-paced environment with ever-changing demands.
Ability to manage multiple projects at one time, possibly including overseeing others projects.
Strong communication skills. Must be able to clearly communicate in speech and writing with Risk Management peers, Marketing, Operations, Collections, Finance, C-level Executives, CEO, and BOD.",3.7,"Elevate Credit
3.7","Addison, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
34,Marketing Data Analyst,$34k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Can you work in a relationship with other people where it requires ongoing flexibility?
Do you have an upbeat, positive attitude?
Do you take pride in knowing you are helping to make things happen?
If you can answer yes to these questions, Idaho Central Credit Union may have an opportunity ideally suited for you.
As a Marketing Data Analyst, your primary function is to interpret credit union data, analyze results and implement decisions based on the data. You will be responsible for turning data into information and insight that aids in campaign and business decisions. Also you will be responsible for performing a range of functions in support of market research, market assessment and campaign implementation.

Assist in managing technical aspects of key marketing systems (marketing automation, CRM, data warehouse) used to generate, distribute, and report.
Establish and maintain scalable processes that ensure best practices in campaign and lead management.
Create and maintain metrics reports on marketing and sales activities, effectiveness, and business impact.
Analyze marketing and sales data to develop insights and make recommendations on areas for optimization
Monitor and maintain data quality within the marketing database.
Evaluate new technologies and add-on applications to improve and optimize marketing team performance.
Manage membership targeting to strengthen relationships, prevent attrition, and increase profitability.
Leverage web and email engagement to create member insight and data to help improve individual experiences with our digital channels.
Generate and govern segmentation efforts by developing queries and custom reports, target groups, and campaigns for product and service performance.
Track all marketing campaigns and provide meaningful analysis and insight for future efforts.
Analyze consumer segments and other demographic information from the membership database to provide insight for product development, usage, and cross-sell opportunities.
Manage third-party vendor integration with marketing systems including Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Integrator MCIF, Encompass CRM and Microsoft Power BI.
Represent the Credit Union at community events as needed.

Bachelor’s Degree in Marketing, Mass Communication, Advertising or related field. 5-9 years of experience with database marketing required. Preferable experience with: Raddon Integrator MCIF, Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Microsoft Power BI, SQL, and data warehouse experience. Strong analytical skills. Proficiency in marketing automation systems and integrating those systems with other technologies. Technically capable, excellent communicator and a desire to improve processes. Math skills, Secondary-level computer knowledge including Microsoft Office, especially Excel and pivot tables, etc. Ability to maintain the confidentiality of Credit Union and member records at all times. A demonstrated cooperative and positive attitude toward members and other Credit Union staff. Professional in appearance, attendance, quality, and quantity of work performed. Ability to analyze member needs, develop, and coordinate marketing activities to fit member needs with Credit Union products and services. Must be willing to comply with the Bank Secrecy Act and USA Patriot Act as implemented by Idaho Central Credit Union. Team member will be asked to work extended/unique hours.
Perform tasks requiring manual dexterity (processing paperwork, filing, stapling, sorting, collating, typing, counting cash, etc.) Sit for extended periods of time. Lift 20-40 pounds of office supplies (copy paper, computer paper, mail, etc). Some heavy lifting may be required in order to execute proper event logistics. Repetitive motion using wrists, hands, and fingers. Reach keyboards. Ability to operate basic office machines (calculator, computer, telephone, copy machine, fax machine, etc).
Must be eligible for membership at Idaho Central Credit Union to obtain employment.
EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability
Idaho Central Credit Union is a dynamic financial institution that is focused on helping our members achieve financial success. Established in 1940 we have become the largest and fastest growing financial institution in the state of Idaho. ICCU was voted for large companies the Best Place to work in Idaho. We have also been named by S&P Global Market Intelligence as the top performing credit union in the nation. We are a talent based organization looking for talented individuals to help our members achieve financial success.",4.2,"Idaho Central Credit Union
4.2","Chubbuck, ID",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
35,"Scientist, Assay Development",-1,"POSITION SUMMARY:
This position is responsible for developing, coordinating, and providing assay support for preclinical, clinical candidates and other CMO projects coordinated by Process Development and Manufacturing. This position will also be responsible for developing and evaluating technology to characterize vaccine products (example: recombinant protein, virus or bacterial vaccines). This position also involves and coordinates the assay qualification, validation and tech transfer activities.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Responsible for developing physicochemical methodologies and analytical techniques including chromatography (HPLC - size exclusion, ion exchange), light scattering, solubility and viscosity measurements, spectroscopy (CD, fluorescence, UV/VIS, and FTIR), for quantifying purity/quality of proteins, peptides, VLPs, viral vectors.
Responsible for performing Peptide micro-array, ELISA, SDS-PAGE, Western blotting, qPCR, and RT-PCR and other gene/protein expression assays.
Responsible for developing or optimizing viral titer assays, TCID50, plaque, and focus assays for viral vectors.
Lead development of assays for physical and functional characteristics of recombinant protein, bacterial or viral vaccine formulations to support various phases of clinical manufacturing projects.
Coordinates and lead the development of release and potency assays for various vaccine platforms as needed.
Coordinate various projects and provide assay or analytical support for Process Development and Manufacturing.
Coordinates assay transfer activities as appropriate for internal or external projects.
Coordinate assay activities among Assay Development, Quality Control and Process Development groups for driving work to meet project deliverables as well as for cross-functional improvements.
Experienced in the principles of good record keeping for all the assay development processes.
Demonstrated ability to assemble data generated into technical reports, summaries, and/or graphic presentations.
Write, review, and edit SOPs.
Performs other duties as assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS:
PhD degree in Molecular Biology, Biochemistry, Biophysics or Pharmaceutical Chemistry discipline with a 3+ years in Assay/Analytical Development, Protein Characterization, Formulation development in vaccines in an industrial setting.
Hands-on and in-depth understanding of different recombinant protein physical and biochemical characterization and stabilization techniques.
Experience in technology transfer, assay qualification and assay validation
Experience in the design and screening various formulations for protein and virus to assess stability. Investigates, develops, optimizes, and implements new analytical assays.
Evidence of experience with cGMP, ICH testing guidelines and regulatory requirements for filing and registration of vaccine and/or biologics.
Evidence of effective communication, both verbally and written.
Demonstrate highly organized, analytical, accurate, and detail oriented capabilities.
Evidence of ability to prioritize assignments; time management and multitasking in a dynamic environment.
IDT offers a competitive compensation package to include major medical/dental/vision, group life insurance, STD/LTD plans, 401k plan with company match, and paid vacation, sick and holidays.
IDT Biologika Corporation is an Equal Opportunity Employer:
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status andwill not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",3.6,"IDT Biologika
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Unknown,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
36,Data Scientist BSLEF8,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings require the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel. Further, effective “big data” solutions help CBP ensure the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure.
In response to this challenge, E3/Sentinel, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified, and versatile data scientists to help lead the development and delivery of high-quality predictive modelling solutions. Successful applicants will serve as recognized subject matter experts in the application of quantitative methods, machine learning algorithms, and predictive models to address complex national and homeland security challenges. They will help our team to leverage large structured and unstructured datasets to develop and operationalize models, tools, and applications that drive optimized decision making. Project tasks include data collection, mining, data and text analytics, clustering analysis, pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification and categorization, and entity resolution to implement and enhance automated risk assessment. The products we develop provide actionable insight with real and immediate impact on the safety and security of the United States, its citizens, visitors, and economy.

Lead and perform hands-on analysis and modeling involving the creation of intervention hypotheses and experiments, assessment of data needs and available sources, determination of optimal analytical approaches, performance of exploratory data analysis, and feature generation (e.g., identification, derivation, aggregation).
Collaborate with mission stakeholders to define, frame, and scope mission challenges where big data interventions may offer important mitigations and develop robust project plans with key milestones, detailed deliverables, robust work tracking protocols, and risk mitigation strategies.
Demonstrate proficiency in extracting, cleaning, and transforming CBP transactional and mission data associated within an identified problem space to build predictive models as well as develop appropriate supporting documentation.
Leverage expert knowledge of a variety of statistical and machine learning techniques and methods to define and develop programming algorithms; train, evaluate, and deploy predictive analytics models that directly inform mission decisions.
Execute projects including those intended to identify patterns and/or anomalies in large datasets; perform automated text/data classification and categorization as well as entity recognition, resolution and extraction; and named entity matching.
Brief project management, technical design, and outcomes to both technical and non-technical audiences including senior government stakeholders throughout the model development/ project lifecycle through written as well as in-person reporting.

Bachelor’s Degree (required), Master’s or Ph.D. degree (preferred) in operations research, industrial engineering, mathematics, statistics, computer science/engineering, or other related technical fields with equivalent practical experience
Significant experience in developing machine learning models and applying advanced analytics solutions to solve complex business problems.
Proficiency with statistical software packages: SAS, SPSS Modeler, R, WEKA, or equivalent.
Experience with programming languages: R, Python, Scala, Java, SQL, or equivalent.
Experience constructing and executing queries to extract data in support of EDA and model development.
Experience with unsupervised and supervised machine learning techniques and methods.
Experience working with large-scale (e.g., terabyte and petabyte) unstructured and structured data sets and databases.
Experience performing data mining, analysis, and training set construction.
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with big data technologies (e.g., Hadoop, HIVE, HDFS, HBase, MapReduce, Spark, Kafka, Sqoop).
Proficiency with Unsupervised Machine Learning methods including Cluster Analysis (e.g., K-means, K-nearest Neighbor, Hierarchical, Deep Belief Networks, Principal Component Analysis), Segmentation, etc.
Proficiency with Supervised Machine Learning methods including Decision Trees, Support Vector Machines, Logistic Regression, Random/Rotation Forests, Categorization/Classification, Neural Nets, Bayesian Networks, etc.
Experience with pattern recognition and extraction, automated classification, categorization, and entity resolution (e.g., record linking, named-entity matching, deduplication/ disambiguation).
Experience working in a team and deploying solutions in an iterative or agile/DevOps continuous integration and delivery environment using lifecycle management methods and tools.
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI).

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,Risk Analytics Manager,-1,"Key Responsibilities

Develop and execute risk management and lead acquisition strategies inside the business rules / decision engine and help quality assure, roll out and monitor.
Validate and test risk management strategies. Evaluate statistical scoring, segmentation, and third-party products for effective risk mitigation solutions.
Work with cross functional teams to develop and execute on strategic initiatives.
Implement initiatives to ensure consistency and compliance with credit policies, and liaise with cross functional business counterparts to develop and implement risk strategies and third party platform integration.
Analyze credit risk and financial data to develop, test, and optimize risk factors related to credit policies.
Leverage analytics skills to perform risk, financial and data analysis including profiling, reconciliation, and quality testing.
Prepare risk reports for senior management that include analytics of risk, performance, emerging trends and opportunities.
Planning, designing and implementing an overall risk management process for the organization

Essential Functions:

Project Management: Oversee project lifecycle of data studies, new technology interrogation, or any other projects related to risk or analytics. Deliver written project plans to set expectations and gain strategic agreement. Interface with systems personnel for timely accurate implementation of underwriting solutions. Gather requirements for new or modified software systems enhancements and/or integration solutions. Conduct and analyze business and information technology processes and prepare essential groundwork. Make recommendations for necessary changes on projects that come from other departments.
Support: At as liaison to general counsel, marketing department, operations department, financial department, financial department, and individuals. Work with portfolio and merchant representatives to execute current and emerging business strategies. Interact internally to determine involvement, data requirements, and analysis. Research and evaluate new technology trends, data providers and analytics opportunities.
Leadership – Mentor junior level analysts of the Risk Management team. Ensure training/delivery of scheduled and ad-hoc data reports/studies and developing new effective methods to communicate significant risk information. Make recommendations for personnel actions and assist in day-to-day operations of group.
Insight – Maintain a thorough understanding of risk, operational, and management concepts to manage major portfolio risk factors. Investigate escalated incidences in reports for further review. Suggest possible risk management solutions, credit policy changes, and action plans. Turn business requirements into functional and technical specs for inclusion in the development process and in business planning. Define and develop business reports that support project assignments.

Skills:

Active Listening - Giving full attention to what other people are saying, taking time to understand the points being made, asking questions as appropriate, and not interrupting at inappropriate times.
Writing - Communicating effectively in writing as appropriate for the needs of the audience.
Speaking - Talking to others to convey information effectively.
Problem Solving – Identifies and resolves problems in a timely manner; Gather and analyzes information skillfully; Develops alternative solutions.
Project Management – Coordinates projects; communicates changes in progress; Completes projects on time.
Technical Skills – Pursues training and development opportunities; Shares expertise with others
Analytical – Synthesizes complex or diverse information; collects and researches data.
Critical Thinking - Using logic and reasoning to identify the strengths and weaknesses of alternative solutions, conclusions or approaches to problems.
Credit Scoring & Modeling - Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies
Reading Comprehension - Understanding written sentences and paragraphs in work related documents.
Social Perceptiveness - Being aware of others' reactions and understanding why they react as they do.
Understanding of predictive modeling and credit scoring methodologies

Attributes:

Oral Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in speaking so others will understand.
Oral Comprehension - The ability to listen to and understand information and ideas presented through spoken words and sentences.
Written Comprehension - The ability to read and understand information and ideas presented in writing.
Written Expression - The ability to communicate information and ideas in writing so others will understand.
Speech Clarity - The ability to speak clearly so others can understand you.
Speech Recognition - The ability to identify and understand the speech of another person.

Experience and Education:

Bachelor’s degree in economics, mathematics, statistics or related field
3+ years experience, risk and financial services
2 years’ experience in the risk management field, minimum

Computer Software/Hardware:

Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint
Access and Crystal Reporting
Outlook Exchange
Underwriting Software, Proficient in SQL, SAS, R or Python

Physical Requirements/Work Environment:

Must be able to stand and sit for long periods of time, talking, hearing constantly.
Occasionally lift up to 10 lbs. on occasion
Must be able to sit in front of computer monitor (s) daily
Sitting and or standing for long periods of time.
Noise level: moderate noise level daily in an office atmosphere.

Skills
Required
Technical knowledge & skills
Critical Thinking
Active Listening
Analytical",-1,"Cane Bay Partners VI, LLP/CBP","Christiansted, VI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
38,Senior Research Scientist – Security and Privacy,$77k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"If you want to be not just on the cutting edge of technology but creating the cutting edge of technology, Riverside Research is the place for you. We are searching for an individual to join our Trusted and Resilient Systems research group to help shape a more secure future. This position provides maximum flexibility in pushing forward new ideas, new technology, and ground-breaking research. The team has ongoing research in security of machine learning, cryptography, hardware and hypervisor security solutions, as well as developing cutting edge solutions to the security of open architecture systems. The ideal person for this position is interested in broad areas of technology and can leverage their interests to develop and study creative solutions to some of the most difficult challenges. The current team resides in Riverside Research’s Beavercreek, OH, but we are willing to consider candidates that would prefer to work out of one of our Washington DC (Centerville or Crystal City) offices, our New York City office, or our Boston office.

Job Responsibilities:
•Conduct independent research in the area of security and privacy
•Publish and present research in conferences and journals
•Mentor junior researchers and interns
•Work with the team to identify future areas of research investment and develop research plans
•Author technical proposals

Qualifications:
•Ability to obtain and maintain TS/SCI security clearance
•PhD in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or similar or Master's degree Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering with five plus years experience in research.
•Proficiency with software development and revision control (Git)
•Ability to work independently and with a team
•Superior written and verbal communications skills

Desired Qualifications:

•Demonstrated publication record
•Experience with DARPA, IARPA, and government funded research

IND1
CA
Riverside Research strives to be one of America’s premier providers of independent, trusted technical and scientific expertise. As we continue to add experienced, technically astute staff, we are looking for highly motivated, talented team members that can help our DoD and Intelligence Community (IC) customers continue delivery of world class programs. As a not-for-profit, technology-oriented Defense Company, we believe service to customers and support of our staff is our mission. Our goal is to serve as a destination company by providing an industry-leading, positive, and rewarding employee experience for all who join us. We aspire to be a valued partner to our customers and to earn their trust through our unwavering commitment to achieve timely, innovative, cost-effective and mission-focused solutions.

All positions at Riverside Research are subject to background investigations. Employment is contingent upon successful completion of a background investigation including criminal history and identity check.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-741.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified individuals on the basis of disability, and requires affirmative action by covered prime contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified individuals with disabilities.

This contractor and subcontractor shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR 60-300.5(a). This regulation prohibits discrimination against qualified protected veterans, and requires affirmative action by covered contractors and subcontractors to employ and advance in employment qualified protected veterans.",3.4,"Riverside Research
3.4","Beavercreek, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1967,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
39,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

MMIT is growing from the leading drug coverage data business into a comprehensive, integrated market access company serving pharmaceutical manufacturers, health insurers, PBMs and healthcare IT companies. Their suite of applications is designed to manage an ever-changing proprietary set of pharmacy and medical benefit information and to provide a structured view of complex market access information. By embedding their data and SaaS applications across healthcare, they help ensure transparency, consistency and informed prescription decisions across the MMIT Network. They partner with hundreds of payers and pharma manufacturers ensuring that their products continually capture and analyze coverage and restriction criteria for more than 98% covered lives.

Team Overview

The MMIT Product Management Team is charged with developing, growing and maintaining the MMIT product portfolio that smooth access to lifechanging therapies. This entails managing products through all phases of the product lifecycle, from concept to sunset. The product management team embraces a market-backed perspective, champions unmet client needs, and is committed to a highly accountable and collaborative Product Management approach.

Job Description

MMIT is seeking experienced Data Scientists to meaningful contributes to the growth and development of the MMIT product portfolio. Ideal candidates are comfortable working with large, complex data sets to help inform, simplify and actualize key product capabilities. They will have comfort collaborating with various stakeholders and navigating ambiguity with limited direction. They will dedicate themselves to understanding the MMIT product portfolio (both current capabilities and future product roadmaps) and key data dependencies to inform data models, architecture, and new product development.

To succeed in this role, you will apply your skillset to

· Inform, create and/or maintain master data hierarchy, attributes and structure.

· Bridge claims data and coverage data – Refine existing rules and create and continually improve new methods for accurately assigning pharmacy and medical claims volumes to MMIT controller entities

· Apply data science to the creation of short and long form geographic market and controller entity descriptive narratives (NLP / NLG)

· Translate product management strategy into actionable data science deliverables, guiding development of data models, business rules and other advanced analytical capabilities

· Excel at communicating across a broad set of cross-functional stakeholders.

· Work collaboratively with MMIT product and data teams to develop and/or commercialize analytics use cases that may include market access, coverage / lives, and RWE data

· Effectively partner with external organizations including clients and vendors to develop meaning and projectable analytics about trends in market access dynamics across payers, geographies, indications, drugs, etc.

· Identify and evaluate additional data sources that could be integrated in value enhancing ways.

· Build reports, dashboards and/or other analyses as needed and/or as specific initiatives arise.

· Support various commercial or commercialization efforts as needed.

· Take a leading role in developing data science as a discipline across product management, development and data operations.

Qualifications

Relevant Skills and Experiences

· Postgraduate degree or higher involving machine learning, statistics, or computer science

· Experience of statistical / machine learning projects in academia or commercial sector end to end with proven delivery capability including capturing requirements, designing analysis plans, interfacing with clients and report / manuscript writing

· Experience in applying Natural Language Processing and related AI capabilities.

· Experience working with large and complex healthcare datasets, preferably patient-level longitudinal data and experience with studies of treatment effectiveness/outcomes, disease progression, adherence, healthcare utilization, patient journey, sales targeting, prescription/procedure volumes/shares, provider networks and prescribing/treatment patterns, etc

· Strong related programming skills including experience with good coding practices and a thorough understanding of the data science package landscape. Familiarity with Tableau and PowerBI a plus.

· Familiarity with agile software development practices

· Excellent written and spoken communication skills, including ability to present technical concepts to lay audiences, write analysis plans for projects, contribute to proposals / grant applications, pitch ideas effectively and persuasively to clients / internal stakeholders, etc.

· Demonstrated ability to work both collaboratively to solve complex problems and individually to research/advance areas of interest and exploration

· Proven ability to develop meaningful/valuable analytic insights from multiple data sources and support value through commercialization

Preferred candidates may also have

· Experience supporting or launching Data and Analytics or SaaS-based enterprise product

· Experience in managed markets and pharma market access ecosystem

· Experience in the commercial health insurance industry

· Knowledge of payer marketing, drug development lifecycle and drug launch process

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Position will be based in Livingston NJ or Yardley PA

(highly qualified remote applicants will be considered)

Travel Requirements:

Approximately <10>",3.8,"MMIT
3.8","Yardley, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
40,Data Scientist,$54k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientists develop and apply methods to identify, collect, process, and analyze large volumes of data to build and enhance products, processes, and systems. They conduct data mining and retrieval, and apply statistical and mathematical analyses to identify trends, solve analytical problems, optimize performance, and gather intelligence. They visualize information using a range of tools (e.g., GIS, R), develop scripts and algorithms, create explanatory and predictive models, and conduct comparative analyses to address complex problems.

Additional Job Information
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION: The National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency (NGA) serves as the world leader in providing timely, relevant, accurate and actionable geospatial intelligence (GEOINT). NGA's civilian, military and contract personnel evaluate imagery, maps, charts, multiple layers of foundation data - such as terrain, elevation and gravity - and the full spectrum of visible and invisible light in order to help users visualize what is happening at a particular place and time. Our intelligence officers go beyond describing 'what, where and when' to revealing 'how and why.' Our work enables decision advantage for our policymakers, warfighters, intelligence professionals and first responders. Data Scientists apply the application of programming, statistics and visualization to glean insights from large and disparate data sources. Data Scientists understand and utilize aspects of machine learning to solve and automate classification, regression, cluster analysis, anomaly detection, association discovery, and topic modeling tasks. Data Scientists understand and utilize solutions with predictive patterns from data into practical, intelligent applications that anyone can use. They can utilize rich toolsets to help users create, rapidly experiment, fully automate, and manage machine learning workflows to power intelligent applications. They produce intelligence using geospatial methodologies and spatio-temporal data derived from imagery, intelligence databases, and other classified and unclassified sources in support of national security. They are intelligence analysts who use their understanding of geographic information science and technology, spatial thinking, remote sensing, intelligence issues, spatial relationships and visualization techniques and the social and physical sciences to create information, characterize events, and discover relationships and trends. They produce descriptive and predictive analyses and communicate findings as written, visual, and/or oral geospatial intelligence. Other duties may include: \* Develop and apply quantitative and qualitative analytic methods to identify, collect, process, and analyze large data sets for specified purposes; \* Identify trends, solves analytical problems, optimizes performance, and develop results through appropriate data analysis techniques (e.g., data mining and retrieval); \* Use applied statistics, build algorithms, and collaborating with domain experts to analyze large volumes of data to build and enhance products, processes, and systems \* Possess the ability to think tactically and strategically; operate in a dynamic environment; and deliver interoperable corporate solutions. \* They will have extensive experience in building and maintaining geodatabases and integrating and managing foundation, intelligence, and multi-INT data into structured geodatabases. \* Seek out spatial data from classified and unclassified sources and utilize existing tools or develop methods to tie spatial information to datasets where necessary. \* Builds and maintains professional relationships with other NGA offices and external partners to collaborate on effective data management, data dissemination, and online on-demand practices \* Conduct data mining and retrieval and apply statistical and mathematical analysis to identify trends, solve analytic problems, optimize performance, and gather intelligence. \* Develop scripts and algorithms (e.g. Python), create explanatory and predictive models and conduct comparative analyses to address complex military and intelligence problems. \* Support the visualization of information using a range of tools (e.g. Tableau, R, and ESRI Arc-GIS 10.4 suite, including model builder). \* Provide excellent customer support and interact with analytic units in a professional manner to help understand their challenges, incorporate their feedback, and provide quality solutions. Additional Application Requirement: You may be asked to complete one or more assessments in addition to the application you submit on this website as part of your application to NGA. These assessments may include but are not limited to: 1) Online questionnaires or assessments that require you to describe your job-related knowledge, skills, abilities, or other characteristics that are aligned with the mandatory and desirable qualifications of this job posting. The information you provide in the application you submit must support the response you provide to this questionnaire. You will receive an email to describe any additional assessments required. Please monitor your emails and complete any required assessments as soon as possible.

Mandatory Qualifications
MANDATORY QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: For this particular job, applicants must meet all competencies reflected under the Mandatory Qualification Criteria to include education (if required). Online applications must demonstrate qualification by providing specific examples and associated results, in response to the announcement's mandatory criteria specified in this vacancy announcement: 1. Demonstrated proficiency in applied programming and/or manipulation of data with a programing language such as Python, R, SQL or Java. (others languages will be considered). 2. Demonstrated experience developing and deploying automated processes to identify, collect, process, and analyze large data sets. 3. Demonstrated expertise with the use of data visualizations for exploratory comparative analysis by way of scripts, algorithms, and/or predictive models. 4. Demonstrated experience cleaning, filtering, transforming data, and/or enriching data. EDUCATION REQUIREMENT: A. Education: Bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in Mathematics, Data Science, Geographic Information Science, Information Science, Informatics and Computing, Information Science, or degree that provided at least 6 semester hours in statistics, and 9 additional semester hours in one or more of the following: physical or biological sciences, medicine, education, or engineering; or in the social sciences including demography, history, economics, social welfare, geography, international relations, social or cultural anthropology, health sociology, political science, public administration, psychology, etc. Credit toward meeting statistical course requirements should be given for courses in which 50 percent of the course content appears to be statistical methods, e.g., courses that included studies in research methods in psychology or economics such as tests and measurements or business cycles, or courses in methods of processing mass statistical data such as tabulating methods or electronic data processing. -OR- B. Combination of Education and Experience: A minimum of 24 semester (36 quarter) hours of coursework in any area listed in option A, plus experience that should have included a full range of professional statistical work such as: (a) intermediate and/or advanced statistics, (b) linear, semi-linear, and/or non-linear models, (c) working with a range of data types and statistical methods, or (d) data visualization capabilities. As a rule, every 30 semester (45 quarter) hours of coursework is equivalent to one year of experience. Candidates should show that their combination of education and experience totals 4 years.

Highly Desired Qualifications
QUALIFICATION CRITERIA: In addition to the mandatory qualifications, experience in the following is desired: 1. Experience as a proven innovator and strategic problem solver. 2. Ability to communicate technically complex methods and solutions to non-technical audiences verbally or in writing. 3. Familiarity working with DoD analysts, such as geospatial and/or imagery analyst. 4. Familiarity with cloud services as applied in the DoD and IC. 5. Demonstrated expertise with visualization techniques and software tools (i.e. Tableau, matplotlib, etc.). 6. Experience applying analytic techniques such as classification, regression, similarity matching, clustering, co-occurrence grouping, profiling, link prediction, data reduction, and causal modeling.

Additional Job Requirements
You must be able to obtain and retain a Top Secret security clearance with access to Sensitive Compartmented Information. In addition, you are subject to a Counterintelligence Polygraph examination in order to maintain access to Top Secret information. All employees are subject to a periodic examination on a random basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Refusal to take the examination may result in denial of access to Top Secret information, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs. Employees with SCI access and who are under NGA cognizance are required to submit a Security Financial Disclosure Report, SF-714, on an annual basis in order to determine continued eligibility. Failure to comply may negatively impact continued access to Top Secret information, Information Systems, SAP, and/or unescorted access to SCIFs.

Pay, Benefits, & Work Schedule
PROMOTION OPPORTUNITY: Promotion opportunities allow applicants at all band levels to be considered. Qualifications for NGA positions do not include specific time-in-band requirements. NGA will emphasize quality of experience, rather than duration, and assess how the quality of the experience demonstrates possession of the knowledge, skills, abilities, and competencies necessary for successful job performance in the NGA occupational structure. Band 03 $64,948 - $133,465 PERMANENT CHANGE IN STATION: PCS expenses are not authorized. Pay is only part of the compensation you will earn working for the Federal Government. We offer a broad array of benefits programs and family friendly flexibilities to meet the needs of you and your family. For more information on the array of benefits programs, please visit https://www.intelligencecareers.gov/nga/ngabenefits.html

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $64,948.00 - $133,465.00 per year

Schedule:
Day shift",3.9,"National Geospatial-Intelligence Agency
3.9","Saint Louis, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Government,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
41,Data Scientist - DAB,$83k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Rare Disease Early Diagnosis

Rare Disease Early Diagnosis - Accelerate rare disease patient early diagnosis through best-in-class enterprise-level advanced analytics and digital tools leveraging key external partnerships.

We will help patients discover what’s wrong with them sooner and bring them out of the unknown and into the right treatment faster. We will bring relief by helping them discover what is wrong with them at the earliest time possible.

Although there have been advances over recent years, awareness and diagnosis of rare and chronic diseases continue to lag. It can still take up to 10 years to get a diagnosis.

We will explore emerging technologies and establish partnerships with great minds within Takeda and across the healthcare industry to reduce that time for diagnosis.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Independently perform complex analysis using modern Data Science techniques against structured or unstructured data and report results back to generate insights to Takeda.
Apply machine learning, deep learning and other advanced techniques while performing Data Analysis engagements. This is against structured and un-structured data sets, at small and large scale.
Provide mentorship to other Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Data Specialists across R&D and Vaccine at Takeda as we elevate our data IQ across the organization. This will include coordination of Internal and External collaborations.
Deliver critical analysis against Takeda’s toughest data problems to give us critical insight to the organization’s largest questions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Perform machine learning, deep learning and other advanced data techniques at a level of quality that can be defended by peers at a PHD level across the organizations.
Introduce novel and state-of-the-art computational techniques to other teams and scientists to improve capabilities for data analysis with the purpose of deriving high accuracy insight from available datasets more efficiently.
Understanding and usage of different Supervised and Unsupervised learning techniques, their biases, how and when to apply them and which methods are the best for a particular analysis.
Ability to wrangle raw data sets into a format that can have advanced methods applied against the resulting data.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology and data problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other technical organizations throughout the company

CORE ELEMENTS RELATED TO THIS ROLE

Provide leadership and expertise to best construct data and execute analysis for feature detection, retrospective and predictive modelling, within a complex R&D and Vaccines environment.
Understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Re-enforcement learning and other techniques to be able to use and teach these methods inside the organization.
Ability to stay up to speed on modern data techniques, understand how to apply them and constantly demonstrated how and where to apply these new methods.
Ability to produce analysis for and defend results to PhD and executive level audience across the organizations
Design, Execute, QC and Deliver Data Science Analysis independently and effectively across the organization

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Master’s Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science or equivalent
3+ years’ experience or a PhD and relevant project / coursework
Expertise with the Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies
Experience with Spark
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables
Experience with two of the following languages: Python, R, Java or Scala
Experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, MX Net
Working knowledge of SQL and NoSQL datastores
Experience in a scientific environment

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
42,Staff Data Scientist I,$127k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist – Machine Learning & Real-Time Decision Processing (Remote, US)

Valassis is a leader in online advertising technology. We process over 12 trillion calculations daily to analyze and decide on more than 110 billion digital ad requests. As a Data Scientist at Valassis your work is central to keeping us at the forefront of the AdTech industry.

We are seeking data experts who are passionate about using cutting edge technology and data science methods to solve unique and complex problems. The ideal candidate is innately curious about how data can be used to tell a story and inform decisions. You have honed your skills through a combination of education, work experience, and hobbies. You are excited about the complexity and challenges of creating intelligent, high performance systems while working with a highly experienced and driven data science team.

If this describes you, we are interested. You can be an integral part of a cross-disciplinary team working on highly visible projects that improve performance and grow the intelligence in our product suite. Our day to day work is performed in a progressive, high-tech workspace where we focus on a friendly, collaborative and fulfilling environment.

On any given day you’ll be…
Using geo location data to track foot traffic, commercial visitation and next most likely visit to understand consumer physical behavior.
Using online behavior data to determine the primary interest categories of consumers and the web properties they visit.
Implementing a predictive model to determine whether a person is likely to visit a car dealership based on the advertising signals they’ve received.
Monitoring & improving a system that deploys and refits 10’s of thousands of models daily.
Developing algorithms to optimize the setting of every lever in a high throughput real-time decision system.
Analyzing data to better understand how a neighborhood’s consumption of web pages correlates with visits to a local big box store.
Finding the handful of outliers in billions of transactions.
Deriving a set of new features that will help better understand the interplay between geography and audience features to improve model performance.
Building new products with applied AI and bring them to market.
Participating in planning, roadmap, and architecture discussions to help evolve our AI processes to improve revenue-generating products.
Our ideal candidate will likely have…
The professional experience and desire to perform responsibilities similar to those listed above
An advanced degree in a relevant, quantitative field or equivalent experience working with Big Data and Spark in a professional setting
Ability to grow and ultimately mentor team members of varying experience levels and competencies through data science, product and software development life cycles
WHO WE ARE
Valassis is a leading digital marketing intelligence company, providing a best-in-class data management platform and online and offline targeting capabilities that fuel superior display advertising and media offerings. Through proprietary technology and the Valassis Digital Consumer Graph™, we power the lifecycle of marketing campaigns – from planning to activation and measurement. In fact, 19 of 20 leading brands work with Valassis to drive better campaign performance.

WHAT'S IN IT FOR YOU?
Valassis has a generous total rewards benefits package that includes medical, dental and vision coverage, 401k and PTO allowance. A wide variety of additional benefits like life insurance, employee assistance and pet insurance are also available; not to mention smart and friendly coworkers!

Valassis is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Applicants who have disabilities may request that accommodations be made in order to complete the selection process.

EEO is the law. To review your rights under Equal Employment Opportunity please visit: www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.

#LI-JM1",3.4,"Valassis
3.4","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Celluar High-throughput Screening Scientist,-1,"Job Description: *
· Routine handling and preparation of cell cultures in preparation for automated high throughput screening operations

· Preparation of reagents related to the high throughput screening setup and takedown

· Interact closely with automation specialists to initiate and complete screening runs

· Analyzing QC/QA data with the ability to recognize and adjust conditions quickly as needed
Qualifications: *
· BS in Biology or a related field with 1-3 years of experience or MS with 0-1 years of experience in cell culture and automated cell-based assays.

· Should be highly detail-oriented and flexible, with proficiency in general computer skills, as well as a high accountability and ownership for projects.

· Must be self-motivating, have excellent interpersonal and communication skills, be able to multi-task, be highly organized, have the ability to work in a multifunctional team setting, and adhere to specific timelines and deadlines.

· Ability and desire to master new skills, methods and technologies in a technology-enabled environment are very important.

· Ability to work well with all team members, have a positive customer service focus, and be reliable is essential for the position. 09212020

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Spectrix Analytical Services, LLC
4.0","Princeton, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Contract,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
44,MicroStrategy Business Intelligence Analyst,$73k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Headquartered in Modesto, CA, G3 Enterprises has been supplying the wine and spirits industry for over 50 years. As a single source packaging solution, its products and services include labels, stock and custom closures, warehousing, transportation, bottle etching, and mobile bottling.

The Business Intelligence Analyst creates reporting and analytical solutions that enable translating data into knowledge and maintains MicroStrategy infrastructure across G3 organization. Analyzes business intelligence data to inform business decisions. Partners with other areas of the business to model the outcome of implementing potential business strategies.

Essential Functions
• Utilizes data architecture to enable business decisions and recommend technical solutions to management based on scalability and complexity.
• Provides guidance and analytical support to include analysis and research in areas across G3 corporation.
• Satisfies ad-hoc requests for information from G3 teams that aid in uncovering new understandings that drive decisions which move the organization forward.
• Acts as technical expert, addressing infrastructure needs, systems/applications integration, compatibility, and multiple platforms.
• Analyzes data to create and maintain reports, dashboards, visualizations, and other tools (such as cubes and views) in multiple development and production environments.
• Responsible for executing the implementation of the BI strategy related to G3’s SAP ERP and OTM systems.
• Sources data from various systems via Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) and external data sources.
• Designs user driven analytics structure using existing data architecture.
• Influences data warehousing teams to recommend data layer structures and integrate systems.
• Translates business requirements to functional and technical design solutions, specifications, and prototypes.
• Collaborates with development teams to design business intelligence solutions to facilitate data gathering, storage, and retrieval.
• Consults with users or decision makers to identify data sources, required data elements, or data validation standards.
• Develops test plans and facilitates testing prior to promotions.
• Creates and maintains technical documentation
• Performs cross-functional analysis and collaborates with stakeholders across departments. Partners and presents findings to senior leadership.
• Responsible for understanding and complying with applicable quality, environmental and safety regulatory considerations. If accountable for the work of others, responsible for ensuring their understanding and compliance.

Qualifications
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Minimum Qualifications
• Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, Data Analytics, Data Science, or Engineering plus 3 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management; OR High School diploma or State-issued equivalency certificate plus 7 years of experience in business intelligence, technical architecture, application development, middleware, or database management.
• Ability to build and understand basic SQL queries.

Preferred Qualifications
• Master’s degree in Computer Science, Operations Research, Business Administration, MIS, Mathematics, or Engineering.
• MicroStrategy Intelligence Server Development experience.
• Experience designing and executing Application objects and Schema objects using MicroStrategy Desktop.
• Experience analysis, design, development, testing, and debugging of complex reports, ETL scripts and dashboards.
• Experience troubleshooting high level issues to identify and resolve problems caused by the database, source data, ETL, or the Business Intelligence software (common examples: nulls in data causing joins to function incorrectly; ETLs running out of sequence; MicroStrategy Objects not set up properly).
• Experience with cloud computing and “big data” processing and analytics.
• Understanding of web servers and applications.
• Knowledge of components of an enterprise systems architecture
• Knowledge of business process re-engineering processes including Lean Six Sigma principles.
• Lean Six Sigma Green or Black Belt Certified.
• Strong understanding of network architecture and application development methodologies
• Experience reading, analyzing, and interpreting common scientific and technical journals and financial reports.
• Knowledge of emerging technologies and development platforms.
• Experience applying machine learning or artificial intelligence to BI applications.
• Possesses a passion for technology and its impact on the enterprise, customers and consumers along with a breadth of experience that can balance business, application and operational requirements.
• Strong understanding of systems and “systems thinking” with the ability to make trade-off decisions to accomplish system-wide goals.
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
• Excellent planning and organizational skills.
• Skilled in balancing long-term and short-term goals and perspectives of challenging situations.
• Skilled in applying multiple technical solutions to business problems.
• Remains unbiased toward any specific technology or vendor choice.
• Excellent analytical and technical skills.
• Skilled in navigating complex political situations to ensure successful change management.
• Exceptional interpersonal skills, including teamwork, facilitation and negotiation.
• Demonstrates strong technical thinking and developed high credibility with the technical community. Recognized by the IT community as someone who solves complex technology related business problems.
• Experience with performance tuning of business intelligence applications.
• Strong knowledge of SQL queries including writing, reading, and debugging.
• Experience working with Enterprise Data Warehousing, specifically SAP Data Warehousing (HANA).

Physical Demands
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk.

Work Environment
The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

EEO/AA M/F/Vet/Disability",3.9,"G3 Enterprises
3.9","Modesto, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
45,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
46,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.7,"Summa Health System
3.7","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
47,Data Scientist,$93k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"AIS has a workshare opportunity for a Data Scientist (TS/FSPOLY required) on a large, newly awarded contract. In this role you will develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of datasets; prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Produce data visualizations that provide insight into dataset structure and meaning
Work with subject matters experts (SMEs) to identify important information in raw data and
develop scripts that extract this information from a variety of data formats (e.g., SQL tables, structured metadata, network logs)
Incorporate SME input into feature vectors suitable for analytic development and testing
Translate customer qualitative analysis process and goals into quantitative formulations that are coded into software prototypes
Develop and implement statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive,
predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Develop experiments to collect data or models to simulate data when required data are unavailable
Develop feature vectors for input into machine learning algorithms
Identify the most appropriate algorithm for a given dataset and tune input and model parameters
Evaluate and validate the performance of analytics using standard techniques and metrics (e.g.cross-validation, ROC curves, confusion matrices)
Required Education, Experience and Skills
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline(e.g., statistics, mathematics, operations research, engineering, or computer science).
A Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline can be substituted for three years of experience
Five years of experience analyzing datasets and developing analytics.
Five years of experience programming with data analysis software such as R, Python, SAS, or MATLAB.
An additional two years of experience in software development, cloud development, analyzing datasets or developing descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics can be substituted for a Master's degree.
U.S. Citizenship Required
Must possess a TS/FSPOLY clearance
EOE/AA Disability/Veteran",4.3,"Assured Information Security, Inc. (AIS)
4.3","Fort Meade, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
48,Senior Data Scientist with Top Secret,$109k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"What You'll Get to Do as a Data Scientist: *
Leads data science efforts, working closely with clients and data to understand mission and data.
Develops algorithms leveraging modern data science technologies including reinforcement learning systems, machine learning and more.
Provides clients with technical expertise for a project or program. Able to manage technology projects or lead technology solutioning.
Provides highly technical and specialized guidance and solutions to complex IT problems; performs elaborate analyses and studies.
Evaluates, recommends, and executes new technologies and updates existing infrastructure to ensure optimal performance and efficiency.
Develops IT strategies to ensure the systems meet existing and future requirements based on needs and regulations.
Works in a variety of environments and has excellent verbal and non-verbal communication skills. Works effectively and independently.
You’ll Bring These Qualifications: *
Must have an active TS or TS/SCI
At least 5 years of experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with multiple database types such as SQL, Redis and MongoDB
Experience building and integrating the at the application and database level
Experience developing REST/SOAP APIs and messaging protocols and formats
At least 2 years of theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization
Experience implementing event/data streaming services such as Kafka
Experience prototyping front-end visualizations utilizing data visualization suites such as Kibana or Splunk
At least 2 years of experience developing Reinforcement learning systems utilizing at least one of the following methodologies. Finite Markov Decision Processes, Support Vector Machines, Q-Learning, Stochastic Finite State Machines, MCTS or other hybrid Deep Reinforcement Learning processes
Experience in theoretical and practical background in statistical analysis, machine learning, predictive modeling, and/or optimization.
Experience developing in languages commonly used for data analysis such as Python, R, Julia, or SAS
Experience working with databases such as SQL or MongoDB.
Experience working with large-scale data sets.
Experience producing data visualizations for a variety of different audiences.
Excellent verbal and written communications skills along with the ability to present technical data and approaches to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On Call
Experience:
SAS: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Science: 5 years (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 5 years (Preferred)
Data Engineering: 5 years (Preferred)
R: 5 years (Preferred)
Python: 5 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20016 (Preferred)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.oneglobeit.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"OneGlobe LLC
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
49,Business Analytics Manager,-1,"Purpose and Scope

The Business Analytics Manager leads the demand planning process for the commercial team including collecting the volume and pricing data from all key data sources, as well as compiling the business understanding and assumptions that will be included in the forecast for the purpose of forecast for business planning decisions. This role is also responsible for working cross functionally to determine forecast assumptions and inputs with the manufacturing operations planning, accounting, contracts and pricing, sales leadership, market access, and marketing. Those assumptions will be incorporated into the forecast, vetted with the cross functional team, and adjusted as needed to gain agreement for senior leadership. This position is responsible for all local, state & federal government reporting, calculations, and submissions. Compliance to all federal and state pricing regulations is a key element to the position. Strong financial accounting, and analytical skills are required.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

Builds the commercial demand and revenue forecast to TPI commercial
Establishes and maintains forecast models to generate forecast scenarios as needed to support business decisions.
Maintain strict process and decision documentation including pricing committee official reporting and price list tracking
Develops higher order summaries and analysis of data and assumptions to model
Collaborates closely with Finance to link sales performance and market data for use in financial planning and
Manages government pricing calculations to ensure the accuracy of all Medicaid, Medicare & VA FSS quarterly rebate and discount calculations and reporting.
Pricing analysis across multiple customer and contracting segments.
Works closely with contracts and pricing, marketing, and sales teams to determine assumptions and validate business information and decisions
Develops and maintains stringent quality control processes that ensure the accuracy of all reports and analyzes, cross checks, and validates transactional data from multiple databases to ensure accuracy
Assists with special projects as required.
Interacts regularly with Executive Leadership, Sales Leadership, and Analytics leadership to report on commercial performance trends.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities

3-5 year of strong accounting, finance, or data analytics
Government reporting and pricing experience preferred
Proficiency with Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe acrobat and other reporting software used in the industry such as Power Query and Tableau.
Excellent organizational, problem-solving, and interpersonal skills.
Ability to work with imperfect data and manage ambiguity to bring clarity to business decisions.
Advanced financial, analytical, strategy, and business planning skills with proficiency in analytics methodologies.
Ability to work independently on data analyses and combine multiple data sources across multiple views to uncover trends.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels of the organization to communicate results of the data analyses and trends.
Ability to communicate effectively and maintain effective working relationships across multiple departments.
Self-starter with the ability to build new department capability and team over time.

Education & Experience

Bachelor's Degree
MBA or similar advanced degree preferred.
Strong accounting, finance, or data analytics with 3 years of experience.
Must be proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, Adobe Acrobat and other reporting tools and software used within the industry

Working Conditions

Office environment; requiring sitting and standing
Travel as required

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",-1,"Tolmar Pharmaceuticals, Inc.","Buffalo Grove, IL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
50,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,$99k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,"Acuity Insurance
4.9","Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
51,NLP and Machine Learning Research Scientist,$94k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Research USA is actively seeking talents with a Machine Learning background to join our vibrant research team in our Silicon Valley office. Our research team has broad research interests among many different areas, such as natural language processing, speech synthesis and recognition, and computer vision. The candidate will have the opportunity to work with top researchers on various exciting research projects. The ideal candidate should have solid machine learning related knowledge and experience to work together with the teammates on the research, implementation, experimentation, and the analysis of algorithms. As a research scientist at Baidu, you will benefit greatly by working in our creative environment.

Requirements:
PhD degree in computer science, statistics, machine learning, or a related field.
At least 2 years of relevant industry or research experience.
Good knowledge of common machine learning models.
Expertise in one or more of natural language processing, computer vision, speech synthesis or recognition, optimization, generative models.
Strong publication record in top conferences or journals, e.g., ACL, EMNLP, NAACL NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR and so on.
Good presentation and communication skills.
A solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design.
Expert knowledge developing and debugging in python, C/C++ or CUDA is a plus.
Key Responsibilities:
Conduct scientific research to design, implement and evaluate novel machine learning algorithms
Collaborate with other researchers in developing machine learning algorithms
Prepare presentation and technical paper drafts to demonstrate research findings and experimental results.
Participate in software prototyping and experimental evaluation.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
52,Innovation Applied Data Scientist,$60k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:

Noblis is positioned to provide subject matter expertise (SME) on emerging threats, data analysis, and algorithm development to decision makers in the CWMD office and DHS components using information obtained from distributed sensor network capabilities, open source reporting, and other sources.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity to help develop and advance DHS’s new approach to countering WMD, we are actively seeking to identify personnel to join our team of talented professionals who possess the experience, vision, commitment and integrity to successfully support the strategic goals of DHS CWMD by assisting with the fulfillment of the office’ policy and strategy requirements as DHS’s CWMD focal point as an Innovation Applied Scientist for CWMD. Responsibilities include:

Responsibilities:

Develops and incorporates novel algorithms and methods for complex, large-scale data analysis in coordination with operational/analytic end-users within and outside of DHS CWMD.
Provides applied science technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Researches new technical approaches for application across the CWMD mission portfolio.
Client Engagement: · Support and lead evolving business development efforts by applying technical and functional expertise to develop business solutions. · Lead proposal sections for small or limited competition proposals and actively participate in teaming strategy discussions Qualifications:

Qualification:

Has 7-10 years of experience and a (B.A./B.S) or 3-10 years and a (M.A./M.S) in natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields.
Qualifying experience must be in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Experienced with Providing technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Experience developing, or evaluating the development of, systems, algorithms, and approaches for complex large-scale data analysis across a range of different types of data.
Secret Clearance is required.

Desired:

Preferred Specialized Experience: Considerable professional experience in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, statistics, computer science, modeling and simulation, software engineering, and signal processing.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, computer science, statistical and probabilistic modeling, and advanced analytic software such as Matlab and SAS
Overview:

Noblis and our wholly owned subsidiary, Noblis ESI, are solving difficult problems that help our government and our country. We bring the best of scientific thought, management, and engineering expertise with a reputation for independence and objectivity. We support a wide range of government and industry clients in the areas of national security, intelligence, transportation, healthcare, environmental sustainability, and enterprise engineering. Learn more at Noblis -About Us

Why work at a Noblis company?

Our employees find greater meaning in their work and balance the other things in life that matter to them. Our people are our greatest asset. They are exceptionally skilled, knowledgeable, team-oriented, and mission-driven individuals who want to do work that matters and benefits the public.

Noblis has won numerous workplace awards. Noblis maintains a drug-free workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.9,"Noblis
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
53,Nurse Scientist,$24-$39 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Baptist Health South Florida is once again one of the 2020 Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work For! This is the 20th time Baptist Health has been recognized on the list. We have also been recognized for being among the best healthcare providers in the nation by U.S. News & World Reports in its 2020-2021 Best Hospitals and have been honored as one of PEOPLE's 2020 50 Companies that Care by PEOPLE magazine and Great Place to Work.

Baptist Health South Florida is the region's largest not-for-profit healthcare organization with more than 23,000 employees working across 11 hospital campuses and more than 100 outpatient facilities throughout Miami-Dade, Monroe, Broward, and Palm Beach counties. In 2016 we welcomed the newest weapon in the fight against cancer, the world-class Miami Cancer Institute and proton therapy center.

Everything we do at Baptist Health, we do to the best of our ability. That includes supporting our team with extensive training programs, millions of dollars in tuition assistance, comprehensive benefits and more. Working within our award-winning culture means getting the respect and support you need to do your best work ever. Find out why this is the best place to be your best!

Description:

The Nurse Scientist is a doctorally prepared nurse that directs the development and coordination of the clinical research program at assigned entity. The Nurse Scientist enhances translation of evidence to practice for quality patient care and contributes to the professional development of staff. This individual provides guidance for the development of nursing and inter-professional research studies. This individual will be accountable for overseeing execution of research deliverables and will lead the research team to achieve research goals and objectives.
Qualifications:

Licenses & Certifications: CITI, FL Registered Nurse

Additional Qualifications: Master’s degree in Nursing – MSN, required. Willing to enter into an accredited Nursing PhD program within 2 years of hire, PhD preferred. Minimum of three years experience in academic or clinical research. Strong, broad clinical background. Effective relationship management skills and ability to build successful collaborations across programs and multidisciplinary teams. Strong communication skills (including scientific and technical) - verbal, written and presentation, Strong knowledge of research regulations and Institutional Review Boards, Proficient in computer programs (Microsoft Office, statistical packages, qualitative data management). Excellent analytical skills. Must be extremely flexible with ability to multitask effectively. Must be willing/able to travel domestically and internationally. Minimum Required Experience: 3 years

Join our Talent Community and stay up-to-date on our career opportunities. We’ll send you alerts of new jobs matching your interests as well as exciting news and events happening at Baptist Health South Florida.

EOE",3.9,"Baptist Health South Florida
3.9","Miami, FL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1960,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
54,Mid-Level Data Scientist,-1,Job Description BTS is seeking a Mid Level Data Scientist to support NORTHCOM J2 in Colorado Springs CO Conducts data analytics data engineering data mining exploratory analysis predictive analysis and statistical analysis and uses scientific techniques to correlate data into graphical written visual and verbal narrative products enabling more informed analytic decisions Proactively retrieves information from various sources analyzes it for better understanding about the data set and builds AI tools that automate certain processes Duties typically include creating various ML based tools or processes such as recommendation engines or automated lead scoring systems Performs statistical analysis applies data mining techniques and builds high quality prediction systems Should be skilled in data visualization and use of graphical applications including Microsoft Office Power BI and Tableau; major data science languages such as R and Python; managing and merging of disparate data sources preferably through R Python or SQL; statistical analysis; and data mining algorithms Should have prior experience with large data Multi INT analytics ML and automated predictive analytics Requisite Skill Requirements Bachelor degree with 4 6 years of relevant subject matter experience or specialized training & 4 8 years subject matter experience or equivalent intelligenceacademic experience Senior level contractor personnel work independently with moderate Government oversight provide comprehensive and completed products that may require multiple Senior Intelligence AnalystOfficer SIASIO minor revisions andor editing and develop and manage plan of actions and milestones Additional duties as directed Demonstrates comprehensive mission knowledge and skills that affirms completion of all developmental training and experiences for the labor categoryDemonstrates ability to communicate understanding from information that may be incomplete indirect highly complex seemingly unrelated and or technically advanced Demonstrates ability to structure analysis based on trends in reporting and a range of analytic perspectives from other analysts organizations and intelligence disciplinesDemonstrates ability to work independently with minimal oversight and directionDemonstrates ability to collaborate and work with other IC members on information sharing driving collection and addressing analytic disputes and conflict resolutionDemonstrates ability to develop concise insightful and comprehensive products for defense intelligenceDemonstrates ability to lead teams in researching multifaceted or critical problems Provides guidance in selecting designing and applying analytic methodologies Uses argument evaluation and validated analytic methodologies to challenge differing perspectivesDesired Experience At least 8 years of experience conducting analysis relevant to the specific labor category with at least a portion of the experience within the last 2 yearsDesired Education Bachelors degree in an area related to the labor category from a college or university accredited by an agency recognized by the US Department of EducationCompany Overview BTS Software Solutions is a Service Disabled Veteran Owned Small Business who are community focused innovators who transform ideas into technology to serve people We recognize that innovation is only valuable when applied towards a needed solution Technology has no value without the hard work to turn ideas into reality Our roots are in helping save Soldiers lives through technology We bring that ethos to serving our community We create solutions that touch peoples lives products to communicate to connect companies with customers to stay informed to save lives and to enhance lives We have a small company persona with a large company ethos and capabilities; we create elegant solutions for complex problems that will enrich peoples lives We offer one of the best benefits packages in the industry Competitive health benefits package PTO 401K matching and vested from day one to name just a few of our benefits and perks BTS Software Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer EOE All employment decisions shall be made without regard to age race creed color religion sex national origin ancestry disability status veteran status sexual orientation gender identity or expression genetic information marital status citizenship status or any other basis as protected by federal state or local law,4.9,"BTS Software Solutions
4.9",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
55,Integrative Data Scientist - Bioinformatics,$93k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovative-driven company that will inspire you and support your career development? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as Integrative Data Scientist at our Cambridge office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by a wavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission in Cell Therapies.

You will have the opportunity to apply your knowledge and partner with industry-leading professionals in oncology, drug discovery, translational research, quantitative systems pharmacology, engineering, analytical and process development as you engage in cutting-edge therapeutic programs. The successful candidate will have extensive experience working with high-dimensional datasets using best practices in statistical data analyses to provide scientific insights and inform translational strategies.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The Cell Therapy Pharmaceutical Sciences team is pursuing several programs in human clinical studies, in addition to management of Takeda’s commercial cell therapy assets. This position’s primary role is to provide hands-on support, computational leadership and statistical guidance in bringing these therapies to patients, with a focus on nonclinical and clinical data integration, visualization, and analyses. In this role you will contribute to Takeda’s Cell Therapy platform strategies, working cross-functionally with discovery and development, translational sciences, pharmacology, data sciences, and in silico modeling teams.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Integrate and interpret high-dimensional data from a variety of high-throughput platforms and multidimensional data sources (internal or public) to derive insights and data-driven program strategies
Evaluate novel algorithms and approaches for data analysis, visualization and exploration in collaboration with academic partners and/or external associates
Work cross-functionally among R&D teams, workstreams, and programs to provide statistical support and expertise across the Cell Therapy portfolio.
Perform exploratory data analyses, static and dynamic data visualizations to communicate quantitative results enabling data-driven program decisions.
Provide bioinformatic and/or computational biology support to characterize disease mechanisms, mechanism of action for therapeutic interventions, and identify clinical biomarkers.
Actively communicate with nonclinical leads, scientists, analytical, and clinical teams to inform data analyses, data engineering, and machine learning that drives drug discovery and development.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, AND SKILLS:

PhD – or MS with 2+ years of work experience, or BS with 5+ years of relevant experience – in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field and/or experience in systems biology
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge of high-level computing languages: R, C/C++, Java, Python, Perl, and willingness to learn other(s)
Strong knowledge in statistical software and language (e.g., R, SAS, MATLAB)
Familiar with distributed computing, database (e.g., SQL), and Amazon Web Services. Database programming or dashboard experience is a plus.
Demonstrate experience and willingness to utilize state-of-the-art bioinformatic tools for genome-scale or big data derived from Next Generation Sequencing including: DNA, RNA, Epigenetics, and Single Cell sequencing platforms and assays.
Proficient in applying concepts in descriptive and multivariate statistics; Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning knowledge and application is a plus. Evaluation of (non)clinical datasets in cell therapies preferred.
Experience in data integration, algorithm development, programming, and evaluation of analytical tools
Self-motivation and excellent time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication, organizational skills, and be a strong team player.
Ability to drive initiatives, and excel in a matrix environment

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
56,Data Science Manager,$96k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytical. Data Driven. Excellent Communicator. Strong Business Partner.

Does this sound like you? If so– look no further! Our Analytics team is looking to expand and complement their team with a new Data Science Manager.

As ourData Science Manager, you are responsible for developing predictive models to assist our Underwriting and Claims teams. You will collaborate closely with internal and external peers, pro-actively collect and address feedback from business units, and create actionable models which enable better business decisions.

At Constellation, we’re doing things differently. Our organization empowers you and believes that together, we can make a difference.

So, join us! We invite you to join a company where you can stretch your abilities and rocket your career to the stars!

You will be responsible for:
Participating in the design and delivery of accurate and robust predictive models
Collaborating with Subject Matter Experts to and design analytic solutions which enable better decision making
Clearly communicating findings, collecting feedback, addressing questions and concerns, with the ability to clearly translate technical concepts to non-technical audience
Managing large, long term project timelines with cross functional dependencies and transparently communicating progress on these timelines, obstacles, and solutions to any gaps
Working with a team of data scientists to build out actionable statistical models (GLMs / ML / AI) within R / Python
Mentoring other data scientists on model development, best practices, technical coding, Analytics Environment
Assisting in expansion and development of analytics department, finding internal and external vendor partners to support long-term business objectives
Determining requirements for Analytics platform. Collaborating with IT to deliver and maintain environment
You will have:
3+ years working with R or Python
3+ years leading analytics projects
Demonstrated strong verbal and written communication skills
Bachelor’s Degree with 7 years’ experience or Masters / PhD with 5 years’ experience",4.5,"Constellation (MN)
4.5","Minneapolis, MN",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
57,Associate Data Scientist,$81k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

As an Associate Data Scientist, you will apply modern data storage, movement, and transformation architectures and techniques to extract and engineer features from any scale structured or unstructured data in health, IT system, business processes, or external data. You will also access, cleanse, compile, and transform disparate data sets to conduct exploratory and pre-defined analyses using scientifically valid techniques and generate meaningful insights as well as assist with feasibility studies to identify data availability, quality and modeling requirements, and dependencies.

Qualifications

Basic Qualifications
Master’s Degree in Statistics, Computer Science, Analytics, Biostatistics, Applied Mathematics, Software Engineering, Data Science, or related field, or equivalent relevant work experience
At least 1 year of statistical programming and applied programming work experience
At least 1 year Data mining, quantitative analysis, and/or statistical modeling including predictive performance and algorithm optimization work experience
Preferred Qualifications
Experience with relational databases and SQL; NoSQL databases (hBase, Cassandra, MongoDB, Couch DB, Riak) and unstructured data; Spark; Pig and Avro
Experience with agile software development methodologies
Expectations
Willing to travel up to 20% of the time as needed
Must be currently residing in or willing to relocate to the Kansas City metro area",4.0,"Cerner
4.0","North Kansas City, MO",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
58,Cloud Data Engineer/Architect at ConsumerMedical,-1,"Cloud Data Engineer/Architect

ConsumerMedical

Norwell, MA or Bloomington, MN

COMPANY PROFILE

ConsumerMedical (www.consumermedical.com) is a leading healthcare decision support and clinical concierge company serving over 4 million individuals through some of the nation's largest employers, health plans and private exchanges. As a Medical Ally, ConsumerMedical (CM) guides participants throughout their healthcare journey with compassionate, high-touch support and deep clinical expertise.

ConsumerMedical offers a fully integrated suite of solutions including Medical Decision Support, Expert Medical Opinions, Claims Advocacy and more, helping individuals and families navigate the healthcare system while reducing unnecessary elective surgeries and driving patients to the highest quality providers. The result is better care for patients, more empowered healthcare decisions for employees and their families, and a better bottom line for business. The company is headquartered outside Boston in Norwell, MA.

We offer an opportunity to contribute immediately, have a voice that’s recognized, and make decisions that have impact while building a career with a fast-growing organization. ConsumerMedical offers a healthy work-life balance and is an inclusive employer seeking to foster a diverse and collaborative culture. We are currently seeking a full time Cloud Data Engineer/Architect to join our growing team.

GENERAL SUMMARY

Our data analytics/engineering teams are looking for a Cloud Data Engineer/Architect who wants to bring our platform(s) to the next level, expanding into new market opportunities. In undertaking this challenge, you will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to lead/maintain data models and transformations of that data. In this role, you will lead and be responsible for creating and maintaining end to end data pipelines for healthcare application(s) developed and managed in Azure Cloud Services. The pipelines include big data primarily from commercial healthcare claims, provider data, CMS and other proprietary quality and clinical data sources. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence to advance to and enhance applications which help ConsumerMedical maintain its leadership position in the 5 drivers of quality. This is a key role to a team who are at the forefront of the latest technologies and immersed in development on cloud services with new and emerging healthcare data sources.

Our team of industry experts work in a fast-paced, rapid-learning environment in software development, working with massive data sets, and healthcare data analytics. In our environment, everyone is encouraged to make a difference without experiencing the fixed ways of doing business in larger, bureaucratic organizations.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Job Responsibilities:

Data engineering leadership and architecture responsible to collect, aggregate, store, and reconcile data to Azure in support of healthcare business decisions.
Design and build data pipelines, data streams, and data services on Azure which drive data driven, qualitative, quality insights and application enhancement / search results.
Build / architect processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
Architect / deliver modern data solutions leveraging components like Azure functions, Azure Data Factory, Data Flows, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL, Azure Data Bricks, Streaming Analytics and related
Enable data pipelines between structured and unstructured data sources and company’s Enterprise Data Warehouse on Azure through a continuous process of data scrapping, structure transformation cleansing and formatting in SQL / Python
Working with Data Scientists, Engineering and Physicians to build an enhanced data ecosystem and build new integrated solutions to provide a holistic set of industry-leading data and analytic capabilities including Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and real-time insights
Support business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines
Technologies include:
SQL
Python
JavaScript
Elasticsearch, Kibana, Logstash
Azure Data Technologies, specifically Databricks, Data Factory, Blob storage
Snowflake Data Warehouse
Prepare, clean, aggregate and interpret big data (billions+ rows) in support of advanced analytic projects across the organization
Ideal candidate will have a knack for big picture/critical thinking, as well as enjoy being very hands-on in a fast paced, innovative environment.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Data Science, or related field
3+ years of experience architecting and building Azure Big Data architecture, Enterprise Analytics Solutions, and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience with Design and Architecture of Azure big data frameworks/tools: Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Bricks, Azure ML, SQL Data Warehouse, HDInsight
Strong background in Big Data and Cloud technologies:
Preferred: Azure (Azure Functions, Azure SQL Database, Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Blob), Snowflake Data Warehouse);
Similar: Hadoop, PySpark, Hive, Big Query, AWS (EC2, RDS, CloudFormation, S3), Google Cloud Platform.
Strong background in distributed data processing and software engineering, can build high-quality, scalable data products.
Deep technical knowledge of data architectures, databases, data modeling and data infrastructure in the cloud (i.e.- Azure, AWS, Google Cloud)
Experience designing and developing data cleansing routines utilizing typical data quality functions involving standardization, transformation, rationalization, linking and matching
Deep hands-on experience with SQL including ability to write, analyze, and debug SQL and Python
Highly skilled in areas of structured data (e.g. join types, inner, outer), understanding of when tables should/shouldn’t have duplicates (many to many; 1 to many joins)
Experience with Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Computer Vision and/or Conversational/NLP applications
Ideal candidate has healthcare, pharmaceutical or biomedical data experience with a focus on improved patient care, quality of care, patient engagement, provider experience, and system efficiency
Experience with code deployment in Azure Databricks environment preferred.
Knowledge of data, master data and metadata related standards, processes and technology
Strong hands on experience with data core modernization and data ingestion
Preferred experience with Snowflake Data Warehouse systems
Experience in designing and implementing scalable, distributed systems leveraging cloud computing technologies like Microsoft Azure, AWS EC2, and AWS Elastic Map
Familiarity with DevOps tools like Azure DevOps, Jenkins, Maven etc.
Experience working with Azure data integration techniques & self-service data preparation.
Assist business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines

Please submit resume and cover letter for consideration.

Disclaimers:

Applicants, as well as position incumbents, who become disabled as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act must be able to perform the essential job functions (as listed) either unaided or with the assistance of a reasonable accommodation to be determined by management on a case by case basis.

ConsumerMedical is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity. Applicants for employment and employees are reviewed on their individual qualifications for a position. Under no circumstances will ConsumerMedical discriminate against qualified persons on the basis of race, color, religious creed, retaliation, national origin, ancestry, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity/expression, disability, mental illness, genetics, choice of health insurance, marital status, age, veteran status, or any other basis prohibited under applicable law.",3.7,"Insight Performance
3.7","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
59,Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst,$50k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blending customer advisory, customer support, and customer experience, Carousel’s supercharged Customer Success Obsessed mission goes beyond any one IT function. Rather, it’s a mindset, a mantra, and a company-wide drive to bring extreme technology value to Carousel customers—so they can bring value to theirs.
With deep expertise across a vast portfolio of technologies, including security, unified communications and collaboration, data center, networking, managed services, and cloud solutions, Carousel can design, implement, and support solutions tailored to meet the unique needs of each customer. By offering professional and managed services with flexible deployments in the cloud, Carousel ensures customers achieve agility and use technologies in the way most effective for their business.
A legion of 1,300, the Carousel team has been committed to the art of customer success for its more than 6,000 highly satisfied customers since 1992. The company has been recognized by multiple publications and industry consortiums as a top technology integrator and managed services and cloud solution provider—including the Inc. 500/5000, Healthcare Informatics 100, and CRN MSP Elite 150. Headquartered in Exeter, RI, the company has offices across the United States and internationally—with three Network Operations Centers. To learn more, visit CarouselIndustries.com.

Position Summary:
The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for leveraging large quantities data to assist executives, business partners, and operations teams to make data-driven decisions. This position will focus largely on sales operations data defining data relationships (inclusive of off-system spreadsheets), data mining and data modeling which will be the basis for actionable intelligence dashboards and reports. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will utilize their experience to explore data, applying statistical techniques, and designing sales dashboards and reports that provide value to the company and its operational leaders. This role will collaborate with all Business Systems Teams and business subject matter experts to deploy a robust reporting universe that is streamlined and transparent. The Sr. Business Intelligence Analyst will report to the Vice President of Business Intelligence and join a highly agile cross-functional team that leads some of the most critical projects for the Business Intelligence department and Carousel Industries as an organization.
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Commitment to the Sales Organization to develop and deliver analytical reports that support and enable actionable intelligence to achieve strategic and operational goals.
Provide descriptive data analysis, and creative problem-solving using SQL programming language
Lead projects regarding data exploration, relationship management and data-driven story telling
Ability to create practical, actionable plans that are coherent and understood by stakeholders
Partner with Business Systems teams, business leaders, and functional groups to provide actionable intelligence regarding operational effectiveness and revenue growth
Gather, manipulate, and explore large datasets to test hypotheses and extract useful insights
Create and manage reporting, data narratives, and analytics deliverables for the CI Governance board and committee
Build innovative data models, reports and dashboards
Troubleshoot data conflicts and inconsistencies through data mining and collaboration with the business teams
Evaluate and develop data monitoring reports to provide further insight into process and change management
Develop roadmaps with proposed solutions from an end-to-end perspective
Partner with clients to promote evidence-based decision-making and devise action plans that influence behavior changes
Investigate and create trend analysis models to promote operational effectiveness

Qualifications:
B.S. in a quantitative field required.
Prior experience and expertise with Salesforce strongly desired.
Experience in financial and/or sales driven data modeling is a plus.
Experience with Microsoft Power BI and SNOWFLAKE cloud data warehouse preferred.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Demonstrated advanced analytical, troubleshooting, and problem-solving skills.
Attention to detail and ability to deliver and support a quality service experience.
Demonstrated experience with industry report writers such as Einstein Analytics, Business Objects, Power BI, SSRS, Tableau or other BI reporting solutions.
Prior experience with CRM, ITSM and ERP reporting preferred.
Experience with writing/updating (SQL) queries.
Strong problem-solving skills.Superior verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to organize and prioritize concurrent projects.
Ability to work independently and collaboratively.
Create, maintain, and optimize reports, including SQL statements, views, functions, and stored procedures.
Effectively gather requirements and design new reports, troubleshoot, research, and correction of reports and database objects requiring review.
Accurately estimate effort for requested custom reports.",3.2,"Carousel Industries
3.2","Exeter, RI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
60,Data Scientist,$91k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,"State of Wisconsin Investment Board
3.0","Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1951,Government,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
61,Data Scientist,$80k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,"IFG Companies
2.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
62,Data Scientist,$108k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

In this role, your primary responsibility will be to partner with key stakeholders and lead the development of an analytics program to support and enable the continued growth critical to Facebook's Data Center organization. You will be responsible for creating end to end analytics programs, from data sourcing to surfacing insights and driving action, for various aspects of Facebook's global data center operations. You will also help translate data and identify efficiency opportunities. You will be expected to use data to provide meaningful recommendations and actionable strategies to key stakeholders, and develop best practices, including streamlining of data sources and related programmatic initiatives.
The ideal candidate will have a passion for working in white space and creating impact from the ground up in a fast-paced environment. Additionally, you will have a proven track record of thought leadership and impact in developing similar analytics and metrics-based programs. This position is part of the Infrastructure Data Center team and located in Menlo Park, CA.
Leverage data and business principles to create and drive large scale FB Data Center programs
Define and develop the program for metrics creation, data collection, modeling, and reporting the operational performance of Facebooks data centers
Work cross-functionally to define problem statements, collect data, build analytical models and make recommendations
Be a self-starter, motivated by a passion for developing the best possible solutions to problems
Identify and implement streamlined processes for data reporting and communication
Use analytical models to identify insights that are used to drive key decisions across the organization
Routinely communicate metrics, trends and other key indicators to leadership
Provide leadership and mentorship to other members of the team
Lead and support various ad hoc projects, as needed, in support of Facebooks Data Center strategy
Build and maintain data driven optimization models, experiments, forecasting algorithms and capacity constraint models
Leverage tools like R, Tableau, PHP, Python, Hadoop & SQL to drive efficient analytics
Degree in an analytical field (e.g. Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, Operations Research, Management Science)
3+ years of experience in a role with data analysis and metrics development
3+ years of hands-on experience analyzing and interpreting data, drawing conclusions, defining recommended actions, and reporting results across stakeholders
3+ years of SQL development experience writing queries
3+ years of hands-on project management experience
3+ years of experience with data visualization tools
3+ years of experience with packages such as R, Tableau, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc.
2+ years of experience with scripting in Python or PHP
Experience leveraging data driven models to drive business decisions
Experience using data access tools and building visualizations using large datasets and multiple data sources
Experience thinking analytically
Experience communicating data to all organizational levels
Experienced with packages such as NumPy, SciPy, pandas, scikit-learn, dplyr, ggplot2
Knowledge of statistics and optimization techniques
Hands-on experience with medium to large datasets (i.e. data extraction, cleaning, analysis and presentation)
Technical knowledge of data center operations
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Fremont, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
63,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$83k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*
The Data Scientist will:

Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively

#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.3,"LMI
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
64,Data Scientist,-1,"Sartorius Stedim Data Analytics, a market leader in advanced analytics and provider of Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions, is on a strong growth path driving new innovative solutions in the field. It currently has an outstanding opportunity for a Data Scientist to drive customer applications, support the Sartorius sales teams and feedback customer needs into the development of new solutions. The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.

What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Training customers on the use of our software
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum of a bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred) in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.)
Minimum two years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum two years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics a plus
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience a plus
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
Strong identification with Sartorius core values: sustainability, openness, enjoyment
Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organization suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognized for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.

Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here

E-Verify Participation Info

E-Verify Workers Rights

Interested? Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organisation suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognised for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

To find out more about Sartorius as an employer visit us on Sartorius Careers

Become part of our global team.",3.7,"Sartorius
3.7",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
65,"Scientist, Clinical Research",$69k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Those who join Emergent BioSolutions feel a sense of ownership about their future. You will excel in an environment characterized by respect, innovation and growth opportunities. Here, you will join passionate professionals who advance their scientific, technical and professional skills to develop products designed-to protect life.
Job Summary
The Senior Scientist, Clinical Research is responsible for
i) providing scientific expertise and clinical strategy to assigned clinical development programs to other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) or to internal company departments (eg, pre-clinical, bioanalytical, medical writing, regulatory affairs);
ii) authoring relevant clinical trial documents; and
iii) playing a key role in the clinical development of the assigned product and the associated regulatory submission process. Additionally, the Senior Scientist provides leadership by acting as a mentor to clinical research scientists and/or colleagues in Clinical Research department.
This position is located in Gaithersburg, MD.

Essential Functions
Leads clinical research studies from trial design to final study report for assigned projects.
Develops, prioritizes and meets measurable short- and long-term objectives for assigned clinical studies.
Provides guidance to relevant Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management) involved in design and conduct of clinical studies.
Authors/reviews clinical trial protocols, investigator’s brochure, clinical study reports, clinical sections of regulatory submission documents including IND and BLA/NDS, developmental safety update reports, clinical overviews/summaries, clinical assessments.
Appropriately designs studies to meet desired clinical endpoints and with appropriate methods and measurements.
Reviews and applies current company SOPs. Revises relevant SOPs, when required.
Tracks progress of assigned clinical development programs and addresses problems as necessary
Collaborates with other internal departments including Pre-clinical, Bioanalytical, Medical Writing, Regulatory Affairs, Pharmacovigilance and corporate project management groups to ensure common goals are met.
Provides leadership/mentorship to clinical research scientists or to colleagues in other Clinical Research groups (eg, clinical operations, biostatistics, data management).
Presents internally for clinical trial/program training; externally (when required) to investigators/clinical trial site personnel (eg, site initiation visit, investigator meeting), data safety monitoring boards (DSMBs), at regulatory agency meetings, conferences and/or advisory boards.
Attends and contributes at regulatory meetings with FDA, Health Canada, EMA.
Manages relationships with clinical consultants and/or relevant clinical research organization (CRO) personnel.
The above statements are intended to describe the general nature of work performed by those in this job. It is not an exhaustive list of all duties, and other duties may be assigned.

Education, Experience & Skills
EDUCATION:
Qualified candidates will have one of the following:
An advanced degree in Life Sciences or Medicine (PhD, PharmD or MD preferred) with at least 4 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Master’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 5 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions;
A Bachelor’s degree in Life Sciences with at least 6 years of experience with a pharmaceutical company, CRO or other relevant clinical research institutions.
EXPERIENCE:
Must have knowledge and understanding of Health Canada, FDA and ICH regulatory requirements and procedures applicable to Clinical Research and Product Development.
At least 4 years of experience in the pharmaceutical industry with direct experience in designing and managing clinical studies.
Previous experience working in a matrix environment is highly desirable. Experience in clinical operations, biostatistics or data management is an asset.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
Ability to drive efforts, overcome obstacles and achieves results within budget and timeline specifications.
Experience in presentations in public or regulatory settings. Excellent organizational, analytical, leadership, problem solving and interaction skills.
Ability to work in a highly diverse and fast paced, team environment.
Excellent written/verbal communication and interpersonal skills, as well as excellent computer skills required.
ADDITIONAL REQUIREMENTS:
Successful Completion of a Criminal Record Check.

PHYSICAL/MENTAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT CHARACTERISTICS
There are physical/mental demands and work environment characteristics that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of the job.
This information is available upon request from the candidate.
Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform all essential functions.
Emergent BioSolutions is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, age, national origin, disability, Protected Veteran status, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.
Information submitted will be used by Emergent BioSolutions for activities related to your prospective employment. Emergent BioSolutions respects your privacy and any use of the information submitted will be subject to the terms of our Privacy Policy .
Emergent BioSolutions does not accept non-solicited resumes or candidate submittals from search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list. Unsolicited resumes or candidate information submitted to Emergent BioSolutions by search/recruiting agencies not already on Emergent BioSolutions’ approved agency list shall become the property of Emergent BioSolutions and if the candidate is subsequently hired by Emergent BioSolutions, Emergent BioSolutions shall not owe any fee to the submitting agency.",3.3,"Emergent Biosolutions
3.3","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
66,iFit Content Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.8,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.8","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
67,Data Scientist,$80k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
68,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$49k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"Pacific Northwest National Laboratory
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
69,Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Canal Insurance

Canal Insurance Company specializes in insurance for commercial trucking and specialty transportation operations. Canal was founded in 1939 and is located in Greenville, South Carolina. At Canal, we recognize that our success would not be possible without the hard work and dedication of our employees. We know that happiness and productivity go hand in hand, and to that end, we consciously cultivate a culture that enables us to recruit and retain the very best talent in the business.

BI Analyst

***Must be willing to relocate***

Job Summary: The BI Analyst role is responsible for the continuous delivery of analytic solutions and data quality. Working cross-functionally, the BI Analyst will democratize data, support BI quality efforts, and maintain frontend BI solutions systems in a data warehouse environment.

Major Accountabilities:
Work independently with users to define BI concepts, information needs and defining functional requirements, specifications and recommendations related BI solutions.
Lead BI request triage process, maintain Features in Azure DevOps, and organize iteration planning sessions.
Monitor and administer automated ETL jobs to verify execution; Build reports to audit, monitor& validate BI jobs.
Decipher existing reports and database processes to assist users and data stewards in understanding BI solutions.
Support quality assurance testing throughout the agile development cycle.
Interacts with internal team members to assure that the requirements are clearly communicated and documented.
Assist with the review, consolidation and reduction of data discrepancies.
Design, build, enhance, and maintain BI solutions, including dashboards, scorecards, and reports, using IBM Cognos Analytics and other Microsoft BI products.
Migrate and refactor legacy reporting to current BI environment.
Train users in the operations and scheduling of reports.
Perform other duties as assigned by management.
Qualifications:

Education/Training Requirements: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent work experience required.

Experience/Specialized Skills: Minimum of three years’ experience in Business Intelligence and reporting field required. High-level proficiency required in analyzing user requirements, and building front-end BI applications according to specifications. Strong organizational skills required. High-level proficiency in working with semantic layers, star schemas and dimensional data modeling. High-level proficiency required in master data management, data profiling, automated testing, process automation, and data quality subjects. Intermediate to high-proficiency level proficiency required in T-SQL for SQL Server (2016, 2017), Reporting Services (SSRS), SQL Server Analysis Services (SSAS), Microsoft Excel. Intermediate to high-proficiency desired in IBM Cognos Analytics (V11), Report Studio, Framework Manager, Cognos architecture and development best practices.

Special Considerations:

Physical Requirements: Constant use of vision, hearing, and communication (oral and written). Frequent standing, walking, handling, reaching, grasping, and periods of prolonged concentration. Frequent bending, kneeling and lifting (up to 50 lbs.) Frequent use of computer and office equipment.

Travel/Hours of Service: Occasional travel may be required. Periodic work outside of standard business hours or on weekends may be required.",3.8,"Canal Insurance
3.8","Greenville, SC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1939,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
70,Data Scientist,$70k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Position at Homes.com

Homes.com is looking for a Data Scientist in Norfolk, VA to join our team of IT professionals. You'll be working with our Business Intelligence Team to support and grow our premier real estate portal. You'll participate in technical research, developing models, data analysis, machine learning and be expected to bring your own ideas to the table to help keep us innovating.

Responsibilities:
Forecast site traffic for use in inventory calculations
Analyze and report on trends such as home valuations
Develop suggestion models
Help develop image classification models
Requirements:
BS or MS in computer science, data science, mathematics or other related field
2+ Years working as a Data Scientist
1+ Years Experience working with Time Series modeling
Experience working with Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working in R and Python
Experience providing Statistical Analysis
Nice to Haves:
Experience working in a cloud environment
Experience working with a relational database

About Homes.com

Homes.com offers today's demanding home buyers, renters and those somewhere in between a simply smarter home search. With features like Homes.com Match, HomeShare and Snap & Search, homeshoppers now have a more personalized way to search for their next home. Since its launch over 25 years ago, Homes.com offers real estate professionals brand and property advertising, search engine marketing and instant response lead generation to help them succeed online. For more information, visit Homes.com.

About DE

Dominion Enterprises (DE) is a leading digital marketing and software services company offering client solutions across multiple business verticals. Our customers rely on our B2B cloud SaaS solutions to establish their online and mobile brands, generate leads, and manage customer relationships through our Homes.com, Dominion Dealer Solutions, Dominion Business Solutions / DX1, Travel Media and Franchise and Business Opportunity divisions. Our B2C web and mobile applications include Homes.com, HotelCoupons.com, FranchiseOpportunities.com, FranchiseGator.com, Franchise.com, and BusinessBroker.net.
About 2,000 employees reside and work in our Norfolk, VA home office and in offices across the U.S. Our employees will tell you about our collaborative, innovative, team-oriented work environment, excellent career enrichment opportunities, community service opportunities, competitive earnings, and a comprehensive benefits package that includes a generous 401(k). DE is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workforce. DE is a drug-testing employer.",4.3,"Homes.com
4.3","Norfolk, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
71,Senior Data Analytics/Scientist,$73k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Kingfisher Systems, Inc. specializes in providing a full range of Information Technology, Cybersecurity, Intelligence, and support services to the U.S. Government. Kingfisher Systems core competency is technology-enabled services, with a specific focus on national security. Since 2005, Kingfisher has established itself as a recognized and trusted mission partner whose mission is safeguarding sensitive information, operations, and programs for our Federal customers and warfighters.

Responsibilities:

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is seeking a Senior Data Analytics/Scientist to support the Chief Human Capital Office (CHCO) for an Intelligence Community (IC) program in Northern Virginia. An Active TS/SCI with polygraph security clearance is required to be considered for this position. The candidate will support Government staff in developing a broad range of written products in support of senior leadership and USG policymakers.

Primary Responsibilities

Provide expert and professional data scientists to implement effective and innovative solutions meshing disparate data types to discover insights and trends in human capital information. Perform work on a data science team to advance HCA across the IC. Centralize IC CHCO data collection and synthesis, including survey data, enabling strategic and predictive analytics to guide business decisions. Develop or utilize complex programmatic and quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in data sets; lead statistical modeling, or other data-driven problem-solving analysis to address novel or abstract business operation questions; and incorporate insights and findings into a range of products.

Create detailed write-ups of processes used, logic applied, and methodologies used for creation, validation, analysis, and visualizations. Write- ups shall occur initially, within a week of when process is created, and updated in writing when changes occur.

Adapt freeware solutions such as R, and modular solutions for maximum flexibility. Provide an advanced capability for data analysis of human capital information from disparate data types, promoting visualization and storytelling to discover insights that help guide business decisions. Be forward leaning, exploring HCA solutions that benefit IC elements individually and collectively. Let the data tell the story including what is inconsistent or contradictory, and automate data cleansing as much as possible. Integrate data solutions and collection with IC Information Technology Enterprise to enhance connectivity with IC Elements.

Identify and customize, if necessary, Commercial Off The Shelf (COTS) Information Technology (IT) tools for administration and data collection, or to leverage, support, and integrate the process with tools built for the IC and/or its component elements. Any tools developed shall be web-based and web-enabled, designed to maximize feedback effectiveness while protecting employee assessment information, and include both structured interview and web-based tools for gathering feedback.

Assist in the development and maintenance of financial procedural guidance, templates and data formats, for identifying IC-wide workforce numbers, to include government, military, and contractor support. Review, assess data, identify data deficiencies and recommend solutions for remediation. Support quantitative and analytic efforts for workforce planning, development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to the Congressional Budget Justification Book (CBJB) planning displays, and analytic support for budget management and planning. Assist with ad hoc data requests from Congress, IC elements or as required by IC CHCO.

Coordinate and facilitate community of practice and working group meetings, to include meeting logistics, agenda development and presenter coordination, day-of execution and facilitation, documentation and distribution of meeting minutes and presentations. Present or coordinate presentations on relevant topics as directed by IC CHCO.

Demonstrated experience in developing and applying quantitative methods to find patterns and relationships in large human capital data sets (such as the Human Capital Data Call, Foreign Language Data Call, FAIR act data, etc.) using statistical and graphical packages.

Applied knowledge in the mathematical sciences such as probability, statistics, predictive modeling, computational social sciences; computer programming such as but not limited to Python, R, SAS, SPSS; and COTS data visualization packages such as but not limited to Tableau. Experience with Oracle Database and Procedural language/Structured Query Language (PUSQL).

Demonstrated experience with structuring data, natural language processing, database technologies, and machine learning algorithms.

Ability to translate complex, technical, or analytic findings into an easily understood narrative- tell a story with the data in graphical, verbal, or written form.

Preferred Experience:

C#.NET, ASP.NET Model View Controller (MVC), jQuery, and Cascading Style Sheets (CSS), etc.

Demonstrated expertise in supporting quantitative and analytical efforts and knowledge of workforce planning. Experience should include engagement with the Intelligence Community and expertise with using analytical software.

Demonstrated professional experience in developing quantitative financial analysis related to budget formulation and execution. Experience in development of financial procedural guidance data formats related to CBJB workforce displays and analytic support, resource management and planning.

Demonstrated experience in human resource management supporting the federal government.

Demonstrated experience in the use of programming, design, development, and implementation of on-line and automated survey instruments.

Years of Experience: 7 years of relevant experience in a related field (computer science, mathematics, statistics, etc.).

Degree Requirement: Bachelor's or advanced degree in social sciences or related fields. Related fields may include statistics, mathematics, computer science, physical science, economics, or engineering.

Minimum Clearance Requirement: Minimum Top Secret clearance/ SCI Eligibility with a CI Polygraph. Applicants selected will be subject to an additional security investigation and thus may have additional eligibility requirements to meet.

Kingfisher Systems, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, protected veteran status, among other things, or status as a qualified individual with a disability.",4.5,"Kingfisher Systems, Inc.
4.5","Bethesda, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
72,Cannabis Laboratory Lead Scientist-2 years experience required,-1,"Bay City, MI, United States

Therapeutic Health Choices, LLC (THC) is a cannabis safety testing laboratory. It provides analytical chemistry and microbiology testing services for cannabis cultivators and processors as mandated by the state of Michigan. THC is a small, privately held company that provides access to a healthcare and 401(k) plan. It offers an exceptional work environment and long-term growth opportunities in an expanding market. If you work smart, play hard, and want to use your technical skills in a rapidly expanding laboratory sector, we’d love to hear from you!

Essential functions*:

Technical
Oversees day to day operations by managing multiple analytical projects related to the development, qualification and/or troubleshooting of sensitive, efficient, and reliable assays for a wide class of molecules simultaneously.
Prepares, reviews, and edits method transfer, qualification, and validation protocols, analytical technical reports, and regulatory documentation.
Ensures test results are accurate and valid.
Maintains equipment and instruments in good operating condition recognize any malfunctions and troubleshoot as needed.
Completes routine preventive maintenance and troubleshooting on instruments and equipment.
Provides technical expertise and advises project representatives/teams on topics pertaining to assay analysis and development. Often presents findings and/or results to client senior management.
Provides technical guidance to others in resolving challenging issues relating to analytical methods.
Validate reporting requirements in the statewide monitoring system.
Performs other tasks as specified by the manager/director and/or duties required and published by regulatory agencies.
Regulatory
May act in the capacity of a Cannabis Laboratory Testing Analyst.
Ensures compliance with all regulatory agency requirements (MRA, LARA, ISO, etc.) through documentation, audits, and corrective action.
Participate in the development of new SOPs, validations new tests
Performs quality control procedures to ensure accuracy of clinical data.
Participates in the updating of departmental standard operating procedures and database to accurately reflect the current practices.
Responsible for maintaining updated understanding and knowledge of the methods employed in the laboratory.
Ensure employment of personnel who are competent to perform test procedures, and report test results promptly, accurately, and proficiently.
JOB REQUIREMENTS*
Knowledge/Skills/Abilities: *
_Experience in cannabis safety testing is not necessary but __highly__desirable._
Thorough understanding of analytical technology, method development, method qualification/validation, and regulatory analytical requirements.
Laboratory experience performing method development, qualification, and validation activities.
Ability to multi-task and work in a fast-paced, changing, and challenging environment.
Regulatory experience preferred.
Proven ability to successfully work in a team environment.
Superior oral and written communication skills.
Ability to make independent decisions.
Competencies (“soft skills"", traits, behaviors): *
Leadership, self-motivated, shows initiative, results oriented, creative thinker, detail oriented, focused on continuous development, effective time-management skills.
Education/Experience: *
PhD or MS in analytical chemistry or related discipline with previous cannabis safety testing experience.
PhD in analytical chemistry or related discipline, with 2+ years relevant experience
MS in analytical chemistry or related discipline, with 3+ years relevant experience
Job Type: * Full-time
Salary: *
Language: *English (Required)
Work authorization: * United States (Required)
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
analytical chemistry: 2 years (Required)
cannabis: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Master's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Therapeutic Health Choice,"Bay City, MI",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
73,Data Scientist II,$74k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blucora has a bold aspiration: we are committed to giving all people the tools needed to lead healthy financial lives - tools often reserved for the wealthy.

We now turn to the next leg, developing the technological tools that make our vision of financial health for all a reality. Atypical for the financial services industry, we take a contemporary approach to strategy and product development that is founded in user insights, rapid testing and a singular focus on driving end-user value.

Since charting new territory on a daily basis is part of everyone's job at Blucora, we've attracted team members who thrive on the challenge, encourage each other, and are passionately committed to the goal. If you agree that problem- solving is a team sport, and feel energized by a good debate, deep dive research, or a fun night out with colleagues, we might be the right firm for you!
Position Summary

The Data Scientist II is responsible for providing data, analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning capabilities to inform key business initiatives. This role will deliver models to optimize marketing spend, create personalized engagement, and drive customer retention across both our tax preparation and wealth management businesses.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Deliver statistical models to drive organizational insights and actions.
Partner closely with the business including the Marketing and Product teams to understand and optimize the customer journey.
Perform end to end statistical modeling with a high level of accuracy.
Assembling and cleaning of data for modeling purposes.
Write and interpret complex SQL queries.
Model selection, build, and testing.
Engage with the broader Data Science organization to support, refine, and test large scale data science projects.
Ability to deploy visualization techniques to deliver insights to end-user.
Summarize and report key analytical findings and recommendations in both oral and written forms to various technical and non-technical teams.
Other job duties as defined.
Education & Experience
Bachelor or Master’s degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, physics, engineering).
Minimum of 3 years of hands-on experience in the analysis and modeling of large complex datasets.
Fluency in SQL and experience with Big Data.
Expertise in a programming language (Python, R, SQL) for statistical analysis.
Expertise with statistical modeling techniques such as regression, classification, hypothesis testing, and unsupervised learning.
Hands-on experience with optimization, data mining, or machine learning.
Strong Excel and data visualization skills.
The ability not just to retrieve and present data, but to draw conclusions and make recommendations.
Experience working for a technology or internet company.
Comprehensive Benefits



We offer a competitive salary, outstanding benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, life insurance, paid vacation and sick days, paid holidays, tuition reimbursement, and 401(k) with company match. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, or disability.

#Blucora

At Blucora, we believe our work benefits from the diverse perspectives of our employees. As such, Blucora welcomes and celebrates diversity and inclusion and is committed to equal opportunity employment. At Blucora, you can expect a supportive, open and inclusive atmosphere and a team that values your contributions.

Blucora, Inc. and its subsidiaries, Avantax Wealth Management, HK Financial Services, and TaxAct are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and any other status protected under federal or state law. Blucora, considers information gathered in the hiring process, including information on this application, confidential, and only shares it on a need-to know basis or as required by law. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, you may contact us at HR@Blucora.com or by calling 972-870-6000 to speak with a member of the HR Talent Acquisition team.",3.3,"Blucora
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
74,Senior Data Engineer,$67k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta has an immediate need for a Senior Data Engineer to join a fast-paced program in support of a government customer with a very critical national security mission. This is a multi-year program, where the successful candidate will work on an interdisciplinary project team of more than 30 highly qualified individuals with a wide array of skills that include client (reactjs), server (spring java), QA Automation Engineers, UI/UX Designers, and DevOps engineers. The team is responsible for building a next generation Mission Information System and is performing greenfield Software Development using modern technologies via an Agile DevOps approach.

This Senior Data Engineer will play a vital role collaborating as part of this cross-functional Agile team to create and enhance data ingestion pipelines and address big data challenges. The Senior Data Engineer will work closely with the Chief Architect, systems engineers, software engineers, and data scientists on the following key tasks:
Provide Extraction, Transformation, and Load (ETL) experience coupled with enterprise search capabilities to solve Big Data challenges
Design and implement high-volume data ingestion and streaming pipelines using Open Source frameworks like Apache Spark, Flink, Nifi, and Kafka on AWS Cloud
Leverage strategic and analytical skills to understand and solve customer and business centric questions
Create prototypes and proofs of concept for iterative development
Learn new technologies and apply the knowledge in production systems
Monitor and troubleshoot performance issues on the enterprise data pipelines and the data lake
Partner with various teams to define and execute data acquisition, transformation, processing and make data actionable for operational and analytics initiatives

Required Qualifications / Experience:

BS in Computer Science, Systems Engineering, or a related technical field or equivalent experience with at least 8+ years in systems engineering or administration (6+ years with a MS/MIS Degree).
Must have an active Top Secret security clearance and able to obtain a TS/SCI with Polygraph.
3 years of experience with big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, NiFi.
3 years of experience with object-oriented/object function scripting languages: Python (preferred) and/or Java.
3 years of experience with and managing data across relational SQL and NoSQL databases like MySQL, Postgres, Cassandra, HDFS, Redis, and Elasticsearch.
3 years of experience working in a Linux environment.
2 years of experience working with and designing REST APIs.
Experience in designing/developing platform components like caching, messaging, event processing, automation, transformation and tooling frameworks.
Experience developing data ingest workflows with stream-processing systems: Spark-Streaming, Kafka Streams and/or Flink.
Experience transforming data in various formats, including JSON, XML, CSV, and zipped files.
Experience with performance tuning of ETL jobs.
Experience developing flexible ontologies to fit data from multiple sources and implementing the ontology in the form of database mappings / schemas.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills necessary to work effectively with customers and other team members.

Preferred Qualifications / Experience:

Data engineering experience in the Intelligence Community or other government agencies.
Experience with Microservices architecture components, including Docker and Kubernetes.
Experience developing microservices to fit data cleansing, transformation and enrichment needs.
Experience with AWS cloud services: EC2, S3, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Athena and/or Glue.
Experience with Jira, Confluence and extensive experience with Agile methodologies.
Knowledge about security and best practices.
Experience developing flexible data ingest and enrichment pipelines, to easily accommodate new and existing data sources.
Experience with software configuration management tools such as Git/Gitlab, Salt, Confluence, etc.
Experience with continuous integration and deployment (CI/CD) pipelines and their enabling tools such as Jenkins, Nexus, etc.
Detailed oriented/self-motivated with the ability to learn and deploy new technology quickly.

Clearance Level: TS/SCI with Poly

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Reston, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
75,Business Analytics Consultant (Bilingual: English & Spanish),$47k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"This role will work closely with the General Manager of the Andean and Southern Cone region and report to the Director of Latin America Commercial Operations.

Responsibilities

Essential Duties and Job Functions:

Gathers and analyzes internal and external information on sales trends, patient reach, market share, competitor data and pricing for all relevant therapeutic areas. Makes business recommendations based on these analyses.
Conducts market assessments, research and surveys to prepare sales forecasts.
Manages business analytics process for the L9 (Andean and Southern Cone) region. Prepares regular sales reports, dashboards, and scorecards.
Sales force effectiveness reporting and analytics
Keeps ups with new analytics capabilities and sources of information. Recommends and implements improvements to reporting tools, models, and systems; identifies and manages external data sources and vendors.
Prepares business cases and presentations for senior management.
Manages projects locally and as a part of the global team to implement best practices adopted in other parts of the company or used by the industry.
Qualifications

Knowledge, Experience and Skills:

Demonstrates strong analytical and problem-solving skills. Must be able to think critically and be comfortable making assumptions when data or information is incomplete or conflicting.
Excellent project management skills, highly focused on implementation and achievement of tangible results.
Able to make high-impact presentations in small and large settings and deliver clear proposals to senior management.
Knowledge of data visualization tools and databases
Be curious and eager to learn proactively about various therapeutic areas, epidemiology, and stay up to date on country’s economic and healthcare trends.
Strong team player with experience working in international settings. Demonstrates cultural agility and adaptability in a changing environment.
Creative and open-minded individual who fosters an environment in which sharing of ideas is encouraged.
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a business, finance, economics or related field.
Familiarity with the Latin America region, specifically Andean and Southern Cone.
Experience in a pharmaceutical environment preferred.
Fluency in Spanish and English language proficiency is required.

To qualify, applicants must be legally authorized to work in the United States, and should not require, now or in the future, sponsorship for employment visa status.

PRA is an EEO/AA employer and is committed to providing opportunities to minorities, women, veterans and individuals with disabilities.

Options
Apply for this job onlineApply
Share
Sorry the Share function is not working properly at this moment. Please refresh the page and try again later.
Share on your newsfeed
Connect With Us!",3.8,"PRA Health Sciences
3.8","Miami, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
76,Business Data Analyst (Mortgage Operations),$41k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"First Midwest, with assets over $20 billion, is the premier relationship-based banking franchise in the dynamic Chicagoland banking market. As one of the Chicago metropolitan area's largest independent bank holding companies, First Midwest provides the full range of commercial, retail banking, and wealth management services through some 120+ offices located in communities in metropolitan Chicago, Northwest Indiana, Central and Western Illinois, Eastern Iowa, and Southeast Wisconsin.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Working collaboratively with the management team, this position is responsible for creating and managing key periodic reports and ad hoc analyses in support of defined business objectives. This role will also champion the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:
Bachelor’s degree preferred in some business discipline
5 years banking or related experience preferred
Advanced analysis and reporting experience required
In-depth knowledge of industry operating rules preferred
Ability to implement new procedures in response to, and in anticipation of, changes in the business environment desired
Possesses and applies comprehensive problem solving abilities for complex issues
High proficiency and analytical skills using Microsoft Office Suite of products required. Access Database and Excel graphing skills a plus.
Experience with financial reports and Falcon risk analytics a plus
Client focus and project management skills are required with an aptitude for creating operational efficiencies and positive client experiences
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work collaboratively with the leadership team on the identification, development and ongoing refinement of periodic reports.
Proactively identify opportunities in support of defined business objectives by developing in-depth analyses.
Support the line of business data collection and distribution needs by working collaboratively with internal and external partners as needed.
Support the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business and maintain analytics related to impacts.
Assists in monthly planning, loss analysis, forecasting and variance reporting.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here and Supplement here.",3.6,"First Midwest Bank
3.6","Gurnee, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
77,"Senior Data Analyst, Project Controls",$66k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under the direction of the Senior Manager of Project Controls, the Senior Data Analyst will develop reporting, analyze, evaluate and forecast project controls data. The analyst will also collaborate across San Manuel Band of Mission Indians (SMBMI) & San Manuel Casino (SMC) business operations to gather requirements for report development and/or in depth analysis. Will share activities with project controls team and grow the Project Controls department analytics/BI and process initiatives. The Senior Data Analyst will be required to use independent judgment, provide report and recommendations to Project Controls leadership team.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

1. Responsible for project financial planning and forecasting, report development and automation with visualizations software.

2. Develop automated reporting and adhoc reporting for Project Controls team and leadership as needed (SAS Enterprise Guide).

3. Meets with Project Controls team as necessary to provide information and address departmental issues, such as system interruptions or critical data integrity issues.

4. Define and gather information from Financial system of record as needed to enhance the Project Controls Data Structures.

5. Perform duties such as: validating, financial capital planning, cash flow analytics, break even analysis, creating KPIs, and tracking methodologies.

6. Provide guidance and lead information gathering sessions with Project Managers in adherence to approved project controls policy and procedures.

7. Work closely with Project Managers, Procurement Managers, Financial Analysts, Legal, Finance/Accounting, and Data Services to ensure timely approvals.

8. Perform other duties as assigned to support the efficient operation of the department.

Education/Experience/Qualifications
Bachelors degree in finance, accounting, auditing, or related field required.
Minimum of five (5) years of analytical experience is required.
Demonstrated experience working with relational databases and enterprise reporting tools required.
Experience with software programs Tableau and Lawson is preferred.
Equivalent combination of education and progressive, relevant and direct experience may be considered in lieu of minimum educational/experience requirements indicated above.
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Access is required.
Employee must have experience demonstrating the utmost discretion and confidentiality.
Certificates/Licenses/Registrations
At the discretion of the San Manuel Tribal Gaming Commission you may be required to obtain and maintain a gaming license.
A qualified candidate/employee must have a valid drivers license with an acceptable driving record as determined by the companys insurance carrier.
San Manuel Band of Mission Indians and San Manuel Casino will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990

As one of the largest private employers in the Inland Empire, San Manuel deeply cares about the future, growth and well-being of its employees. Join our team today!",3.3,"San Manuel Band of Mission Indians
3.3","Highland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
78,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$46k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:

The Senior Business Intelligence Analyst is responsible for turning data into knowledge, enabling business decisions.

Specific Duties Include:
Partnering with the user community to create new business intelligence, reporting and data analysis solutions.
Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis.
Capture, develop, and document data definitions, business rules, and data quality requirements.
Build and maintain ETL (Extract, Transform, Load) and integration processes.
Validate data delivered to user community.
Ensure compliance with Protolabs data and software policies and procedures.
Monitor software systems to ensure reliability and accuracy of information loaded into the databases.
Maintain all documentation related to database objects, source systems, and operations.
Conduct complex, important work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgment.
Minimum Qualifications:
6+ years of experience working in software engineering
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server
Experience with Domo
Experience with PowerBI
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Service (SSRS)
Ability to work on multiple project concurrently
Ability to manage time effectively
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work effectively in a fast paced, collaborative environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or related field
Preferred Qualifications:
Previous leadership experience preferred
Knowledge of document databases including Raven
Previous experience with Microsoft Dynamics AX
Previous experience with Salesforce
Software development in a continuous integration and continuous deployment environment
Proto Labs maintains ITAR-compliant operations in all of our United States based facilities. Due to ITAR regulations, this role is only open to U.S. Citizens, lawful permanent residents (green card holders) or foreign nationals granted refugee or asylee status. Individuals with temporary visas (e.g. E, F-1, H-1, H-2, L, B, J, TN or OPT) are not eligible for hire in this role.

Proto Labs, Inc. is an Affirmative Action / Equal Opportunity Employer",2.1,"Rapid Manufacturing
2.1","Nashua, NH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
79,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.6,"Buckman
3.6","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1945,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
80,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
81,Business Intelligence Analyst,-1,"Content function

We are One. That’s the foundation of our company culture at TVH. We’re the worldwide leading supplier of quality replacement parts, safety equipment, and accessories for the material handling and industrial equipment industry. We’re seeking a Business Intelligence Analyst that Partners with the business to gather business requirements for reporting and design and implement various analytical reports based on requirements defined by business users. Translate requirements and ideas into creative and statistically driven solutions.

Essential Functions & Responsibilities

Work closely with business partners to analyse and understand business processes to create and design insightful and intuitive reports
Leverage understanding of business intelligence software to advise the business on best practices in order to deliver the most valuable insights, including:
Advising stakeholders on your views and ideas in order to optimize the reports to be efficient and effective
Understands the impact of one's actions on others and demonstrates respect for others
Effectively communicate findings and solutions to a variety of audiences.
Provide advice and support to executives, managers, clients, and other stakeholders in using business intelligence dashboards
Propose changes that make the BI solutions more efficient and/or reduce operation or maintenance cost
Lead reporting projects from business requirements gathering to delivery
Facilitate communication and understanding between business users and data team
Take ownership of all assigned tasks and project related assignments
Organize and lead meetings with the business and project teams
Profile
Support prioritization of scope based on end user needs and business value
Report project progress at all levels, including management and/or the stakeholders

Ensure the quality, validity and accuracy of reporting provided to the business including detecting and adjusting abnormalities or errors within the reports

Share and define best practice for business intelligence reporting, including:

Develop and implement organizational reporting standards
Collaborate with business users regarding standardization and delivery
Share best practices with other Business Intelligence Analysts and Developers and the IT team in general
Analyze and recommend new ideas and opportunities to streamline processes, address inefficiencies and increase business satisfaction

Deliver business intelligence reporting training to business users as required and address functionality questions to promote the usage of Business Intelligence tools within the organization

Update and maintain professional knowledge and gain insights in business intelligence solutions, tools, and practices including participation in training, staying current with business processes and practices, and enhancing expertise in this area

Travel internationally up to 10% to collaborate with Belgian colleagues

Offer

Education & Skills

Bachelor's degree from a four-year college or university in Business, Information Technology, Management, Business Administration, or another applicable field

Must possess a minimum of two years work experience performing a substantially similar role working in functional or business analysis for an ERP system in the specified business area
Demonstrated interest and/or experience working with business intelligence tools and/or reporting
Demonstrates proficient knowledge of business ERP systems with a focus on financial modules including data analysis, typical business processes, reporting, and interdependencies on other ERP modules
Proven track record in project management, planning, implementing, and communicating technical information
Demonstrated ability to work independently, take initiative and effectively manage multiple projects and changes quickly and effectively
Demonstrates advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel

Desirable qualifications:

Experience, knowledge, and/or training with visualization tools (Tableau, Qlikview, BigQuery)
Experience, knowledge, and/or training with the Agile/Scrum methodology
Project management and Stakeholder management experience

TVH offers a competitive benefits package including medical, dental, and vision insurance, access to an onsite health clinic for you and your family, vacation and sick time, a retirement plan. And, if you need to take a quick break, take a lap around the TVH campus and earn points through our Wellness program or grab your laptop for a quick walk on one of the treadmills located on our Olathe campus. That’s just the start. Want to learn more and see our dynamic work environment? Apply today to join the TVH team.

EEO/AA/Minorities/Females/Disabled/Veterans",4.0,"TVH Group / mateco GmbH
4.0","Olathe, KS",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
82,Scientist,-1,"Responsibilities of the Scientist:

Will work with mouse models and perform molecular biology techniques.
Directs and implements sub-projects within overall project.
Manages team of junior technicians to achieve project goals.
Plans, schedules, and coordinates detailed phases of projects.
Collects, analyzes, and interprets data.
Identifies and resolves technological and methodical problems, troubleshooting when necessary.
Performs experiments to further project goals.
Summarizes data, presenting data weekly at lab meeting.

Requirements of the Scientist:

PhD in Biology, Molecular Biology, or related area.
Must have experience with immunology and mouse models.
Superior ability to make independent judgments of experimental priorities.",4.8,"Commonwealth Sciences
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
83,Data Scientist,$67k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"STRATACACHE provides salable customer experiences, empowering retailers to learn deeply about their customers’ shopping preferences and behaviors, allowing for personalized shopper interaction. Our solutions deliver consumer activation at the point-of-decision, generating new sales opportunities and enhanced retail profitability. With 3 million+ software activations globally, we power the biggest digital networks for the world’s largest brands. Across the STRATACACHE family of complementary digital media/ad tech solution companies, we have the technology, expertise and track record to bring retail innovation that delivers results.

Learn more about the STRATACACHE family at www.stratacache.com.

Data Scientist

Do you love data? Do you enjoy creating statistical models and finding insights that make a difference? Are you interested in the future of retail, commerce, and customer analytics? If so, this is the role for you. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with software engineering, sales, and product organizations to develop innovative, impactful data applications. Your efforts will enhance the overall product quality utilizing many aspects of data science, including various types of modeling that drive toward strategic analytics. You will be focused on the future of the restaurant and retail experience by discovering insights while creating strategic, marketing, retail, customer experience and digital analytics. Your background in statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quantitative research, and/or analytics consulting will be very beneficial as you take on this exciting position in the company and join our Data Science team. In this role you will also have the opportunity to continue to build and improve the marketing of technology products that are influenced by data, understand human behavior and determine how to influence and impact the retail marketplace with exciting new solutions and insights.

Responsibilities include:

Design, build, and deliver statistical models and related actionable data-focused results to support product and customer requirements and initiatives.
Work closely with engineering, product and sales teams to understand business and technical requirements, translate these into important discovery directives, and follow through to optimize and support the enhancement and growth of Stratacache products.
Establish and make effective use of internal and external datasets to back up and support key strategic, product, and customer decision-making efforts.
Serve as the data science expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives and education on accessing and utilizing qualified and focused data for decision making.
Analyze, propose, design and successfully deliver data experiments for engineering, product and sales teams to ensure statistical rigor and effectiveness.
Provide expertise and professionalism in handling sensitive, privacy-protected data, including sources, structures, organization, and optimization.
Communicate complex ideas about our product through visual aids like charts and dashboards.
Keep up-to-date with emerging data science and statistical technologies, methods and practices.
Create and/or use existing data models for predictions regarding user behavior.
Communicate ideas, processes, and results to all levels of internal and external clients and teams.
Basic & Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Analysis, or other technical field related to software development.
Minimum 3 years of related experience working with data science and statistical modeling.
Experience in the QSR, retail or ecommerce industries from a data perspective is required.
Experience with recommendation engines and discovering new and advanced modeling methods i.e. deep neural networks, gradient boosted decision trees, etc.. is required.
Experience with SQL and at least one functional or statistical programming language is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with R and Python is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with REST APIs is required.
Experience working with Postgres, Timescale DB and/or other related database technologies is required.
Ability to distill complex statistical concepts and methodology, and articulate insights to cross-functional teams and clients with varying levels of knowledge in this space is required.
Ability to work with distributed and remote teams is required.
Experience with complex query writing is required.
Experience with result-set performance tuning and related data administration is required.
Experience with big data technologies is required.
Experience and understanding of various statistical modeling tools and platforms is required.
Experience in ecommerce, wifi, app messaging, social and other datasets is beneficial.
Experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence methods and practice is beneficial.
Understanding and experience with database technologies is beneficial including Oracle, SQLServer, etc..
Understanding and experience with BI technologies is beneficial: Tableau, Microstrategy, Microsoft, OBI, etc..
Experience with kafka, Go, or Redis is beneficial.
Understanding of data modeling techniques and star schemas is beneficial.
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce is beneficial.
Experience with ftp, file transfers, data exchange methodologies.
A solid understanding of methodology, data and systems from a broad range of research and analytics providers, including emerging tools and methods is required.
Ability to articulate and tie data to business strategy.
Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint skills
Self-motivated, self-starter with a team-centric focus while working in a fluid environment.
Exceptional communication skills: verbal, written, and presentation.
Experience in the following areas: strategic analytics, marketing analytics, digital analytics, data analytics, statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quant research, analytics consulting.
Desire and interest to uncover and discover insights using disparate data sources.
Desire and interest in being the “Go To” person for data science.
Dynamic personality and passion for data, analytics, visualizations and storytelling is beneficial for this role.
Keen sense of user interface design, style, aesthetics and effective visual presentation.
Experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to work effectively in fast-paced, results-oriented work environment.
Ability to handle and adjust to change in requirements and direction.
Positive attitude, attention to detail, and great problem solving skills are important.

STRATACACHE and its family of companies provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, veteran, marital, parental, citizenship, or domestic partner status, or any other status protected by applicable national, federal, state or local law.

While we are excited and appreciate you interest in our opportunities, please keep in mind that we are not able to contact all applicants that have applied.

No vendor/agency solicitation please.",3.6,"STRATACACHE
3.6","Malvern, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
84,Data Scientist Risk Analyst,$50k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Oasis Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to support the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) in Washington, DC.
The successful candidate shall provide support in data analytics, Python, data visualization, dashboards and use of data analytic tools. Activities which the contractor may be tasked to perform include gathering requirements from stakeholders, conducting financial data analysis and risk analysis in a Big Data environment, and creating interactive dashboard reports and documentations.

LOCATION: Washington, DC

JOB STATUS: Full-Time

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Certifications, Experience, Skills)

SECURITY CLEARANCE: Ability to pass a Special Agreement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquires (NACI) Background Investigation

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree

CERTIFICATIONS AND TOOLS: Certifications in Data Analytics program languages such as Python and R preferred but not required. Experience with Global Risk product a plus, but not required.

EXPERIENCE LEVEL: A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field and a minimum of 5 years of industrial analytics experience using Python (recent use during the past 3 years) as well as extensive experience with SQL.
Specific experience with financial or market risk analysis is a Must.

DESCRIPTION: Functionally, the candidate will be responsible for:

Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements.
Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and Machine Learning techniques.
Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, (such as Value at Risk (VaR): computation and evaluation, VaR tracking (VaR evolution over time), Incremental (and marginal) VaR calculation for individual asset classes /positions, conditional VaR, stress testing).
Test each project thoroughly before presenting it to the task order project manager for quality control. Document test results as part of the project closeout documentation.
Create documentation as required under the PMLC and the Configuration Change Board (CCB) in order to move projects to the production environment.
Coordinate with internal and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues.
Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC which may include regular status meetings, user acceptance testing meetings and ad hoc development discussions.
Data analysis tasks may be varied. They will include complex data requests that require data mining, extraction, and query optimization services from Divisions throughout the CFTC.
Assist business users, economists, statisticians, and others, as required, to support effective use of analytic techniques and CFTC-approved tools to meet the customers various analytic needs.

Who We Are

Oasis Systems is a premier provider of customer-driven, cost-effective and quality Engineering Services; Enterprise Systems and Applications; Human Factors Engineering; Information Technology and Cyber Security; Professional Services; and Specialized Engineering Solutions to the Department of Defense, FAA, NRC and other federal agencies.

We strive to be an exciting and welcoming company that attracts, develops, motivates and retains the most talented, skilled and dedicated people in the industry; where they are encouraged to achieve personal excellence, purpose, and their full potential and career aspirations; while supporting mission-critical national security technologies and programs.

Oasis Systems is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of any legally protected characteristic including, but not limited to, race, color, religion, national origin, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, medical condition, military veteran status or on the basis of physical handicap which, with reasonable accommodation, render the application to satisfactorily perform the job available.",3.8,"Oasis Systems LLC
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
85,Data Analyst,$59k-$73k (Employer Est.),"Who is Comprehensive Healthcare?
Comprehensive Healthcare provides innovative behavioral health and integrated healthcare services to clients of all ages. We take pride in our creative and collaborative work environment and in delivering clinically excellent, trauma-informed, recovery-oriented services.

What are we looking for in a Data Analyst?
As a member of the Information Services department, the Data Analyst supports Comprehensive’s technology and business initiatives by coordinating the collection, storage, and utilization of essential data. This position will work closely with leadership and other staff to determine data needs for specific projects or ad hoc requests, and then gather, interpret, and present the information to the team. The work of the Data Analyst will impact day-to-day clinic operations as well as business decisions, so a high degree of accuracy, thoroughness, and timeliness are essential. Previous experience performing data analytics in the healthcare field is required. The Data Analyst will work on-site in our Yakima office.

Data Analyst duties may include:

integrating data from internal & external sources and performing extract, transform, and load operations to data in various applications
analyzing data to identify and interpret patterns or trends in data sets
performing data audits to identify problem areas & implementing strategies to optimize data integrity and process improvements
assisting with the design & implementation of database warehouse structure and developing standards for the design of data elements
supporting the implementation, testing, and validation of data & software systems
assisting with ongoing data architecture processes & governance
providing Tier II technical support to employees
documenting all work as it is completed

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data analytics, or related field
Three years of experience with data analysis within the healthcare industry

What Comprehensive Healthcare Can Offer You
Training and Development

A variety of career opportunities in a wide range of settings with room for mobility and promotion
Regular training opportunities including support, supervision, and consultation in implementing evidence-based services and programs

Innovative Program & Services

A strong reputation for providing quality, evidence-based services within a collaborative multi-disciplinary team environment
Innovative, forward-looking leadership that seeks to thrive in an ever-changing healthcare environment
Joint Commission-accredited organization committed to continuous quality improvement
Established partnerships with major research universities and other community and healthcare providers to implement cutting-edge treatment programs and services

Excellent Benefits

Competitive salaries within our communities and industry
Healthcare coverage for employee and qualified family members
Generous vacation, paid holiday and sick leave policies
Access to Employee Assistance Program services
Agency-funded retirement plan with contributions equal to 5% of compensation
Additional retirement investment opportunities with a 50% investment match of up to 4% of compensation
Agency-funded life and disability insurance program

Comprehensive Healthcare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. We value the diverse perspectives and strengths that our employees bring to the workplace and we encourage individuals from underrepresented groups to apply for our positions. The Human Resources department offers accommodations and assistance for the application and interview process; please contact us at (509) 575-4084 to make arrangements.",3.6,"Comprehensive Healthcare
3.6","Yakima, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
87,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$83k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
88,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
89,Contract Data Analyst,$54k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.1,"Amyx, Inc.
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
90,Senior Product Data Analyst,$49k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About us:

Kiva (kiva.org) is an international nonprofit with a mission to expand financial access to help underserved communities thrive. We run a global marketplace platform to crowdfund microloans for financially excluded entrepreneurs, farmers and students around the world. Our organization combines the culture and technological passion of an internet start-up with the compassion and empathy of a non-profit to create impact and opportunity at global scale. Since 2005, we have raised more than $1.4 billion in loan capital for 3.6 million borrowers in 95 countries. Our lenders fund over $13 million in loans every month. With offices in San Francisco, Portland, New York, Nairobi, and Bangkok, Kiva's team includes 100+ employees and 400+ volunteers worldwide. Our team is growing as we pursue exciting new opportunities to create a financially inclusive world.

Role overview:

As a Senior Product Data Analyst at Kiva, you'll be responsible for leading analytics initiatives that affect lenders, borrowers and Kiva staff around the world. We are seeking someone who is passionate about the Kiva mission and has a track record of developing actionable product insights, driving data self-service, and providing analytics thought leadership. This role will be responsible for delivering customer-focused data insights that inform the product roadmap and broader Kiva strategy, delivering ongoing trend analysis into drivers of Kiva's key product metrics, and leading Kiva's analytics roadmap.

At this time, we can only consider applicants with authorization to work in the United States on a permanent, full-time basis; unfortunately we cannot provide visa sponsorship.

Key responsibilities include:
Be a senior voice in the organization, discovering customer-focused data insights that inform and lead the direction of Kiva's product
Conduct exploratory analysis to understand the drivers of Kiva's current product performance and to identify new opportunities for product features and experiments (e.g., customer segmentation, pathing analysis)
Design and measure the impact of product experiments, synthesize learnings, and inform and update Kiva's strategic hypotheses
Perform ongoing trend analysis to inform day-to-day decisions by defining metrics, building critical company dashboards, and sharing out ad hoc analysis
Disseminate learnings across the business, to product managers, engineers, marketers, and up through senior and executive leadership
Contribute, alongside data science, to the development of our shared data layer
Provide leadership on a range of analytics work occurring across the company, including mentoring data users in support of self-service
Preferred qualifications:
5+ years experience in data analytics, business analytics, data science, economics, statistics or related field
Consistent record of conducting proactive data analysis, distilling actionable takeaways, making recommendations, and helping the business act on those recommendations
Experience designing and evaluating statistical tests, including multivariate tests with non-binary outcome variables
Well-versed in SQL and facile with Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong presentation and communication skills, with experience working with cross-functional stakeholders and executives
Comfortable extensively using BI tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau)
Experience mentoring others strongly preferred
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and drive change.
Passionate about Kiva and its long term potential.
What we offer:
An opportunity to improve real lives, solve hard problems, and change the world
Friendly, supportive, and adventurous environment with a team of engaged colleagues
A comprehensive, industry-leading benefits package
Opportunities to connect with and learn from colleagues and partners around the world
A diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is an integral part of Kiva's culture. We actively welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer and a great place to work. Join us and help us achieve our mission!

We will only accept applications directly from candidates. Kiva will not be responsible for any recruiting agency fees, absent a formal agreement.

#LI-CY1",4.2,"Kiva.org
4.2","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Nonprofit Organization,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,SAP Maintenance Master Data Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Job Title: SAP Maintenance Master Data Technician

Seeking a skilled technical resource with 5 years experience in the maintenance reliability or design fields. The ideal candidate will have experience in:
Hands on equipment maintenance and management
Management of timelines and work outline
Able to read schematics and technical drawings
Working Knowledge of MircoSoft® suite
Working in a team environment, multiple customers
Consideration given to those with robotics and automation experience
Job Duties:
Perform asset walk down for equipment
Creation of Functional Locations in SAP up to 6th level (this will be trained)
Critical Assessment of equipment
Creation of Maintenance task list based on OEM recommendations
Creation of Maintenance Actives
Maintenance Planning & Scheduling
Creation of Bill of materials
Successful candidate will possess and demonstrate these attributes:
Dedication to collaborative work environment and committed to team success.2. Works for win-win scenarios, whenever possible
Internally motivated, goal driven, biased toward action
History of success and overcoming adversity
Experienced with multilayered matrix organizations
Have a Technology Degree or Military Equivalent
Communicates in timely, honest, candid, direct, and concise manager in all environments
Willing to work out of Anderson, Indiana location",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Anderson, IN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
92,Data Scientist - Risk,$77k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.5,"LSQ
4.5","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
93,Senior Scientific Data Analyst (CDC COVID-19 Response Support),$67k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is hiring Senior Scientific Data Analysts to provide support to the Epidemiology Task Force: Ongoing COVID-19 Response Support. Due to the recent events caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the CDC Epidemiology Task Force is responsible for identifying and tracking COVID-19 cases, spread and containment. The COVID-19 Epidemiology Task Force Response is critical to accomplishing the CDC’s mission and goals during the COVID-19 pandemic. This position will give support across several teams within the task force.

A scientific data analyst has the necessary education and work experiences to effectively provide data analysis, data management, and data visualization support to the task force. These roles are supporting enhanced COVID-19 surveillance efforts and epidemiological studies. Successful candidates will be at an intermediate to advanced coding level in SAS or R (both is preferred).

RESPONSIBILITIES (vary with years of relevant experience and education):

Monitor data submissions from research study partners
Provide data cleaning and management support for research studies and surveillance platforms
Ensure the security and confidentiality of analytical data files and provide data file documentation describing the scientific data source.
Manage epidemiological and laboratory data by using SAS or equivalent statistical package (e.g. R)
Familiarity with data management software packages (e.g. R, REDCap, Microsoft Access, Excel, EpiInfo, STATA, etc.)
Conduct analyses including frequencies, longitudinal data analysis, and univariate and multivariate modeling techniques (linear regression, logistic regression, generalized linear models, and survival analysis)
Perform data quality assurance activities, including identifying and resolving any inconsistencies in data flow, data outside legitimate ranges, and illogical data responses
Manage data stored in a variety of file formats such as SAS datasets, Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, SQL, and ASCII files
Manipulate and transform data that are stored in a variety of file formats
Explore the use of data visualization platforms (e.g. R, Power BI, mapping software) to quickly summarize study findings
Support data visualization activities (both for hypothesis generation and to share data with the response) in order to develop communication materials such as data sets, slide sets and summary reports
Work on ongoing basis to improve and automate code
Conducts weekly data cleaning and generate weekly error reports
Database management and upkeep as well as complete ad hoc data requests
Determine sampling methodologies to implement if case counts exceed certain thresholds, characterize surveillance back-fill to help with real-time interpretation of data
Compile individual-level data submitted from multiple external partners in diverse data formats and merge with laboratory testing results from CDC or contract laboratories
Track completeness and quality of data over time
Prepare summary tables and descriptive analyses of results on a regular basis
Create and modify SAS (or other) programs used for data management and create documentation for programs describing their functions and associated processes and output
Support the design, development, and implementation of surveillance tools to collect epidemiologic data
Communicate analytic results to internal CDC staff and external partners in a clear, concise and timely manner
Assist researchers in developing analytical programs in SAS or R and assist researchers in determining the appropriate statistical techniques to apply to their analyses

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years relevant experience; or Masters degree and 2+ years (preferably a M.S. in statistics or mathematics,, or MPH with a concentration in Epidemiology or Biostatistics)
Capable of high level programming in SAS and/or R for data analysis, data visualizations, and data management

Desired Skills and Experience:

Recent CDC experience
Experience on an outbreak response in any capacity

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
94,Data Scientist - Risk,$77k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.5,"LSQ
4.5","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
95,Data Scientist - TS/SCI w/Poly,$63k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Type of Requisition:

Regular

Clearance Level Must Currently Possess:

Top Secret SCI + Polygraph

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

None

Suitability:

No Suitability Required

Public Trust/Other Required:

None

Job Family:

Data Science

Job Description:

JITR 857 GroupV Development Team
The Contractor shall provide for the tasks documented in this narrative on a best effort, Level of Effort (LOE) basis with the number of FTEs listed under labor categories. The hours shall be managed at the overall JITR level.
A. Introduction:
The Sponsor requires a C2S/AWS cloud server that will support Artificial Intelligence (AI) and Machine Learning (ML) data science operations with a user interface. The Sponsor requires technical support services for a mission-impact focused office.
B. Work Requirement:
The Contractor team shall support the Sponsor in advancing data science and AI/ML innovations from lab to enterprise. The Contractor team shall provide AI/ML Data Science and Technical Services. The Contractor team shall communicate with stakeholders to support data science and AI/ML, projects and partnerships. The Contractor team shall collect, synthesize and assess data science trends and methods creating meeting summaries.
The Contractor team shall draft technical reports, graphics, and summary documents to foster a collaborative data-science culture. The Contractor team shall develop programs and systems for data aggregation, data analytics, data summarization, and data visualization on structured and unstructured datasets. The Contractor team shall work closely with the Sponsor on all activities and efforts.
The Contractor team shall build, develop, and maintain a C2S/AWS automated workflow management system. The Contractor team shall ensure the Sponsor’s data is discoverable and available. The Contractor team shall provide data science and technical services across the entire AI/ML pipeline. The Contractor team shall discover, ingest, prepare, label, and manage Sponsor data. The Contractor team shall develop, test, validate, manage, and deploy AI/ML models. The Contractor team shall provide services to label data using methods such as taggers and tagging tools. The Contractor team shall launch and maintain state-of-the-art repositories to house AI/ML materials such as open source data, models, algorithms, and academic literature.
The Contractor team shall conduct requirements capture sessions with multiple Sponsor stakeholders. The Contractor team shall draft technical reports to capture Sponsor interactions with SMEs, stakeholders, and partners. The Contractor shall proactively offer solutions and recommendations on current and emerging technologies and design approaches. The Contractor team shall identify technology gaps in current capabilities and processes. The Contractor team shall create original concepts and theories for various projects. The Contractor team shall communicate complex technical issues into understandable concepts for mission partner audiences.
Required
• • Demonstrated experience developing using Python data analytics packages such as pandas, numpy, scipy, gensim, and scikit-learn
• Demonstrated experience working with databases such as ElasticSearch and SQL databases
• Demonstrated experience using data pipelines and workflow technologies, such as Apache NiFi
• Demonstrated experience using task tracking and version control tools, such as GitHub and JIRA
• Demonstrated experience using AI/ML tools, such as TensorFlow, PyTorch, and scikit-learn
• Demonstrated experience developing machine learning models on text data and structured datasets
• Demonstrated experience using visualization tools, such as Kibana, Bokeh, or Leaflet/Folium
• Demonstrated development experience in a cloud environment such as C2S/AWS
• Demonstrated experience using analytic methods and methodologies such as probability and statistics, formal modeling, and machine learning on bulk data
• Demonstrated experience with computational social sciences
• Demonstrated experience creating AI/ML models and natural language processing (NLP) models
Desired
• Demonstrated experience using one or more of the following: SQL, C/C++/C#, JAVA, HTML, CSS; JavaScript, NodeJS, D3, WebGL, Flask, Angular, Hadoop, MapReduce, Pig, HIVE, NoSQL, or Hbase

#OpportunityOwned

#GDITCareers

#GDITLife

#WeAreGDIT

#GDITInterns

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

Travel Required:

Less than 10%

Telecommuting Options:

Telecommuting Not Allowed

Work Location:

USA VA McLean

Additional Work Locations:

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics
3.6","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
96,Senior Business Intelligence Analyst,$54k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you looking for a fresh challenge and an opportunity to further advance your career and grow with a fast growing company? If you have a passion for data and an adaptive out-of-the-box thinker with sharp analytical and problem-solving skills, exceptional organization, and able to multitask in a fast-paced environment, we have the perfect job for you!

We are looking for an enthusiastic Senior Business Intelligence Analyst who will be part of the USCCAs Marketing team to bring data to life by providing insights and actions through measurement of current marketing initiatives as well as those in the future.

The Analyst is responsible for accurate operational data reporting for specified marketing teams. This includes traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data for high level and detailed scorecards in addition to ad hoc reports based on specific marketing requests.

They will also perform exploratory analysis to provide recommendations to marketing based on proven data.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Supports Marketing area that includes Strategy, Retail and Product Marketing along with Media (earned, owned and paid) to collect, consume and act on analytics
Marketing traffic drivers, lead generation and revenue data gathering
Filling out scorecards and tracking documents by designated times
Creating ad hoc or one-off reports to satisfy marketing questions
Discovering leading indicators and insights to improve marketing efficiency or performance.
Use data and statistics to support Marketing and formulate strategy
Visualize data for consumption and specific business action
Work with Marketing and BI team, to decide on the success metrics to measure
Organize cross-functional processes
Facilitate Innovation & Growth
Perpetuate a mentality of growth, innovation and ideation by way of staying informed of latest industry trends and methods
Be recognized as the thought leaders of self-defense education, training and trusted legal protection
Process Development & Execution
Participate in establishing and tracking KPIs to ensure all marketing initiatives are performing and growing as planned or better
Build long-term relationships with cross-functional teams, business partners across the organization and outside agencies
Willingness to enthusiastically accept many varied projects and new responsibilities as assigned
Qualifications/ Strengths:
Bachelors degree in Computer Sciences, Statistics, or related field
Work experience in Analytics, Scientific Research or related field
Experience with Marketing and Web Analytics a plus
Meticulous data gathering and reporting abilities
Have a cross-functional understanding of data (Marketing, Web Analytics, IT, & Finance)
Experience with data visualization or reporting tools
High level and granular understanding of marketing objectives
Ability to communicate with Marketing management and leadership
Strong analytical mindset and problem solving abilities
Ability to structure information
Affinity with Stratistics
Basic knowledge about IT ecosystem and programming
Strong organization skills
Ability to think creatively with a process-based mindset
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively to meet deadlines
Demonstrates the Core Values of Delta Defense, LLC
PM19

Powered by JazzHR",4.9,"Delta Defense LLC
4.9","West Bend, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Software Engineer - Data Visualization,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels who are experienced with data visualization, interactive data-driven visualizations, and user interface design. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for the design and development of data visualization software, techniques, and algorithms.
The candidate should have experience creating and building custom, re-usable data visualizations based on statistical and mathematical modeling and data analysis to be used to solve a variety of problems related to data reporting. Seeking engineers with the ability to overcome information overload, are familiar with accessibility compliance, information design, and human factors and usability design.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop, and deploy analytic software solutions
Self-motivated with a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Designing, developing, and deploying data visualizations, interactive dashboards, and user interface solutions
Applying knowledge of technical computing platforms, tools, and techniques to analyze information and data requirements obtained from data scientists, analysts, and other business stakeholders
Planning and proposing solutions for the optimization of data integration strategies, intuitive designs, and enterprise interactive dashboards
Formulating simulation models of operational problems and proposed solutions related to integrating and analyzing using dynamic data visualizations that incorporate intuitive interfaces, infographics, interactive drill-downs, movements
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams on the use of data visualizations developed
Collecting feedback to make continuous improvements to new and existing data visualizations
Contributing to guidelines and design conventions and standards for modeling and data visualizations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design, development, and deployment of software systems
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Front-end application frameworks such as Vue, React, Angular
HTML/CSS frameworks such as Bootstrap, Zurb, Material
Experience developing client-side applications using JavaScript
JavaScript libraries such as Bootstrap, jQuery, Leaflet, D3.js
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Comfortable meeting with customers and peers to explore change requests, bugs and new ideas
Customer technical support experience
Documentation experience, to include up-front design documentation


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
98,"Sr. Director, Office of Data Science",$232k-$367k (Glassdoor Est.),"Advance your career at Liberty Mutual Insurance - A Fortune 100 Company!

Job Summary:

As the Senior Director, Office of Data Science, you will manage the Office of Data Science function for Corporate Actuarial. Responsible for leading and advancing data science at Liberty by improving collaboration and coordination of data science teams/departments across the enterprise including business embedded data science teams, technology, and product. Provides updates on initaitives to the Liberty Mutual Executive Leadership team. Manages a team of 10+ staff comprised of data scientists and product owners. Key responsibility is establishing and executing a data science vision and strategy across Liberty. Applies comprehensive knowledge of the business operations and data science abilities to identify opportunities and influence the courses of action of key stakeholders.

Responsibilities:

Develop and implement a Data Science Talent Strategy that support business needs and drives business value through the support and partnership of the DSPRG and T&ES.
Guide Data Science Technology initiatives through product ownership with an emphasis on self-service data science.Responsible for enabling rapid experimentation and adoption of Data Science, AI, and realize their potential in production. Supports and champion data science initiatives to enhance business collaboration, value, & success.
Cultivate Data Science excellence to create a sustained competitive advantage including tactical experimentation to improve standards and tools.
Act as a cross functional leader on high visibility and impact DS related efforts that span the enterprise.

Qualifications:

Minimum of ten years in leadership roles and at least ten years of data science related experience. Demonstrated ability to integrate data science strategies and programs across multiple functions. Strong experience effectively influencing at all levels of the organization. Must possess strong analytical, strategic, project management, decision-making and problem-solving skills. Excellent communication and interpersonal skills. Bachelor`s Degree required, advanced degree preferred. Strong business acumen with an understanding of insurance operations and the procedures of Financial, Underwriting, Claims, Statistical, Technology, Legal and Sales departments.

Deep knowledge of predictive analytic techniques and statistical diagnostics of models. Expert knowledge of predictive toolset, with the ability to drive thinking about appropriate tool usage. Proven ability to lead and drive projects and assignments to completion through others, to include prior experience effectively managing talent. Exchanges ideas and conveys complex information clearly and concisely, verbally, visually (presentations and exhibits), and in writing, consistent with the audiences and stakeholders with which s/he interacts up to and including SBU/Corp Dept leadership and enterprise wide. Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills required to establish and build effective relationships within and outside the organization and company. Regularly interacts with senior executives. Demonstrated ability to anticipate areas of senior management concern, integrate different perspectives, and respond accordingly.

Benefits:We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview: At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Plano, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
99,Sr. Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1
#LI-LW1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
